#https://www.learn-english-today.com/proverbs/proverbs-T.html

abbreviated piece of nothing
This slang expression refers to someone who is considered to be insignificant or worthless.
"Bob doesn't think much of his new colleague. He calls him an abbreviated piece of nohing."

to the best of one's ability
When someone does something to the best of their ability, they do it as well as they possibly can.
"I felt nervous all through the interview, but I replied to the best of my ability."

(of) no fixed abode
A person of no fixed abode has nowhere permanent to live.
"A 30-year-old man of no fixed abode was charged with the burglary."

about turn/about face
This term refers to a complete change of opinion or policy.
"The ambassador's recent declarations indicate an about turn in foreign policy."

above and beyond the call of duty
If a person does something which is above and beyond the call of duty, they show a greater degree of courage or effort than is usually required or expected in their job.
"The fire-fighter received a medal for his action which went above and beyond the call of duty."

above board
If a situation or business is described as above board, it is open, honest and legal.
"There are not secret negotiations. Our dealings have always been above board."

accident waiting to happen
The term 'accident waiting to happenâ€™ refers to a potentially disastrous situation, often caused by negligence or insufficient precaution.
"According to those who lived nearby, the explosion in the warehouse where the gas cylinders were stocked was an accident waiting to happen."

accidentally on purpose
If you do something intentionally, but pretend it was an accident, you do it accidentally on purpose.
"I accidentally-on-purpose erased his email address so I couldn't contact him again."

more by accident than (by) design
Something that happens more by accident than (by) design is done without deliberate intention.
"I became an interpreter more by accident than design; nobody else could speak the language of the refugees."

an accomplished fact (also 'fait accompli')
Something that has been done or completed before those affected by it can intervene or change it, is called an accomplished fact.

of your own accord
If you do something of your own accord, you do it spontaneously or willingly, without being influenced or forced by anyone.
"The boy went of his own accord to see the owner and admitted breaking the window."

no accounting for taste
This expression is used to indicate surprise at another person's likes or dislikes.
"She fell in love with a guy who is short, fat, bald and poor ... there's no accounting for taste!"

ace a test
If you obtain a very high score or an excellent result, you ace a test or exam.
"Maria's parents said she could go to the party if she aced her English test."

ace in the hole
A poker term wihch means an advantage or resource kept hidden until needed.
"Our candidate has an ace in the hole that will ensure victory ... you'll see!"

have an ace up your sleeve
"If you have an ace up your sleeve, you have something in reserve with which you can gain an advantage."
"I'm well prepared for the negotiations. I've got an ace up my sleeve."

hold all the aces
A person who holds all the aces is in a very strong position because they have more advantages than anyone else.
"Given the high unemployment figures in some countries, employers hold all the aces."

Achilles heel
This expression refers to a vulnerable area or a weak spot, in an otherwise strong situation, that could cause one's downfall or failure.
"He's extremely intelligent, but his inability to speak in public is his Achilles heel."

acid test
To refer to something as 'the acid test'  means that it will prove how effective or useful something is.
"The training course was very interesting but the acid test will come when I start my new job."

acquired taste
Something that you dislike when you first taste it, but begin to like after trying it several times, is an acquired taste.
"Tony has always loved olives, but for me it was an acquired taste."

act of God
This term refers to an natural event or accident, for which no person is responsible (such as an earthquake, lightning and similar acts of nature).
"The insurance company refused to pay for the damage because it was caused by an act of God."

get your act together
If you tell someone to get their act together, you mean that they need to organise their affairs more effectively in order to be more successful.
"You'd better get your act together if you want to find a job!"

add fuel to the flames
If you add fuel to the flames, you do or say something that makes a difficult situation even worse.
"He forgot their wedding anniversary, and his apologies only added fuel to the flames."

much ado about nothing
When people make much ado about nothing, they make a lot of fuss about something which is not important.
There was a meeting to discuss the name for the new playground.
"Much ado about nothing" said my Dad!"

afraid of one's own shadow
A person who is afraid of his/her own shadow is very nervous or easily frightened.
"I've never seen anyone so easily scared. She's afraid of her own shadow!"

after the fact
If something is done after the fact, it done too late, after something has actually happened, especially a crime or an accident.
"He said he realized he had put people in danger, but that was of no help after the fact."

against one's better judgement
If you do something even though you feel it is not a sensible thing to do, you do it against your better judgement.
Bob persuaded her to go by car, against her better judgement, and she regretted it as soon as she saw the heavy traffic.

against the clock
If you do something against the clock, you are rushed and have very little time to do it.
"They are working against the clock to have the presentation ready for Monday."

ahead of the pack
If a person or organisation is ahead of the pack, they are better or more successful than their rivals.
"Our products will have to be more innovative if we want to stay ahead of the pack."

alarm bells start to ring
set the alarm bells ringing
If something sets the alarm bells ringing, it makes you begin to worry, because it shows that there may be a problem.
"Alarm bells started to ring when the old lady next door didn't open her shutters all day and didn't answer her phone."

all along
If something has existed or been somewhere all along, it has been there all the time, from the beginning.
"I had been looking for my keys for some time before I realized they had been in my pocket all along."

all the better for (something)
If you are all the better for something, you benefit from it or feel much better as a result of it.
"You'll be all the better for a good night's rest."

all brawn and no brain
Someone who is physically very strong but not very intelligent is said to be all brawn and no brain.
"He's an impressive player to watch, but he's all brawn and no brain."

all clear
If you are allowed to do something after a check-up to make sure that everything is all right, you get the all clear.
"Dad says he's going to play golf again as soon as he gets the all clear from his doctor"

all ears
To say that you are all ears means that you are listening very attentively
"Of course I want to know - I'm all ears!"

all hands on deck
When there is a need for all hands on deck, everyone must help, especially when there is a lot of work to be done in a short amount of time.
"As the opening day approached, it was all hands on deck to have everything ready in time."

all in your head
If something is all in your head, it is not real.  It is in your imagination.
"Don't be silly. Nobody is trying to harm you. It's all in your head!"

all hell broke loose
If you say that all hell broke loose, you mean that there was a sudden angry or noisy reaction to something.
"All hell broke loose when it was announced that the plant was going to close down."

all that jazz
This expression means 'all that stuff', 'other similar things', or 'everything of that kind'.
"Let's get out the tinsel, the fairy lights and all that jazz to decorate the Christmas tree."

of all people
To use the term 'of all people' emphasizes that the person you mention, more than anyone else, is the one you would expect to do something.
As an artist, you, of all people, should support the new art gallery.

all systems go
When everything is ready for an activity or event to begin, you can say that all systems go.
"We've got an office, a telephone and the internet, so on Monday it's all systems go!"

all things to all people
If you are all things to all people, you please or satisfy everyone.
"She's exhausted trying to be a good wife, a good mother and a good teacher, but she can't be all things to all people."

all things being equal
This expression refers to a probable situation if, in all other ways, the conditions remain unchanged or equal.
"All (other) things being equal, a reduction in the cost of transport should enable us to lower our prices."

all the rage
When something is all the rage, it has become very popular or trendy.
"Sending text messages is all the rage these days, both among individuals and companies."

all sizzle and no steak
Someone or something that turns out to be disappointing, for example after a promotional campaign or marketing operation which led us to expect something better, is called all sizzle and no steak.
"Because of the electoral promises he made, which so far he has failed to keep, many people call the new president 'all sizzle and no steak'."

all skin and bone
If someone is all skin and bone, they are very thin or too thin.
"After trekking in the Himalayas, he was all skin and bone."

all things to all people
If you are all things to all people, you please or satisfy everyone.
"She's exhausted tying to be a good wife, a good mother and a good teacher, but she can't be all things to all people.

all thumbs
all fingers and thumbs
If you are all fingers and thumbs, you are awkward and clumsy and do things incorrectly.
"Would you mind wrapping this for me? I'm all fingers and thumbs!"

all told
All told means the final number, when everything has been counted.
"The number of visitors to the exhibition, all told, was 12543."

up/down your alley
If something is (right) up or down your alley, it is exactly the sort of thing that will suit your tastes or abilities.
"Alex loves reading, so the job in the bookshop is right up his alley."

also-ran
This term refers to an unsuccessful competitor whose performance is so much poorer than the winner's that it appears insignificant.
"He entered the contest hoping that he wouldn't end up as an 'also-ran'."

alter ego
The term alter ego, which in Latin means 'other self', refers to a very close and trusted friend who is very like yourself. (It can also mean a person's alternative personality.)
"She is, above all, her husband's alter ego."

ambulance chaser
A lawyer who finds work by persuading people injured in accidents to claim money from the person who caused the accident is called an 'ambulance chaser'.
"Peterson and Scott are well-known ambulance chasers - that's how they make their money!"

answer for something
If someone has to answer for something, they have to accept responsibility for their actions.
He will have to answer for his dishonesty.

answer the call of nature
answer nature's call
When a person answers the call of nature, they go to the toilet.
"I had to get up in the middle of the night to answer the call of nature."

ants in one's pants
People who have ants in their pants are very restless or excited about something.
"I wish he'd relax. He's got ants in his pants about something today."

anyone's call
This expression is used when the result of a contest or election is difficult to predict.
"Who do you think will win?" "It's anyone's call."

any port in a storm
When you have no choice, any port in a storm refers to a solution you accept, which in normal circumstances you would find unacceptable.
"The hotel was substandard, but it was a case of any port in a storm; all the others were full."

the apple of your eye
A person, usually a child, who is the apple of your eye is one for whom you have great affection.
"My grandson is the apple of my eye."

upset the applecart
If you upset (or overturn) the applecart, you do or say something to spoil a satisfactory plan or situation.
"I hope Julie doesn't attend the meeting; she could upset the applecart."

apple-pie order
If something is in apple-pie order, it is well organised or in perfect order.
"They made sure the house was in apple-pie order before their parents arrived back home."

apron strings.
If one person is tied to another's apron strings, they remain dependent at an age when they should be independent.
"All his decisions are influenced by his mother. He's still tied to her apron strings."

argue the toss
If you argue the toss, you dispute a decision or choice which has already been made.
"The final choice was made yesterday, so don't argue the toss now!"

arm of the law
This expression refers to the extent to which the authority or power of the law extends.
"He fled to South America hoping to escape the arm of the law."

give your right arm
If you say "Id give my right arm for that", you mean that you want it a lot and would do almost anything to obtain it.
"I'd give my right arm to have an apartment on Central Park."

cost an arm and a leg
If something costs an arm and a leg, it is very expensive.
"The house cost us an arm and a leg, but we have no regrets."

be up in arms
If you are up in arms, you are very angry about something and protest very strongly.
"The population was up in arms over the demolition of the old theatre."

keep someone at arm's length
If you keep someone at arm's length, you do not allow yourself to become friendly with them.
"It's not easy to become friends with Sophie;  she tends to keep everyone at arm's length."

armchair critic
An armchair critic is someone who gives advice based on theory rather than practice.
"That guy is such an armchair critic - no experience but plenty of advice."

armchair traveller
Someone who reads books or watches TV programmes about other places and countries, but doesn't actually travel anywhere, is called an armchair traveller.
"A surprising number of adventure books are bought by armchair travellers."

asking for trouble
Someone who is asking for trouble is behaving so stupidly that he/she is likely to have problems.
"Driving fast on these roads is really asking for trouble"

asleep at the wheel
If you say that someone is asleep at the wheel, you mean that they are not sufficiently attentive, especially at a critical moment when vigilance is required.
"When the firemen arrived too late at the scene, the night watchman was accused of being asleep at the wheel."

at all costs
If you are determined to obtain or achieve something at all costs, you want it regardless of the expense, effort or sacrifice involved.
"The journalist was determined at all costs to get a report from the war zone."

at the bottom of the ladder
Someone who is at the bottom of the ladder occupies the lowest or most basic position or is hired at entry level.
"In their first job most people start at the bottom of the ladder. "

at death's door
This expression is used to describe someone who is seriously ill or very close to death.
"The boy was so ill that he was at death's door for several days."

at sixes and sevens
If someone or something is at sixes and sevens they are in a state of total confusion or they are completely disorganised.
"This is not a good time to have guests. Everything is at sixes and sevens since we moved house."

at someone's beck and call
If a person is at someone's beck and call  they are ready to obey orders instantly.
"He's incapable of doing anything himself. He's used to having people at his beck and call."

at this stage of the game
This expression refers to the current point reached in a process, activity or developing situation.
"At this stage of the game I think any further intervention would be unwise. Let's wait and see how things develop."

at stake
Someone who has a lot at stake is in a risky situation, with a lot to be won or lost.
"He was nervous about signing the agreement because there was a lot at stake"

automatic pilot
If you are on automatic pilot, you do something without thinking about it or having to pay attention, because you do it regularly.
"At first I was worried about looking after a baby but after a few weeks I was on automatic pilot!

of no avail
Something which is of no avail is not at all helpful or useful
"The coffee machine wouldn't work, and the instruction leaflet was of no avail."

avowed intent
When someone makes a public declaration of their objective or goal, this is their avowed intent.
"The avowed intent of the new government is to reduce unemployment."

a rude awakening
If you get a rude awakening, you are forced to accept the unpleasant truth or reality.
"She thought Charlie would want her back, but she got a rude awakening - he was already dating another girl."

away with the fairies
Someone who is away with the fairies is in such a dreamy state that they are not totally in touch with reality and give the impression of being slightly mad.
"It's no use trying to explain the problem to her - she's away with the fairies!"

(have an) axe to grind
If you have an axe to grind, you have personal reasons for becoming involved in something or adopting a particular attitude.
"It was decided that the best candidate would be selected by a recruitment agency who had no axe to grind within the company"

leave somebody holding the baby.
If someone is left holding the baby, they are made responsible for a problem that others don't want to deal with.
"When the angry customer started to complain, my colleague disappeared and left me holding the baby."

back-room boys
This term refers to people who do important work but have no contact with the public.
"Back-room boys don't always receive the credit they deserve for their work."

back-of-the-envelope calculation
This expression refers to a quick approximate calculation done informally, as on the back of an envelope.
"I don't need the exact amount. Just give me a back-of-the-envelope calculation."

back of beyond
An isolated place located far from any town is said to be in the back of beyond.
"It took us hours to find Jack's house. He lives in the back of beyond."

(like the) back of one's hand
If you know something like the back of your hand, you are very familiar with it and know it in detail.
"Of course I won't get lost. I know London like the back of my hand!"

back into shape
To get yourself back into shape, you need to take some exercise in order to become fit and healthy again.
"Eva decided she'd have to get back into shape before looking for a job."

back on your feet
If you are back on your feet, after an illness or an accident, you are physically healthy again.
"My grandmother had a bad 'flu but she's back on her feet again."

back to the salt mines
Saying that you have to go back to the salt mines is a humorous way of talking about returning to work, usually with some reluctance.
"We get two days off at Christmas and then it's back to the salt mines!"

back to square one
To say that someone is back to square one means that they have not succeeded in what they were trying to do, so they have to start again.
"When the plans were refused, it was back to square one for the architect."

back to the wall
If you have your back to the wall, you are in serious difficulty with very few  options available.
"With his back to the wall, the supplier had to accept the deal."

back the wrong horse
If you back or bet on the wrong horse, for example the loser in a contest, match or election, you support the wrong person.
"When I voted for him I was convinced he would win, but I backed the wrong horse!"

backhanded compliment
A remark that appears to express admiration but could also be interpreted as an insult is called a backhanded compliment.
"He said my presentation was "surprisingly clear". How's that for a backhanded compliment! Does that mean that I am usually not clear ?"

backseat driver
A passenger in a car who gives unwanted advice to the driver is called a backseat driver.
"I can't stand backseat drivers like my mother-in-law!"

bad egg
Someone who is a bad egg is an untrustworthy person often involved in trouble whose company should be avoided.
"I don't want my son to be friends with Bobby Smith. Bobby's a bad egg."

bad hair day
Originating as a humorous comment about one's hair being unmanageable, this term had broadened to mean 'a day when everything seems to go wrong'.
"What's wrong with Jenny? Is she having a bad hair day?"

(in) bad shape
A person who is in bad shape is in poor physical condition.
"I really am in bad shape. I must do more exercise."

badger someone
If you badger someone into doing something, you persistently nag or pester them until you obtain what you want.
"Sophie badgered her parents into buying her a new computer."

bag of bones
To say that someone is a bag of bones means that they are extremely thin.
"When he came home from the war he was a bag of bones."

bag of tricks
If you use your (whole) bag of tricks to do something, you try (all) the clever methods you know in order to succeed.
"Let's call on George and his bag of tricks; maybe he can help us solve the problem."

in the bag
People use this expression when it becomes obvious that success or victory is going to be achieved.
"An hour before the polling stations closed, victory seemed in the bag for the Conservative candidate."

bait and switch
This term refers to a deceptive commercial practice of advertising
a low-priced item to attract customers, then telling them that the product is out of stock and persuading them to buy a more expensive article.
"This store is famous for its bait and switch tactics"

in the balance
If something is in the balance, the situation is uncertain and it is not clear what is going to happen.
"The future of the company is in the balance while the takeover bid is being examined."

balancing act
When you try to satisfy two or more people or groups who have different needs, and keep everyone happy, you perform a balancing act.
"Many people, especially women, have to perform a balancing act between work and family."

ball and chain
This term refers to a burden or problem that ties you down and prevents you from doing what you want to do.
(It can also refer to one's spouse.)
"Our holiday home has become a ball and chain - it's too much work! "

(the) ball is in your court
If the ball is in your court, it is your turn to speak or act next.
"We gave the manager a list of complaints, so the ball is in his court now."

have a ball
If you have a ball  you enjoy yourself immensely.
"The party was great. We had a ball."

on the ball
If you are on the ball, you are aware of what is happening and are able to deal with things quickly and intelligently.
"We need someone who is really on the ball to head the fund-raising campaign."

start the ball rolling
If you start the ball rolling, you begin an activity in which other people will join.
"Let's start the ball rolling by calling on our first speaker."

that's the way the ball bounces!
This expression means that things don't always work out as planned, and there's nothing we can do about it - that's life.
"He didn't get the prize he expected, but never mind - that's the way the ball bounces."

whole new ball game
To refer to something as a whole new ball game means that it is a completely different situation due to a new set of circumstances.
"Email and text messaging have made communication a whole new ball game."

ballpark figure
If someone gives a ballpark figure, they give an approximate number or a rough estimate of the cost of something.
"I don't know exactly how much it will cost, but a ballpark figure would be around $10 000."

(load of) baloney
This term refers to idle talk, or pretentious, untrue or insincere statements that nobody can believe.
"That's a load of baloney!  I don't believe a word of it!"

bandit territory
A geographical area where law enforcement is practically impossible, because people ignore all rules, is called 'bandit territory'.
"There are a certain number of bandit territories in the world where travellers are advised not to go."

jump on the bandwagon
If a person or organisation jumps on the bandwagon, they decide to do something when it is already successful or fashionable.
"When organic food became fashionable, certain stores were quick to jump on the bandwagon and promote it."

bane of your life
To say that something is the bane of your life means that it is the cause of your problems or your unhappiness.
"The heating system is always breaking down. It's the bane of my life!"

bang your head against a brick wall
If you bang or knock your head against a brick wall, you continue vainly to try to achieve something in spite of several unsuccessful attempts
"I've been banging my head against a brick wall trying to explain the internet to my grandmother!"

bar fly
A bar fly is someone who spends a lot of time drinking in bars and pubs.
"You'll find Johnny down at the pub - he's a real bar fly."

bare your soul
If you bare you soul (or heart) to someone, you reveal your innermost thoughts and feelings to them.
"Mike couldn't keep things to himself any longer. He decided to bare his soul to his best friend."

barefaced liar
Someone who lies easily, with a total lack of shame, is a barefaced liar.
"That barefaced liar stole my watch and said he'd found it!"

bargain hunting
If you go bargain hunting, you spend time in the shops looking for items to buy at the lowest price.
"During the sales I go bargain hunting with my friends."

barking up the wrong tree
A person who is barking up the wrong tree is doing the wrong thing, because their beliefs or ideas are incorrect or mistaken.
"The police are barking up the wrong tree if they think Joey stole the car - he can't drive!"

barrel of laughs
Someone who is a barrel of laughs is very funny or entertaining.
"Let's invite Johnny. He's such a barrel of laughs!"

basket case
A person whose agitated mental state leaves them helpless or unable to cope with things is called a basket case.
"Jenny will turn into a basket case if this stressful situation continues."

bats in the belfry
If you say that somebody has bats in the belfry, you mean that they are eccentric or crazy.
"He comes up with the craziest ideas - he's got bats in the belfry!"

bated breath
If you wait for something with bated breath, you are both anxious and excited about an imminent event.
"We waited with bated breath for the winner to be announced."

batten down the hatches
When you batten down the hatches, you prepare yourself for trouble or a forthcoming difficult period, like a ship preparing for a storm.
"Here comes that trouble-making guy. Batten down the hatches! "

battle lines are drawn
This expression is used to say that opposing groups are ready to defend the reason behind the conflict.
"The battle lines have been drawn between those who accept the changes and those who are against the proposed reforms."

battle of wills
A conflict, argument or struggle where both sides are determined to win is described as a battle of wills.
"When they separated, neither party would make concessions - it was a battle of wills."

be full of beans
A person who is full of beans is lively, healthy and active.
"Charlie may be getting old but he's still full of beans."

be my guest
The expression 'be my guest'  is used to give someone permission to do something.
"If you'd like to use the phone, be my guest."

be-all and end-all
To say that something is not the be-all and end-all means that it is not what matters most or what is most essential.
"Good schools are not the be-all and end-all of educating a child."

be that as it may
The expression 'be that as it may' means that while what the speaker says may be true, it will not change the situation.
"OK. Fewer people may come because of the bad weather, but be that as it may, it's too late to cancel the show."

bear the brunt
A person who has to bear the brunt of something is the one who suffers the most when something bad or unpleasant happens.
"When things go wrong, his assistant always has to bear the brunt of his anger. "

bear fruit
If something bears fruit, it produces positive or successful results.
"After years of hard work, his research finally began to bear fruit."

bear in mind
If a person asks you to bear something in mind, they are asking you to remember it because it is important.
"You must bear in mind that the cost of living is higher in New York."

(like a) bear with a sore head
If someone is behaving like a bear with a sore head, they are very irritable and bad-tempered.
"When his team lost the match, Brad was like a bear with a sore head."

beard the lion in his den
If you visit someone important in the place where they work, in order to challenge him/her or obtain something, you beard the lion in his den.
"If he continues to refuse my calls, I'll have to beard the lion in his den."

beat one's brain out
If someone beats their brains out, they try very hard to understand something or solve a problem.
"My grandmother beats her brains out every evening trying to do the crossword puzzle in the newspaper."

(don't) beat around the bush / stop beating around the bush
The expression 'beat around the bush'  is used to tell someone to say what they have to say, clearly and directly, even if it is unpleasant.
"Stop beating around the bush. Just tell me what has been decided!"

beat/flog a dead horse
To say that someone is beating a dead horse means that they are wasting time and effort trying to do or achieve something that is impossible.
"Mark is beating a dead horse trying to get his money reimbursed.
The company has gone bankrupt!"

beat a hasty retreat
Someone who beats a (hasty) retreat runs away or goes back hurriedly to avoid a dangerous or difficult situation.
"The thief beat a hasty retreat as soon as he saw the security officer."

beat/knock the (living) daylights out of someone
If a person beats the (living) daylights out of another, they hit them very hard and repeatedly.
"If I catch you stealing again I'll beat the daylights out of you!"

beat someone to the draw
If you beat someone to the draw, you react more quickly and manage to do something before they do.
"Ross was determined to be the first to arrive. He managed to beat the others to the draw."

it beats me!
The expression 'it beats me' is used to express surprise at something that you find difficult to understand.
"It beats me how David can live in that horrible apartment!"

(be) at someone's beck and call
If a person is at someone's beck and call, they are always ready to do things for them or obey orders to please them.
"Parents should not be at the beck and call of their children."

(have a) bee in one's bonnet
Someone who has a bee in their bonnet has an idea which constantly occupies their thoughts.
"She's got a bee in her bonnet about moving to New York."

(be the) bee's knees
If someone thinks they are the the bee's knees, they have a high opinion of themselves.
(This comment is made disapprovingly by another person.)
"Chloe thinks she's the bee's knees since she got her new job.
Naturally - no other candidate got the job!"

beef something up
If you beef something up, you improve it by making it stronger or more substantial.
"You'd better beef up your arguments if you want to defend your case."

been in/through the wars
If a person or thing has been in or through the wars, they show signs of rough treatment, injury or damage.
"He arrived in a car that looked as though it had been through the wars."

been there, done that
The expression 'been there, done that'  is used to indicate that the speaker is familiar with the situation mentioned.
It can also refer to an attitude which reflects a certain boredom at the idea of repeating an experience that has lost its novelty.
"His suggestions produced a 'been there, done that' attitude which undermined his enthusiasm."

before the ink is dry
If people reach an agreement, then change their minds immediately afterwards, the change occurs 'before the ink is dry'.
"You can never tell when he's serious. He's capable of changing his mind before the ink is dry!"

before you know it
If something takes place so suddenly that you don't have time to become aware of it, it happens before you know it or before you know where you are.
"The doorbell rang, and before we knew it a surprise birthday party was under way!"

before your very eyes
If someone does something before your very eyes, they do it in front of you, without attempting to hide what they are doing.
"Before my very eyes he took the rubbish and threw it into the neigbour's garden!"

beggars can't be choosers
The expression 'beggars can't be choosers' means that you should not reject an offer if it is the only possibility you have. You have no other choice.
"He'll be lucky if he finds any kind of job at all. Beggars can't be choosers!"

behind bars
Someone who is behind bars is in prison.
"If you hang around with that gang, you'll find yourself behind bars in no time!"

behind closed doors
If something takes place behind closed doors, it is done privately, with no observers or intruders.
"The matter was discussed behind closed doors."

behind the times
A person who is behind the times has old-fashioned ideas and does not keep up with modern life in general.
"Jane doesn't have a mobile phone. She's completely behind the times."

ring a bell
If something rings a bell, it is vaguely familar to you, but you can't remember the exact details.
"John Bentley? The name rings a bell but I don't remember him."

with bells on
If you go somewhere with bells on, you are delighted and eager to go there
"Of course I'll be there - with bells on!"

below the belt
An action or remark described as below the belt is considered to be unfair or cruel.
"Politicians sometimes use personal information to hit their rivals below the belt."

tighten one's belt
If you need to tighten your belt, you must spend less money or be careful how you spend it because there is less available.
"Another bill? I'll have to tighten my belt this month!"

under one's belt
If you have something under your belt, you have acquired experience or have satisfactorily achieved something.
"You've got to have some work experience under your belt before you can hope to get a permanent job."

bend over backwards
If you bend over backwards, you try very hard to do something, especially to please somebody.
"The manager bent over backwards to try to make Jack stay, but Jack wouldn't change his mind."

bend the truth
If you bend the truth, you say something that is not entirely true.
"Ok, I bent the truth a bit. I told him it was my natural colour, but I didn't say that my hairdresser helped me to keep it natural!"

benefit of the doubt
If you give someone the benefit of the doubt, you choose to believe that the person is innocent, honest or telling the truth, because there is no evidence to the contrary.
"Although he found it hard to believe Tom's explanation, the teacher decided to give him the benefit of the doubt."

(get) bent out of shape
If you get bent out of shape, you become annoyed or upset about something that is usually not that important or cannot be avoided.
"Don't get bent out of shape if you're delayed. We'll wait for you."

beside yourself
If you are beside yourself (with an emotion), you lose your self-control because of the intensity of the emotion you are feeling.
"Sam was beside himself with grief when he lost his son."

best bet
The action most likely to succeed is called one's best bet.
"Your best bet would be to try calling him at home."

(to the) best of your ability
When someone does something to the best of their ability, they do it as well as they possibly can.
"I felt nervous all through the interview, but I replied to the questions to the best of my ability."

(the) best of both worlds
If a person has the best of both worlds, they have the benefits and advantages of two different things.
"We live in the centre of town, but only 5 minutes from the beach. We have the best of both worlds."

(put your) best foot forward
If you put your best foot forward, you do something as fast as you can.
"It's a long way to the station, but if I put my best foot forward I should catch the next train."

bet your bottom dollar
If you bet your bottom dollar on something, you are absolutely certain of it.
"Jack is very punctual. You can bet your bottom dollar he'll be here at 9 o'clock on the dot."

bet on the wrong horse / back the wrong horse
If you back or bet on the wrong horse, for example the loser in a contest, match or election, you support the wrong person.
"When I voted for him, I was convinced he would win, but I backed the wrong horse."

better late than never
When someone does something late, this remark means that it is better to do it late than not do it at all.
"Do you know what time it is? You promised you'd come early to help me - but better late than never I suppose!"

better safe than sorry
The expression 'better safe than sorry'  means that it's better to be too cautious than to be careless and have regrets later.
"Let's book tickets in advance - better safe than sorry!"

better still / worse still
'Better still' or 'worse still' are used to emphasize that although something is good or bad, something else makes it even better or worse.
"Not only did he get a great offer, but, better still, a house and car come with the job."

think better of
If you think better of  something, you decide not to do what you intended doing.
"I was going to go shopping, but when I saw the crowded car park, I thought better of it."

between the devil and the deep blue sea
If you are between the devil and the deep blue sea, you are in a situation where there are two equally unpleasant alternatives.
"When the new product didn't take off, the management was caught between the devil and the deep blue sea: develop a new marketing campaign or drop the product."

it's beyond me
To say 'it's beyond me' means that it is impossible for you to understand.
"It's beyond me why Mary wants to marry John."

beyond any reasonable doubt
This is a legal expression which means that something is certain.
"The court established, beyond any reasonable doubt, that the man was innocent"

beyond one's wildest dreams
If something is beyond your wildest dreams, it is better than you imagined or hoped for.
"The research team received a grant from the government that was beyond their wildest dreams."

beyond recall
Something which is beyond recall is impossible to retrieve, cancel or reverse.
"I'm afraid we can't recover the pictures - your camera is beyond recall."

beyond redemption
If something is beyond redemption, it is in such a poor state that there is no hope of improvement or recovery.
"With the latest scandal, his reputation is now beyond redemption."

bide your time
If you bide your time, you wait for a good opportunity to do something.
"He's not hesitating, he's just biding his time, waiting for the price to drop."

big cheese
The expression 'big cheese' refers to a person who has a lot of power and influence in an organisation.
"Tom's father is a big cheese in the oil industry."

big fish in a small pond
A big fish in a small pond is an important or highly-ranked person in a small group or organisation.
"He could get a job with a big company but he enjoys being a big fish in a small pond."

(the) big picture
If you talk about the big picture, you refer to the overall situation, or the project as a whole rather than the details.
"While each aspect is important, try not to forget the big picture."

(clean) bill of health
If a person has a clean bill of health, they have a report or certificate declaring that their health is satisfactory.
"All candidates for the position must produce a clean bill of health."

binge drinking
The term 'binge drinking'  refers to heavy drinking where large quantities of alcohol are consumed in a short space of time, often among young people in rowdy groups.
"Binge drinking is becoming a major problem in some European countries."

birds of a feather
To say that two people are birds of a feather means that they are very similar in many ways.
"No wonder they get on well. They're birds of a feather!"

for the birds
If you think something is for the birds, you consider it to be uninteresting, useless or not to be taken seriously.
"As far as I'm concerned, his theory is for the birds."

birthday suit
This humorous expression means that you are wearing nothing.
"The bathroom door blew open, and there I was in my birthday suit!"

take the biscuit
If something takes the biscuit, it is very irritating, annoying or exasperating.
"After waiting for an hour, we were told that there were no seats left. That really took the biscuit!"

bite the bullet
If you bite the bullet, you accept something unpleasant because you cannot avoid it.
"If you don't have health insurance, you have to bite the bullet and pay the hospital fees."

bite the dust / hit the dust
The expression 'bite' or 'hit the dust' is a humorous way of referring to death.
"It's a story about an old cowboy who hits the dust during a train robbery."

bite off more than you can chew
If you bite off more than you can chew, you try to do something that is too difficult for you, or more than you can manage.
"As soon as I started to translate the report, I realized that I had bitten off more than I could chew."

get a second bite at the cherry
This expression means that you get a second opportunity to do or try something.
"Andy was eliminated in the semi-finals, but he'll get a second bite at the cherry next year."

bite the hand that feeds you
If you bite the hand that feeds you, you are unfriendly or show ingratitude towards someone you depend on, or who is helpful to you.
"If you say bad things about the person who gives you a job, you bite the hand that feeds you."

bite someone's head off
If you bite someone's head off, you criticize them strongly (and perhaps unfairly).
"I worked 10 hours a day all week and my boss bit my head off for not doing my share of the work!"

bite one's tongue
If you bite your tongue, you try not to say what you really think or feel.
"It was difficult for me not to react; I had to bite my tongue."

bitten by the bug
If you develop a sudden interest or enthusiasm for something, you are bitten by the bug.
"My dad decided to take up golf and was immediately bitten by the bug."

once bitten twice shy
This is said by someone who has had an unpleasant experience which has made them more cautious.
"I'm never going to get married again. Once bitten, twice shy!"

bitter pill to swallow
Something very unpleasant or difficult to accept is a bitter pill to swallow.
"Losing his job after arranging the merger was a bitter pill to swallow."

black market
The black market  refers to the illegal buying and selling of goods or currencies.
"Be careful of what you buy on the black market - it's not always good quality."

black out
If you black out, you lose consciousness.
"When Tony saw the needle in the doctor's hand, he blacked out."

black sheep
The black sheep is one who behaves very differently or badly, and is considered disreputable by the other members of the family.
"Joe was the black sheep of the family, always getting into trouble."

black tie event
The expression 'black tie event' refers to a formal event at which men are required to wear a dinner jacket, or tuxedo, and a black bow tie.
"I need to know if it's going to be a casual get-together or a black tie event."

in black and white
To say that something is in black and white means that there is written proof of it.
"It's an obligation. It's in black and white in your contract."

blamestorming
A discussion among a group of people who try to determine who
or what is to blame for a particular mistake, failure or wrongdoing, is called 'blamestorming'.
"A blamestorming session took place following the unfavourable reviews in the press."

(a) blank cheque
If you give someone a blank cheque, you authorise them to do what they think is best in a difficult situation.
"Tom was given a blank cheque and told to negotiate the best deal possible."

(a) wet blanket
To refer to someone as a wet blanket  means that they spoil other people's fun, or make an event less enjoyable than it could have been.
"Come on Mike! Don't be such a wet blanket. You're spoiling the party!"

(a) blessing in disguise
A blessing in disguise refers to something that is unpleasant at first but later turns out to have advantages.
"Missing the plane was a blessing in disguise - that's how he met his wife. She was a member of the crew on the next flight!"

(a) blind alley
If you go up a blind alley, you follow an ineffective course of action which leads nowhere, or produces no results.
"The suspect's 'revelations' lead the police up a blind alley."

(as) blind as a bat
Someone whose vision is very poor, or who is unable to see anything, is (as) blind as a bat.
"Without his glasses, the old man is as blind as a bat."

(the) blind leading the blind
The expression 'the blind leading the blind' describes a person with very little ability trying to help or guide a person with no ability.
"Don't ask Sofia to translate it. She hardly speaks a word of English herself. It would be a case of the blind leading the blind."

blind someone with science
If someone tries to blind you with science, they confuse you with their knowledge by using difficult or technical words.
"When you ask Tim for a simple explanation, he blinds you with science."

(in the) blink of an eye
If something happens in the blink of an eye, it happens nearly instantaneously, with hardly enough time to notice it.
"The pickpocket disappeared in the blink of an eye."

on the blink
If a machine is on the blink, a light flickering on and off shows that it is not working properly and needs servicing or repair.
"What a nuisance! The photocopier is on the blink again."

blockbuster
Something that is outstanding, impressive or particularly successful, such as a film or a book ,is called a blockbuster.
"The TV series was a blockbuster."

makes your blood boil
If something makes your blood boil, it makes you really angry.
"His condescending attitude made my blood boil!"

makes your blood run cold
If something makes your blood run cold, it shocks or scares you a lot.
"The look in the prisoner's eyes made my blood run cold."

(get) blood out of a stone
The expression 'get blood from a stone' refers to something that is very difficult to obtain.
"Negotiating a reduction from that company is like getting blood from a stone!"

blood, sweat and tears
A project or action which involves blood, sweat and tears requires a lot of effort and hard work.
"His success wasn't due to luck; it was blood, sweat and tears all the way."

blot one's copy-book
Someone who blots their copy-book does something to spoil their good record or reputation.
"He blotted his copy-book when he was arrested for speeding."

blow away the cobwebs
If something blows away the cobwebs, it makes you feel more lively and refreshes your ideas.
"Let's get out of the house. A walk on the beach will blow away the cobwebs!"

blow a fuse
If you blow a fuse, you suddenly lose your temper and become very angry.
"Charlie blew a fuse yesterday then he discovered that his ipod had been stolen."

blow a gasket
When a furious person blows a gasket, they explode with anger.
"When the shop was burgled for the third time, the owner blew a gasket."

blow hot and cold
If you blow hot and cold about something, you constantly change your opinion about it.
"The boss keeps blowing hot and cold about the marketing campaign - one day he finds it excellent, the next day he wants to make changes."

blow out of proportion
If you exaggerate the importance of something, you blow it out of proportion.
"The importance of the event was blown out of proportion by the media."

blow the whistle
If you report an illegal or socially-harmful activity to the authorities, and give information about those responsible for it, you blow the whistle or you are a whistle-blower.
"He refused to blow the whistle on his boss for fear of losing his job."

blow up in your face
When working on a plan or project, if it suddenly goes wrong or fails, it blows up in your face.
"The trip was difficult to organise, but it blew up in his face when the airline company went on strike."

blow your top
If you blow your top, you suddenly become very angry.
"When my mother saw the state of the house after the party, she blew her top!"

blue around gills
If a person looksblue around gills, (or green or pale) they look unwell or sick.
"You should sit down. You look a bit blue around the gills."

blue chip company
This term refers to a company with a solid reputation for the quality of its products and the stability of its growth and earnings.
"It's usually safe to invest in a blue chip company."

blue in the face
If you do something until you are blue in the face, you try unsuccessfully to do something for a very long time.
"I explained the situation until I was blue in the face but she wouldn't change her mind."

feel blue
To feel blue means to have feelings of deep sadness or depression.
"I'm going to see my grandmother. She's feeling a bit blue at the moment."

blue-eyed boy
A blue-eyed boy is someone's favourite.
"Paul is the director's blue-eyed boy!"

out of the blue
If something happens out of the blue, it happens very unexpectedly.
"I had nearly given up hope when out of the blue I was offered a job."

scream blue murder
Someone who screams blue murder shouts or complains very loudly as if something very serious has happened.
"The crowd started screaming blue murder when the football match was interrupted."

above board
If a situation or business is described as above board, it is open, honest and legal.
"There are not secret negotiations. Our dealings have always been above board."

in the same boat
If two or more parties are in the same boat, they are in the same unpleasant or difficult situation.
"When the factory closed down, the workers all found themselves in the same boat."

miss the boat
If you miss the boat, you fail to take advantage of an opportunity because you don't act quickly enough.
"I managed to get my order through before the end of the special offer - but I nearly missed the boat!"

bodice-ripper
A novel, usually on a historical theme, with a plot that involves romantic passion between a vulnerable heroine and a rich, powerful male character, is called a bodice-ripper.
"The novel is a bodice-ripper set in the French revolution."

the mind boggles
The expression 'the mind boggles' is used as a reaction to something you find amazing or difficult to understand.
"She crossed the Atlantic alone - can you imagine? - the mind boggles!"

boil the ocean
To â€œboil the oceanâ€ means to waste time on a task or project that is unnecessary, not worth doing or impossible to achieve.
"I expect you to do the job well but donâ€™t try to boil the ocean!"

bold as brass
Someone who is as bold as brass behaves without shame or embarrassment.
"Bold as brass, he refused the gift and handed it back to his mother-in-law."

a bolt from the blue
To refer to something as a bolt from the blue means that it happened totally unexpectedly.
"The chairman's resignation came as a bolt from the blue."

a bone of contention
A bone of contention is a matter or subject about which there is
a lot of disagreement.
"The salaries have been agreed on, but opening on Sundays is still a bone of contention."

(have a) bone to pick with somebody
If you have a bone to pick with someone, you are annoyed with them about something and want to talk to them about it.
"Mark wants to see the boss. He says he's got a bone to pick with him."

make no bones about it
If you make no bones about something, you don't hesitate to say something in a frank and open way.
"I made no bones about it. I told him his offer was unacceptable."

you can't judge a book by its cover
This expression means that you should not form an opinion about something from its appearance only.
"He leads a very simple life but in fact he's an extremely rich man. You can't judge a book by its cover!"

in somebody's good or bad books
If you are in somebody's good or bad books, you have their approval or disapproval.
"I'm in my wife's bad books at the moment because I forgot our wedding anniversary."

lick somebody's boots
To say that one person licks another person's boots means that they are trying to please that person, often in order to obtain something.
"There's no need to lick the manager's boots. Just do your job!"

too big for one's boots
A person who is getting too big for their boots is behaving as if they were more important than they really are.
"Tom's really getting too big for his boots since he got a promotion - he hardly says hello any more!"

bored to tears (to distraction/to death/silly)
If you find something so dull and uninteresting that it makes you sad enough to cry, you are bored to tears.
"I could see that my son was bored to tears by the historical documentary."

born with a silver spoon in one's mouth
A person who is born with a silver spoon in their mouth is born into a very rich family.
"She never has to worry about money; she was born with a silver spoon in her mouth."

I wasn't born yesterday
This expression is used to indicate that you are not as foolish or as easily deceived as some people seem to think.
"Stop inventing silly excuses. I wasn't born yesterday you know!"

botch up / make a botch of
If you spoil something, or make a mess of it, by doing a job badly or incorrectly, you make a botch of it or you botch it up.
"Danny tried to assemble the new desk, but he made a botch of it."

on the bottle
A person who drinks alcohol often and regularly is on the bottle.
"Joe went on the bottle when he lost his job."

the bottom falls out
When something causes a plan, project or venture to collapse or fail, the bottom falls out of it.
"When heavy rain was announced, the bottom fell out of their plans for a beach party."

bouncing off the walls
Someone who is very excited about something, or full of nervous energy, is said to be bouncing off the walls.
"Danny can't wait to start his new job. He's bouncing off the walls."

bow and scrape
To say that someone is bowing and scraping means that they are being excessively polite or servile.
"The President was greeted with much bowing and scraping."

brain drain
The departure of highly qualified people (scientists, engineers, etc.) for other countries, where they have better opportunities and usually better pay, is called the brain drain.

have a brain like a sieve
Someone who has a brain like a sieve has a very bad memory and forgets things easily.
"Oh, I forgot to buy the bread - I've got a brain like a sieve these days!"

have something on the brain
If you have something on the brain, you think or talk abut it all constantly.
"Stop talking about golf. You've got golf on the brain!"

the brains behind something
Someone who is the brains behind a project or action is the person thought to have planned and organised everything.
"The police have arrested a man believed to be the brains behind the bank robbery."

a no-brainer
A decision or choice that requires little or no thought, because the best option is so obvious, is called a no-brainer.
"The choice was between a cash refund or having the amount credited to my account - it was a no-brainer. I took the cash!"

get down to brass tacks
When people get down to brass tacks, they start to discuss the essential aspects of a problem or situation.
"The situation was so serious that after a few polite exchanges they quickly got down to brass tacks."

all brawn and no brain
Someone who is physically very strong but not very intelligent is said to be all brawn and no brain.
"He's an impressive player to watch, but he's all brawn and no brain."

know which side your bread is buttered
If you know which side your bread is buttered, you know where your interests lie or what will be to your advantage.
"Paul never argues with his father-in-law. He knows which side his bread is buttered."

take the bread out of somebody's mouth
If you take the bread out of somebody's mouth, you take away their means of earning a living.
"The decision to ban street vendors took the bread out of the mouths of many people."

on the breadline
People who live on the breadline have a very low income or barely enough money to survive.
"Due to the recent crisis, there are more people on the breadline than ever before."

break your back
If you work extremely hard, or put a lot of effort into achieving something, you break your back to do it.
"If you want the job done well, you should accept to pay more. He's not going to break his back for such a low price!"

break the back of the beast
If someone breaks the back of the beast, they succeed in overcoming a major difficulty.
"After hours of effort, the technicians finally broke the back of the beast and turned the electricity back on again."

break fresh ground
If you , you innovate by introducing or developing a new method or system.
"Scientists have broken fresh ground in their exploration of outer space."

break a leg!
This is a humorous way of wishing someone good luck, especially among stage performers.
"So tonight's the opening night? Break a leg!"

break the mould
If you change what people expect from a (traditional) situation, especially by doing something original, you break the mould.
"After generations of doctors in the family, he broke the mould by becoming a fashion designer."

break every rule in the book
If you behave in a completely unacceptable way, you break every rule in the book.
"Our competitors obtained the contract by breaking every rule in the book."

break out in a cold sweat
If you break out in a cold sweat, you begin to perspire a lot, usually from anxiety.
"I get nervous at the dentist's and usually break out in a cold sweat"

breaking and entering
This term refers to the fact of entering a building or home illegally by breaking open a window, door, etc.
"The two men were found guilty of breaking and entering."

breathe down someone's neck
If someone is breathing down your neck, they are watching you too closely and making you feel uncomfortable.
"The atmosphere at work is not great; the boss keeps breathing down our necks all the time."

a breeze
To say that something was a breeze means that it was very easy or that everything went smoothly.
"The interview was a breeze - barely 10 minutes and I got the job!"

bricks and mortar / bricks and clicks
An established trading company (office/shop) is referred to as a 'brick-and-mortar' business.
'Click companies' refer to internet-based operations.
Companies which do both are called 'bricks and clicks'.
"Click businesses are usually more flexible than brick-and-mortar operations."

bright-eyed and bushy-tailed
A person who is bright-eyed and bushy-tailed is very enthusiastic and full of energy.
"Gary was fantastic. He arrived bright-eyed and bushy-tailed at 7am and worked with us all day."

bring the house down
If you bring the house down, you give a very successful performance.
"If Charlie sings like that on Saturday, he'll bring the house down."

bring something/nothing to the table
If you participate in negotiations and bring nothing to the table, you have nothing of interest to offer the other side.
"We'll never reach an agreement if we don't all bring something to the table."

bring someone to heel
If you force someone to behave in a disciplined manner, you bring them to heel.
"The boy had always behaved badly, but the new headmaster managed to bring him to heel."

bring up the rear
Someone who brings up the rear is the last person in a group of people who are walking or running.
"The pupils walked calmly down the corridor, with the teacher bringing up the rear."

in broad daylight
If something happens in broad daylight, it takes place in the clear light of day when everyone can see what's going on.
"His car was stolen in front of the bank, in broad daylight, and apparently there was not one witness!"

(as) broad as it's long
This expression means that there is no real difference which alternative is chosen.
"Take the high-speed train, or fly and take a taxi? It's as broad as it's long."

broad strokes
If something is described or defined with/in broad strokes, it is outlined in a very general way, without any details.
"In a few broad strokes he summed up the situation."

(as) brown as a berry
To say that someone is as brown as a berry means that they are very tanned.
"Judy came back from her holiday as brown as a berry."

browned off
If you are browned off, you are bored, fed up or disheartened.
"Tom is browned off with his job."

have a brush with something
When you have a brush with something, such as the law, you encounter or experience it briefly.
"He had a brush with the law for speeding a few years ago, but he has had a clean record ever since."

the bubble has burst
To say that means that the success of an idea, a product or a situation has suddenly stopped.
"The video game was a phenomenal success but the bubble has burst."

pass the buck
If you say that someone is passing the buck, you are accusing them of not taking responsibility for a problem and expecting someone else to handle it.
"Sam takes the easy way out. Whenever a problem arises, he immediately passes the buck!"

bucket list
A bucket list is a list of things a person would like to do or achieve before a certain age or before dying.
"I have never visited the pyramids of Egypt but they're on my bucket list."

kick the bucket
To kick the bucket is a lighthearted way of talking about death.
"He will inherit when his grandfather kicks the bucket!"

buckle down
If you buckle down, you apply yourself with determination to hard work and give it your full attention.
"If you want to pass your exams, you'll have to buckle down and do some serious work."

nip something in the bud
If you nip a problem or an unacceptable situation in the bud, you stop it at an early stage, before it develops or becomes worse.
"He wanted to be a clown, but his parents soon nipped that idea in the bud."

build bridges
If a person builds bridges between opposing groups, they help them to cooperate and understand each other better.
"A mediator is trying to build bridges between the local community and the owners of the new plant."

take the bull by the horns
To take the bull by the horns means that a person decides to act decisively in order to deal with a difficult situation or problem.
"When the argument turned into a fight, the bar owner took the bull by the horns and called the police."

bulldoze someone into doing something
A person who is bulldozed into doing something is forced to do it, especially by being bullied or intimidated.
"The immigrants we bulldozed into accepting the work."

a bundle of nerves
If you describe someone as a bundle of nerves, you mean that they are very nervous, tense or worried.
"My son is doing his driving test today. Needless to say he's a bundle of nerves!"

the burden of proof
The burden of proof is the necessity imposed by the law to prove that what one says is true.
"The burden of proof lies with the claimant."

burn your bridges
If you burn your bridges, you do something that will be impossible to rectify in the future.
"If you refuse the offer, be careful not to burn your bridges by insulting them. They may make a better proposal later."

burn the candle at both ends
If you burn the candle at both ends, you exhaust yourself by doing too much, especially going to bed late and getting up early.
"Scott looks exhausted - I'll bet he's been burning the candle at both ends lately."

burn your fingers / get your fingers burnt
If you burn your fingers (or get your fingers burnt), you suffer financially as a result of foolish behaviour.
"Jack got his fingers burnt playing on the stock market."

on the back burner
If you put a project or issue on the back burner, you decide to deal with it at a later date because you do not consider it to be that urgent or important.
"When Julie was offered a promotion she put her MBA plans on the back burner."

the burning question
What everyone is asking, and what we all want to know about, is called the burning question.
"Who leaked the information? That's the burning question!"

bury your head in the sand
If you bury your head in the sand, you refuse to face the unpleasant reality by pretending that the situation doesn't exist.
"It's no good burying your head in the sand. We've got a problem on our hands."

bury the hatchet
When people who have had a disagreement decide to forget their quarrel and become friends again, they bury the hatchet.
"I didn't agree with my colleague's decision, but for the sake of peace, I decided to bury the hatchet."

business as usual
After an unpleasant or unexpected event, this expression means that everything is continuing in a normal way, in spite of the difficulties.
"It was business as usual at the supermarket the day after the hold-up."

business before pleasure
This expression means that it is considered preferable to finish one's work before going to relax and enjoy oneself.
"I'd love to have lunch with you but I've got a report to finish - business before pleasure I'm afraid!"

business is business
This is a way of saying that in financial and commercial matters, friendship or personal feelings should not be allowed to have any influence.
"I'll hire your brother only if he is the best candidate. I'm sorry but business is business!"

busman's holiday
A busman's holiday is when you spend your spare time or your holidays doing the same sort of activity as you do in your job.
"My husband is a chef, so for him time off with the family is often a busman's holiday!"

butter someone up
When you butter someone up, you flatter them or you are very nice to them, especially if you want to obtain something.
"He was so keen to get the job that he spent his time buttering up the boss."

butter wouldn't melt in (someone's) mouth
If you say that someone looks as if butter wouldn't melt in their mouth, you mean that they look completely innocent, but that they are capable of doing unpleasant things.
"The boy who stole the purse looked as if butter wouldn't melt in his mouth."

butterflies in your stomach
If you have butterflies in your stomach, you are feeling very nervous.
"At the beginning of an exam, I always have butterflies in my stomach."

buy a lemon
If buy something, especially a car, that is defective, unsatisfactory, constantly gives trouble or stops running after a short time, you buy a lemon.
"The car I bought was a real lemon. It broke down two weeks later."

by degrees
If something happens or develops by degrees, it happens gradually or little by little as time goes by.
"By degrees their business relationship grew into friendship."

in cahoots with someone
If one person is in cahoots with another, they are working in close partnership, usually conspiring to do something dishonest.
"There was a rumour that the Mayor was in cahoots with a chain of supermarkets"

piece of cake
To refer to something as a piece of cake means that you consider it to be very easy.
"The English test was a piece of cake!"

slice/share of the cake
When people feel entitled to a share of the profits or benefits, they want a (larger) slice of the cake.
"Since profits are higher this year, the workers feel they deserve a bigger slice of the cake.

have your cake and eat it
To say that someone wants to have their cake and eat it means that they want the advantages of two alternative situations when only one is possible.
"Jack enjoys his comfort but is always complaining about the cost of things. He can't have his cake and eat it."

sell like hot cakes
Things that sell like hot cakes sell quickly or in large quantities.
"She's a very successful author. Her books always sell like hot cakes."

cake/game is not worth the candle
To say that the cake (or the game) is not worth the candle means that the advantages to be gained from doing something are not worth the effort involved.
"He recorded an album but sold very few copies; the cake wasn't worth the candle."

calculated risk
A calculated risk is a risk taken with full knowledge of the dangers involved.
"The company took a calculated risk when they hired Sean straight out of college."

call someone's bluff
If you call someone's bluff, you challenge them to do what they threaten to do (while believing that they will not dare to do it).
"After the neighbour's threats to demolish the fence, when Jack decided to call his bluff, there were no more complaints."

call it quits
When people temporarily stop doing something or put an end to an activity, they call it quits.
"OK, we're all exhausted, so let's call it quits for today."

call a spade a spade
A person who calls a spade a spade speaks openly and truthfully about something, especially difficult matters.
"What I like about the new manager is that he calls a spade a spade - it makes things so much easier for everyone."

call the shots / call the tune
The person who calls the shots or the tune is the one who makes all the important decisions and is in control of the situation.
"Jimmy shows a lot of authority but in fact it's his wife who calls the tune."

can of worms
To describe a situation as a can of worms means that it is complicated, unpleasant and difficult to deal with.
"The discovery of the transfer of funds turned out to be a real can of worms."

burn the candle at both ends
If you burn the candle at both ends, you exhaust yourself by doing too much, especially going to bed late and getting up early.
"Scott looks exhausted - I'll bet he's been burning the candle at both ends lately."

can't hold a candle to
If one person can't hold a candle to another, they are much less competent or do not perform as well as the other.
"John is very intelligent but he can't hold a candle to his brother Paul when it comes to sports."

paddle one's own canoe
If you paddle your own canoe, you do what you want to do without help or interference from anyone.
"He decided to paddle his own canoe and set up his own company."

can't for the life of me
This expression can be used to say that it is impossible for you to do something, no matter how hard you try.
"I can't for the life of me remember the title of the book."

can't hold a candle
If one person (or thing) can't hold a candle to another, they are much less competent or do not perform as well as the other.
"John is very intelligent but he can't hold a candle to his brother Paul when it comes to sports."

can't make head or tail of
If you can't make head or tail of something, you can't understand it at all.
"Amy's message was so confusing. I couldn't make head or tail of it!"

can't make omelette without breaking eggs
This expression means that it is impossible to make important changes without causing some unpleasant effects.
"Some people will lose their jobs after the merger, but you can't make an omelette without breaking eggs."

can't see the wood for the trees
If someone can't see the wood for the trees, they are so concentrated on the details that they can't see the situation as a whole.
"The new manager found the situation so complicated that he couldn't see the wood for the trees."

can't stand the pace
If you can't stand the pace, you are unable to do things well when there is a lot of pressure.
"She once worked for a famous fashion designer but she couldn't stand the pace."

cap in hand
If you do something cap in hand, you ask for something in a very respectful manner.
"They went to the teacher, cap in hand, and asked for more time to complete their project."

if the cap fits wear it
You can say 'if the cap fits, wear it'  to let someone know that the critical remark they have just heard applies to them.
"Are you referring to me?" "If the cap fits, wear it!"

put on your thinking cap
If you tell someone to put on their thinking cap,  you ask them to find an idea or solve a problem by thinking about it.
"Now here's this week's quiz; it's time to put on your thinking caps!"

on/in the cards
Something which ison the cards it very likely to happen.
"A coalition between the two parties is still on the cards."

play your cards right
If you play your cards right, you do all that is necessary in order to succeed or to obtain what you want.
"If we play our cards right, we'll get the contract."

put/lay one's cards on the table
If you put your cards on the table, you speak honestly and openly about your feelings and intentions.
"It was time for me to put my cards on the table and reveal my true feelings."

carrot and stick approach
If you use a carrot-and-stick approach, you use the promise of reward and the threat of punishment to make someone work harder.
"Some parents use a carrot-and-stick approach to obtain good results from their children."

carry the can
If you carry the can for another person, you accept blame or take responsibility for something that goes wrong, even if it is not your fault or only partly.
"The author didn't turn up for the interview and his agent had to carry the can."

carry the torch
If you carry the torch, you have strong feelings for someone with whom you do not or cannot have a relationship.
"He's been carrying the torch for Julie since their college days, before she married Ted."

carry weight
If a person or organisation carries weight, they are influential or important.
"I'm glad she's on our side - her opinion carries a lot of weight."

put the cart before the horse
A person who puts the cart before the horse is doing things in the wrong order.
"Building a school before knowing the age of the population is putting the cart before the horse."

carve out a niche
A person or company who carves out a niche concentrates on a particular segment of the market, to which they supply a product or service, and develop their expertise in that area.
"In today's competitive market it is better to carve out a niche and try to become the best in that area."

case in point
This term refers to an example which serves to illustrate, support or prove a point which is currently under discussion.
"Not even the most talented athlete is guaranteed a long career. The latest skiing accident is a case in point."

a cash cow
A product or service which is a regular source of income for a company is called a cash cow.
"His latest invention turned out to be a real cash cow."

cash in your chips
If you cash in your chips, you sell something, especially shares, either because you need the money or because you think the value is going to fall.
"Andy cashed in his chips as soon as business started to slow down."

cast a wide net
When trying to find something, if you , you cover an extensive area or use a wide range of sources.
"The hospital cast a wide net in their search for compatible donors."

a cast-iron stomach
If you can eat all sorts of food and drink what you like, without any indigestion, discomfort or bad effects, it is said that you have a cast-iron stomach.
"I don't know how you can eat that spicy food. You must have a cast-iron stomach."

a cat in gloves catches no mice
This expression means that if you are too careful and polite, you may not obtain what you want.
"Negotiate carefully, but remember: a cat in gloves catches no mice!"

a cat can look at a king
This expression means that nobody is so important that an ordinary person cannot look at or be curious about them.

a fat cat
This term used to refer to a rich, powerful, self-satisfied person who uses their money and power in a way that you disapprove of.
"The place was full of fat cats on their big yachts."

cat nap
If you have a short sleep during the day, you have a cat nap.
"My dad often has a cat nap on a Sunday afternoon."

a cat in hell's chance
To say that there is not a of someone doing or achieving something means that there is no chance at all.
"Because of the blizzard, the pilot didn't have a cat in hell's chance of landing safely."

let the cat out of the bag
If you let the cat out of the bag, you reveal a secret, generally not intentionally.
"When the child told her grandmother about the plans for her birthday, she let the cat out of the bag."

like a cat on hot bricks
A person who is like a cat on hot bricks is very nervous or restless.
"The week before the results were published, she was like a cat on hot bricks."

like the cat that ate the canary
If, after an achievement or success, a person seems very self-satisfied or pleased with themselves, you can say that they look like the cat that ate the canary.
"When the boss complimented him on his work, Steve looked like the cat that ate the canary."

like a scalded cat
If something or something moves like a scalded cat, they move very fast, usually because they are frightened or shocked.
"As soon as he saw the policeman, he ran off like a scalded cat."

like something the cat dragged in
If you compare a person or thing to something the cat dragged in, you think they they look dirty, untidy or generally unappealing.
"My teenage son often looks like something the cat dragged in."

like cat and dog
Two people who fight or argue like cat and dog frequently have violent arguments, even though they are fond of each other.
"They fight like cat and dog but they're still together after 30 years."

no room/not enough room to swing a cat.
This expression is used to describe a place or a space that is very small.
"We can't sleep in this room. There's no room to swing a cat here!"

a cat-and-dog life
A life in which partners are constantly or frequently quarrelling is called a cat-and-dog life.
"They lead a cat-and-dog life. I don't know why they stay together."

a cat's lick
A cat's lickmeans a very quick wash.
"A cat's lick was all he had time for before rushing off to catch the bus."

set ( put) the cat among the pigeons
If someone sets the cat among the pigeons, they cause trouble or make a lot of people angry.
"If Joe is the only one to get a pay increase, that will set the cat among the pigeons.

the cat's whiskers (also: cat's pyjamas)
This expression refers to someone who considers themselves to be better than others in a particular area : beauty, competence, intelligence, sport, etc.
"Ever since she got a promotion, she thinks she's the cat's whiskers!"

catch 22
Acatch 22 situation refers to a frustrating situation where you cannot do one thing without doing a second, and you cannot do the second before doing the first.
"I can't get a job without a work permit, and I can't get a work permit without a job. It's a catch 22 situation!"

catch someone's eye
If someone catches you eye, you find them attractive.
"The pretty girl near the door caught his eye."

catch red-handed
If a person is caught red-handed, they are caught while they are doing something wrong or illegal.
"The police arrived as the burglar was leaving the house. He was caught red-handed."

catch as catch can
This expression means that you try to get something in any way possible.
"It's difficult to get much sleep with the new baby - it's catch-as-catch-can these days!"

caught in the crossfire
If you are caught in the crossfire, you suffer the effects of an argument or dispute between two people or groups.
"When the two taxi drivers started to argue, their passengers were caught in the crossfire."

wouldn't be caught dead/seen dead
If someone says that they wouldn't be caught or seen dead in a particular place or doing something, they mean that they would be too ashamed or embarrassed.
"My seven-year-old son thinks he's a big boy; he wouldn't be caught dead holding my hand in front of his friends!"

caught unawares
If someone is caught unawares, they are surprised and unprepared for what happens.
"The security guard moved so silently that the thief was caught unawares."

cause a stir
If something causes a stir, it creates an atmosphere of excitement or great interest.
"The arrival of the actress caused quite a stir in the village."

throw caution to the wind
If you throw caution to the wind, you start taking risks and stop worrying about the danger involved.
"I decided to throw caution to the wind and invest in my best friend's new company."

caveat emptor
This Latin expression, which means 'let the buyer beware', is a warning to customers that goods are for sale 'as is'. The buyer is purchasing the articles at his/her own risk and is responsible for examining them beforehand.
"Caveat emptor is a principle to be remembered when buying second-hand goods."

(like) chalk and cheese
Two people who are like chalk and cheese are completely different from each other
"I'm surprised they get on so well. They're like chalk and cheese."

champ at the bit
Someone who is champing at the bit is ready and eager to start an activity, and is showing impatience at being delayed.
"The press conference was delayed for such a long time that the journalists were champing at the bit."

champagne taste on a beer budget
Someone who likes expensive things that they cannot afford has champagne taste on a beer budget.
"Eva borrows money to buy expensive designer clothes - champagne taste on a beer budget!"

take a chance
If you take a chance on something, you take action in the hope of success even though you know that the result may be negative.
"I may not be able to get through the traffic, but I'll take a chance on it."

chance one's arm
If you chance your arm, you decide to do something even though there is little hope of success.
"Tony knew there was little hope of getting into Harvard but he decided to chance his arm anyway."

chance in a million
A chance in a million is a very small chance, or no chance at all, that something will happen.
"There's a chance in a million of finding the key I lost on the golf course."

change the face of (something)
When an innovation, discovery or event changes the face of something, it alters it completely or in a major way.
"Social networks have changed the face of modern communication."

change of heart
If someone has achange of heart, they change their attitude or feelings, especially towards greater friendliness or cooperation.
"He was against charity, but he had a change of heart when he saw the plight of the homeless."

change horses in midstream
If you change horses in midstream, you change your plan, or choose a new leader, in the middle of an important activity.
"Let's go through with the original plan; it's risky to change horses in midstream."

chapter and verse
This term refers to word-for-word details, or very specific facts, especially the exact place where the information can be found.
"The phrase is attributed to Oscar Wilde, although I can't give you chapter and verse."

chase rainbows
Someone who is chasing rainbows is trying to get something they will never obtain.
"She's trying to get into Oxford, but I think she's chasing rainbows."

chase you (own) tail
Someone who is chasing their (own) tail is spending a lot of time and energy doing many things but achieving very little.
"He's been chasing his tail all week collecting data but the report is still not ready."

cheap shot
A cruel, unfair or unwarranted comment or verbal attack is called a cheap shot.
"Referring to Tom as an 'unqualified speaker' was really a cheap shot."

cheek by jowl
When people are cheek by jowl, they are crammed uncomfortably close together.
"The refugees are living cheek by jowl in a temporary camp."

cheesed off
If someone is cheesed off with something, they are annoyed, bored or frustrated.
"Jenny is absolutely cheesed off with her job."

cherry pick
When you cherry pick, you choose something with great care and select only the best.
"Top university graduates are often cherry-picked by large companies."

get a second bite/two bites at the cherry
This expression means that you get a second opportunity to do or try something.
"He was eliminated in the semi-finals, but he'll get a second bite at the cherry next year."

old chestnut
A story, joke or an idea that has been repeated so often that it has lost its novelty is referred to as an 'old chestnut'.
"The story about his boat capsizing has become an old chestnut!"

chew the fat
If you chew the fat with somebody, you chat in an informal way about unimportant things.
"It's amazing the amount of time my grandparents can spend chewing the fat with their neighbours."

chicken feed
An amount of money considered small or unimportant is called chicken feed.
"I got a job during the holidays but the pay was chicken feed."

chicken out
If you chicken out of something, you decide not to do something because you are afraid.
"He decided to join a karate class, but chickened out at the last minute."

(no) spring chicken
To say that someone is no spring chicken means that they are quite old or well past their youth.
"How old is the owner?" "I don't know, but she's no spring chicken!"

chickens come home to roost
If you say that chickens have come home to roost, you mean that bad or embarrassing things done in the past by someone are now causing problems for that person.
"As tenants the couple were noisy and disorderly. Now they can't find a place to rent. The chickens have come home to roost!"

too many chiefs, not enough indians
This expression refers to a situation where there are too many people giving instructions and not enough people doing the work.
"The business wasn't successful. There were too many chiefs and not enough indians."

child's play
If something is referred to as child's play, it is considered to be simple or easy to do.
"Using this new computer is child's play compared to the old one."

chill out
When people chill out, often after a period of heavy work or nervous tension, they do something that helps them to calm down and relax for a while.
"After a week of exams, the students needed to go and chill out."

chill wind
If you face or feel the chill wind of something, you are beginning to encounter the problems or trouble it causes.
"Many building companies are facing the chill wind of the recession."

chime in
If you chime in, you interrupt or join a conversation, especially to repeat or agree with something.
"As I explained to the bus driver what had happened, the other passengers chimed in and gave their version."

Chinese arithmetic
If something is very complicated or difficult to understand, it is said to be like Chinese arithmetic.
"When he tried to explain the rules of the game to me, it was like Chinese arithmetic!"

Chinese whispers
This expression refers to a process by which a message or piece of information (especially gossip, rumours or scandalous news) is passed on from one person to another, and changes along the way, so that the final version is often very different from the original.

chink in someone's armour
If someone has a chink in their armour, they have a weakness that other people can take advantage of.
"The candidate's opponents are busy looking for chinks in his armour."

(have a) chinwag
If you have a chinwag with someone, you have an opportunity to chat with each other.
"How about having lunch together on Friday?" "OK, good idea, we can have a good old chinwag!"

chip on your shoulder
If someone has achip on their shoulder, the feel resentful because they feel they are being treated unfairly, especially because of their background, their sex or their colour.
"He's got a chip on his shoulder because he's from a working-class family."

chip off the old block
A person who is a chip off the old block resembles one of their parents in appearance, character or behaviour.
"James is a chip off the old block - he reacts the same way as his father."

had one's chips
To say that someone has had their chips means that they have completely failed in what they set out to achieve.
"After the second round, it looked as though Watson had had his chips."

chips are down
This expression refers to people's behavior in a difficult or dangerous situation when action must be taken.
"It's when the chips are down that Jack is at his best."

as useful as a chocolate teapot
Something which is of no practical use at all is about as useful as a chocolate teapot.
"When there are no roads, a car is about as useful as a chocolate teapot."

chop and change
If you chop and change, you constantly change your opinion, plans or methods and often cause confusion.
"Don't chop and change all the time - just make up your mind!"

Christmas comes but once a year
This expression means that Christmas is a time of celebration that only happens once a year, and that we should mark the occasion by being generous to others, especially the less fontunate.
"I know I spend too much on presents, but Christmas comes but once a year, so let's enjoy it all!"

off someone's Christmas list
This expression means that you are no longer on friendly terms with someone.
"I've been (crossed) off her Christmas list since our dog messed up her garden!"

can't fight the city hall
To say that you can't fight the city hall means that it is useless to try to win a battle against a politician, establishment or bureaucracy in general.
"Brian decided it was a waste of energy trying to obtain a tax refund - you can't fight the city hall."

clap eyes on
If you clap eyes on someone or something, you actually see them.
"I've heard of him but I've never clapped eyes on him."

class act
To say that someone, for example an athlete or entertainer, is a class act means that they are very good at what they do.
"Her career is just beginning but she's already a class act."

claw one's way back
In a situation which has deteriorated, if you claw your way back, you gradually regain your former position through determination, energy and hard work.
"After a serious accident, the Olympic champion clawed his way back to the top, to the admiration of all."

clean bill of health
If a person is given a clean bill of health, they have a report or certificate declaring that their health is satisfactory.
"All candidates for the position must prsent a clean bill of health."

clean slate
A clean slate is a record of your work or actions that does not show past mistakes and allows you to make a fresh start.
"He was able to rebuild his life with a clean slate."

clean as a whistle
Something as clean as a whistle is extremely clean.
This can also mean that a person's criminal record is clean.
"Bob spent the afternoon washing and shining his car until it was as clean as a whistle."

clear the air
If you decide toclear the air, you try to remove the causes of fear, worry or suspicion by talking about the problem openly.
"The atmosphere had become so unpleasant that he decided it was time to clear the air."

clear the way
If you clear the way, you allow something to happen by removing what was preventing it.
"Opening universities to women cleared the way for them to have a career and participate actively in today's society."

clinch a deal
In a business relationship, if you clinch a deal, you reach agreement on a proposal or offer.
"Paul's final argument enabled us to clinch the deal."

clip someone's wings
If you clip someone's wings, you do something to restrict their freedom.
"Taking away his credit card is a sure way to clip his wings."

clock in / clock out
When you clock in or out, you record the time you arrive or leave your job by punching a time clock to show the number of hours you have worked.
"I'm going to clock out early today. I've got a dental appointment"

like clockwork
To say that someone or something goes, runs or behaves like clockwork means that everything happens exactly as expected.
"Meals are always served on time. In their home everything runs like clockwork."

close but no cigar
This expression refers to an effort to do something which was a good attempt but not quite good enough to succeed.
"The ball touched the goal post - close but no cigar!"

close call
If something happens, or is avoided or missed, with very little margin, it is called a close call.
"She won the election with 0.5% of the votes - it was a close call."

close shave
This term describes a situation where an accident or a disaster nearly happened.
"I almost hit the child who ran out in front of my car. It was a close shave."

close to home
If a remark or comment is close to home, it is so true, or it affects you so directly, that you feel uncomfortable.
"Alan looks embarrassed. Bob's comment must have been close to home."

close (or dumb) as an oyster
Someone who is asclose (or 'dumb') as an oyster will never reveal something told in confidence, or betray a secret.
"Sophie will never repeat what you tell her. She's as close as an oyster."

cloud cuckoo land
This expression refers to an imaginary unrealistic place where everything is perfect and impossible things can happen.
"Anyone who thinks these measures are going to solve the crisis is living in cloud-cuckoo-land!"

on cloud nine
A person who is on cloud nine is very happy because something wonderful has happened.
"When the boss announced my promotion, I was on cloud nine."

cloud on the horizon
A problem or difficulty that is predictable, or seems likely to arise in the future, is called a cloud on the horizon.
"They are happily married and for the moment there appear to be no clouds on the horizon."

not have a clue
If you don't have a clue about something, you don't know anything about it.
"My wife's grandmother's maiden name? I don't have a clue!"

(the) coast is clear
To say that the coast is clear means that there is no danger in sight or that nobody can see you.
"OK. The dog has gone inside. The coast is clear."

cog in the machine
If you say that someone is a cog in the machine, you mean that, while they are necessary, they only play a small part in an organisation or plan.
"The police quickly realised that the suspect was just a cog in the machine."

cold calls
If you make cold calls, you telephone potential customers from a list of people you do not know.
"In my first job I had to make cold calls using the telephone directory."

cold turkey
This term means to immediately and completely stop an addictive substance, a regular activity or a behavioural pattern, instead of ending it gradually.
"When Dave decided to stop smoking, he did it cold turkey on January 1st."

collect dust
If something is collecting dust, it hasn't been touched or used for a long period of time.
"My dad doesn't play golf any more. His clubs are collecting dust now."

collect one's thoughts
If you collect your thoughts, you try to think calmly and clearly in order to prepare yourself mentally for something.
"Anne stopped to collect her thoughts before calling back the customer."

off colour
If you are off colour, you look or feel ill.
"What's the matter with Tom? He looks a bit off colour today."

come apart at the seams
To say that someone is coming apart at the seams means that they are extremely upset or under severe mental stress.
"Bob has had so many problems lately, he's coming apart at the seams."

come clean
To come clean about something means to tell the truth.
"The boy was encouraged to come clean and tell the authorities what happened."

come hell or high water
If you say that you will do something come hell or high water, you mean that you will do it in spite of the difficulties involved.
"Come hell or high water, I've got to be on time for the interview."

come in all shapes and sizes
Something that can be found in many different forms, types or varieties, comes in all shapes and sizes.
"Computers come in all shapes and sizes these days."

come in handy
To say that something may come in handy means that it may be useful some time or other.
"Don't throw away those old shelves; they may come in handy one day."

come into one's own
When you come into your own, you finally obtain rightful recognition of your ability or talent and begin to have success.
"He's a talented violinist who has at last come into his own."

come to a bad end
If someone comes to a bad end, their actions lead to disastrous consequences which are sometimes deserved or predictable.
"If that boy doesn't change his ways, he'll come to a bad end."

come to blows
If two or more people come to blows, they start to fight.
"The debate was so intense that the participants almost came to blows."

come to the crunch
To talk about what to do if or when a situation comes to the crunch means when it becomes critical and a decision has to be made.
"I'm running out of money. If it comes to the crunch, I'll sell my car."

come to grief
If someone or something comes to grief, they either have an accident, are destroyed or end in failure.
"Their plans for a golf course came to grief when it was decided to build a motorway."

come to grips
If you come to grips with a problem or situation, you start to understand or deal with it properly.
"After the initial shock, the patient began to come to grips with his disability."

come to a head
If a problem or difficult situation comes to a head, it reaches a point where action has to be taken.
"The conflict came to a head yesterday when rioting broke out in the streets."

come to your senses
If you come to your senses you start to think clearly and behave sensibly.
"She finally came to her senses when she saw that public transport was faster than driving in the city."

come rain or shine
If a person does something come rain or shine, they do it regularly, whatever the circumstances.
"He goes to the gym club every day, come rain or shine."

come out of the woodwork
When things, or people, come out of the woodwork, they appear or emerge unexpectedly, as if from nowhere, and usually in large numbers.
"As soon as we added the swimming pool, our children had 'friends' coming out of the woodwork!"

come out in the wash
This expression is used to tell someone not to worry about a mistake or problem because it won't have any serious effect and everything will work out all right.
"Yes, he was furious when it happened, but don't worry - it'll all come out in the wash"

come up in the world
A person who hascome up in the world is richer than before and has a higher social status.
"My old school friend has bought an apartment overlooking Central Park. She has certainly come up in the world."

come up roses
f things come up roses, the end result is successful or positive, even if there were difficult times.
"After several disappointments, everything seems to be coming up roses for the tennis player this year."

come/turn up trumps
To say that someone has come up trumps means that they achieved unexpectedly good results.
"Against all expectations, our team came up trumps in the cup final."

come with the territory
To say that something comes with the territory means that it has to be accepted as part of a job or responsibility, even if it is unpleasant.
"A successful actor has to expect intensive media coverage - it comes with the territory!"

come what may
If you declare that you will do something come what may, you are saying that you will do it whatever the consequences may be.
"Come what may, I'm going to tell my mother-in-law what I think of her attitude."

(get) comeuppance
When someone gets their comeuppance, they receive the treatment they deserve (usually punishment or retribution) for their behaviour or actions.
"Any pupils found bullying the newcomers will soon get their comeuppance."

common ground
This expression refers to an area of shared beliefs, interests or mutual understanding between people or groups who often have disagreements.
"Any common ground among the Mediterranean countries will contribute to future unity."

common knowledge
When information is well-known to everyone (particularly in a community or group), it is called common knowledge. "You didn't know the intern was Jack's son? It thought it was common knowledge."

cook the books
A person who cooks the books is one who changes the facts or figures in the financial accounts, often in order to steal money.
"The actor discovered after a while that his agent was cooking the books."

cook somebody's goose
To cook somebody's goose means to spoil that person's chances of success.
"When the burglar saw the police car arriving, he knew his goose was cooked!"

that's the way the cookie crumbles
To say 'that's the way the cookie crumbles' means that is the way things are and nothing can be done about it - that's life!
"She left me for someone else - that's the way the cookie crumbles!"

a tough cookie
A person who is a tough cookie is someone with a strong and determined character who is not easily intimidated, discouraged or defeated.
"I'm not worried about Jason's future - he's a tough cookie!"

cool as a cucumber
A person who is ascool as a cucumber is not anxious, but relaxed and non-emotional.
"The bride's mother stayed as cool as a cucumber all through the ceremony."

cool one's heels
If you are left to cool your heels, someone keeps you waiting.
"After rushing to be on time for my appointment, I was left to cool my heels in the waiting room for an hour."

copper-bottomed
To describe something such as a plan, a contract or a financial arrangement as copper-bottomed means that it is completely safe or reliable.
"He signed a copper-bottomed agreement with a distributor."

cork something up
If you cork up your feelings or emotions, you fail to show or express them.
"It would be better if she showed her grief and didn't cork up her feelings."

corner the market
If a company dominates an area of business, and leaves no room for competition, it is said to have cornered the market.
"By importing large quantities and selling at low prices, they have cornered the market."

corridors of power
This term refers to the higher levels of government or administration where important decisions are made.
"The matter is the subject of much discussion in the corridors of power at the present time."

cost an arm and a leg
If something costs an arm and a leg, it is very expensive.
"The house cost us an arm and a leg, but we have no regrets."

cost the earth
If something costs the earth, it is very expensive indeed.
"She wears designer clothes that must cost the earth!"

at all costs
If you are determined to obtain or achieve somethingat all costs, you want it regardless of the expense, effort or sacrifice involved.
"The journalist was determined at all costs to get a report from the war zone."

couch potato
If you refer to someone as a couch potato, you criticize them for spending a lot of time sitting and watching television.
"Don't be such a couch potato. There are better ways of spending your time than in front of the TV."

cough up
If you have to cough up something, such as money or information, you give it reluctantly or unwillingly.
"He refused to say who attacked him until his father made him cough up the names."

count your blessings
If youcount your blessings , you focus your thoughts on all the good things in your life rather than on the negative ones.
"Whenever anyone in the family starts to complain, my mother always advises us to count our blessings."

take your courage in both hands
If you take your courage in both hands, you make yourself do something very brave.
"When I saw the child in the burning house, I took my courage in both hands and ran inside."

on course
If you are on course for something, you are likely to achieve it.
"Our team is on course for a victory in the national championship."

cover your tracks
If you cover your tracks, you conceal or destroy evidence of what you have been doing or where you have been.
"Charlie was sorry he hadn't covered his tracks better when his wife discovered he had been unfaithful."

cover (or hide) a multitude of sins
If something covers or hides a multitude of sins, it prevents others from seeing the less pleasant reality.
"Loose-fitting clothes can cover a multitude of sins!"

why buy a cow when you can get milk for free?
This refers to not paying for something that you can obtain for free.
(Sometimes refers to a decision not to marry when you can have the benefits of marriage without any commitment.)
"Rent is high so Bobby is still living with his parents.
He says : why buy a cow when you can get milk for free?"

till the cows come home
To say that a person could do something till the cows come home means that they could do it for a ong time.
"You can ask me till the cows come home but I'm not buying you a scooter!"

crack down on something
If the authoritiescrack down on something, they enforce the law by taking severe measures to restrict undesirable or criminal actions.
"To reduce road accidents, it was decided to crack down on speeding."

crack the whip
If you crack the whip, you use your authority to make someone obey you or work more efficiently, usually by threatening them.
"Every so often I'll crack the whip to make sure we meet the deadline."

cramp someone's style
If you cramp someone's style you do something to prevent them from behaving freely, or performing to the best of their ability.
"I can't paint with people watching me - it cramps my style!."

crank into gear
When a person or activity cranks (or gets) into gear, they start to work or become effective.
"Immediately after the announcement, a group of protesters cranked into gear."

(a) crash course
If you do a crash course, you do an intensive training course in order to obtain quick results.
"Before going to Tokyo, Paul did a crash course in Japanese."

cream of the crop
This expression refers to the best people or things in a particular group.
"As usual, the cream of the crop of this year's graduates were offered the best jobs."

cream rises to the top
Someone or something exceptionally good will eventually attract attention or stand out from the rest, just as cream rises to the top in coffee or tea.
"I knew you'd succeed. As the saying goes: 'cream rises to the top'!"

creative accounting
This term refers to the presentation of a company's results in a way that, although generally legal, glosses over the problems and makes the results appear better than they are.
"It was suggested that some creative accounting might help to attract investors."

creature comforts
This expression refers to modern conveniences (such as hot water or central heating) that make life comfortable and pleasant.
"I need my creature comforts. I don't know how I'd survive without air-conditioning in this climate!"

credibility gap
The extent of disbelief, of the difference between what you are asked to believe and what you are able to believe, is called a credibility gap.
"The growing credibility gap may lead to a serious loss of votes in the next elections."

crest of a wave
If you are on the crest of a wave, you are very successful in what you are doing.
"Our company is going from success to success. We're on the crest of a wave right now."

crocodile tears
To shed crocodile tears means to shed false tears or show insincere grief.
"Caroline pretended to be sad but we all knew her tears were crocodile tears."

(as) crooked as a dog's hind leg
To say that someone is as crooked as a dog's hind leg means that they are very dishonest indeed.
"He can't be trusted - he's as crooked as a dog's hind leg."

(a) cross to bear
A person who has across to bear have a serious problem or heavy responsibility that they must accept because they cannot change it.
"Alzheimer's is a cross to bear for the whole family."

cross that bridge when we come to it
This is another way of saying 'we will deal with that problem when it occurs and not worry about it before'.
"What will happen if we can't repay the loan?"
"We'll cross that bridge when we come to it."

cross the line
If you cross the line, you go beyond the authorized limits and do something which is not acceptable.
"He has an unpleasant habit of telling jokes that really cross the line."

cross your mind
If an idea or thought crosses your mind, you suddenly think of it.
"It just crossed my mind that the shops are closed today."

cross someone's path
If you meet somebody, usually unexpectedly or by chance, you cross their path.
"Ms. Bridgewater was my English teacher but haven't crossed her path since I left school."

at cross purposes
If two people areat cross purposes, there is a misunderstanding as to what each one is talking about.
"Look, we seem to be at cross purposes. You're talking about 'sailing' boats, but I'm talking about 'selling' boats."

cross the Rubicon
If you cross the Rubicon, you make an irreversible decision or commit to a course of action that cannot be changed.
"After careful consideration, he decided to stop teaching and open an art gallery, knowing that he was crossing the Rubicon."

as the crow flies
This expression refers to distance measured in a straight line.
"It's two miles from here to the station as the crow flies, but of course it's much further by road."

crux of the matter
The main point or the most vital element of a discussion or argument is called the crux of the matter.
"The crux of the matter is that he's too old to live alone in that big house."

cry one's eyes out
If you cry your eyes out, you cry a lot and for a long time.
"My son cried his eyes out when he discovered his bike had been stolen."

cry wolf
To cry wolf is to call for help when you are not really in danger. As a result, nobody believes you when you really need help.
"There's Mary screaming again! Does she really have a problem or is she just crying wolf again?"

far cry from something
If one thing is afar cry from something else, they are very different from each other, especially in quality or size.
"My tiny apartment in New York was a far cry from my parents' spacious house."

crying need
When there is a great lack of something which is urgently needed, there is a crying need for it.
"Hospitals claim that there is a crying need for nurses."

crying shame
If something is a crying shame, it is very sad or unfortunate.
"It's a crying shame that some families cannot afford lunch for their children."

for crying out loud
This expression is used to show irritation, exasperation or anger.
"For crying out loud, turn that television off!"

no use crying over spilt milk
This expression means that it is useless to complain or have regrets about something that is done and cannot be changed.
"Sometimes I regret not accepting the offer, but it's no use crying over spilt milk."

crystal clear
A statement or expression that is easy to understand or has an obvious meaning is crystal clear or as clear as crystal.
"There was no need to repeat the instructions. They were crystal clear."

on cue
If something happens on cue, it happens at exactly the appropriate or expected moment.
"My grandmother was blowing out the candles on her birthday cake when, right on cue, the flowers arrived."

off the cuff
If you speak off the cuff, you say something without any previous thought or preparation.
"He handles off-the-cuff interviews very well."

on the cusp
On the cusp refers to a point in time that marks a transition or the beginning of a change.
"Some people think the world is on the cusp of a new era."

a cut above
Someone or something that is a cut above the others is better or of higher quality.
"The articles in this magazine are a cut above the others."

cut both ways
Something that cuts both ways has both a positive and a negative effect at the same time.
"Banning cars in the town centre can cut both ways: less traffic congestion but fewer customers in the shops."

cut the cackle
If you tell a group of people to cut the cackle, you are asking them
to stop talking aimlessly and start dealing with more important or serious matters.
"OK. It's time to cut the cackle and get down to business"

cut corners
Cutting corners means not following the correct procedure in order to save time, effort or money (often with unsatisfactory results).
"I want the job well done - no cutting corners please!"

cut a dash
If a person cuts a dash, they make a striking impression by their appearance and attractive clothes.
"Wearing his uniform, my grandfather cut a dash on his wedding day."

cut and dried
If you refer to a situation, problem or solution as cut and dried, you mean that it is clear and straightforward with no likely complications.
"When the new manager arrived, he didn't find the situation as cut and dried as he had expected."

cut from the same cloth
If two people are cut from the same cloth, they are very similar in character or behaviour.
"Although the brothers look alike, they are not cut from the same cloth. They each have their own personality."

cut the ground from under someone's feet
When someone cuts the ground from under another's feet, they
do something which weakens their position or spoils theiir plans.
"When we launched the new product, we cut the ground from under our competitors' feet."

cut no ice
If something cuts no ice, it has no effect or makes no impression on someone.
"Her explanation cut no ice with the teacher who said he would tolerate no more unjustified absences."

cut loose
If someone cuts loose or is cut loose, they stop being influenced or controlled by another person or group.
"He's thirty years old and still hasn't cut loose from his familiy."

cut one's losses
If you end or withdraw from something that is already failing, in order to reduce the loss of money, time or effort invested in it,
you cut your losses.
"The project is heading for failure. Let's cut our losses before it's too late."

cut one's own throat
If you cut your own throat, you do something that will be the cause of your own failure or ruin your chances in the future.
"Tony has already missed a lot of classes. He's cutting his own throat."

cut it/cut things fine
If you cut it/cut things fine, you leave barely enough time to do something.
"You're counting just an hour between the airport and the train station - isn't that cutting things a bit fine?"

cut it out
If you say 'cut it out' to someone, you are telling them to stop doing something.
"I've had enough of your insinuations, so just cut it out!"

not cut out for something
If you are not cut out for something, you are not the sort of person to succeed or be happy in a particular activity.
"I started studying medicine but I knew immediately that I wasn't cut out for it."

cut (someone) some slack
If you relax a rule, treat a person less severely or allow someone to do something which is normally not permitted, you cut them some slack.
"Our parents are very strict; I wish they'd cut us some slack now and then."

cut to the quick
If you cut someone to the quick, you hurt their feelings or offend them deeply.
"Alan was cut to the quick when Joe expressed doubt about his sincerity."

cutting edge
This expression refers to the newest, most advanced stage in the development of something.
"The company is at the cutting edge of aeronautics."

dab hand at something
If you're a dab hand at something, you're very good at doing it.
"Why don't you call Suzy? She's a dab hand at planning parties."

put a damper on (something)
If someone or something puts a damper on a situation or event, they make it less successful or enjoyable.
"The party was going great until the neighbour's complaints put a damper on it."

dance attendance
If you dance attendance on somebody, you are constantly available for that person and attend to their wishes.
She's rich and famous and expects everyone to dance attendance on her.

dance to someone's tune
If you dance to someone's tune, you do whatever that person tells you to do.
"He is the company's major shareholder so the management has to dance to his tune."

dark horse
If you refer to someone as a dark horse you mean that they are secretive, or that little is known about them, so you donâ€™t know how they will react or perform.
"I can't tell you anything about my neighbour's intentions. He's a bit of a dark horse."

in the dark
If someone is kept or left in the dark about something, they are not informed about it.
"The personnel was kept in the dark about the merger until the last minute."

darken someone's door
If you darken somebody's door, you come as an unwanted or unwelcome visitor.
"Just get out of here and never darken my door again!"

day in the sun
When you have your day in the sun, you get long-awaited attention or some form of well-deserved appreciation.
"Dave finally got his day in the sun when an article was published about his research."

day in, day out
If you do something â€˜day in, day outâ€™, you do it every day without fail over a long period of time.
"My father goes for a 30-minute walk after breakfast day in, day out. He never changes his routine."

call it a day
To say 'let's call it a day' is a way of suggesting that it is time to stop doing something for the rest of that day, whether or not the work or activity has been completed, usually because of tiredness.
"After one last phone call, I decided to call it a day."

(a) day late and a dollar short
If something is a day late and a dollar short, it comes too late and is not good enough.
"They offered me an internship when I had already found a job - a day late and a dollar short!"

daylight robbery
The term 'daylight robbery' is used when the price of something is thought to be much too high.
"10â‚¬ for an orange juice? That's daylight robbery!"

dead as a dodo
To say that something is (as) dead as a dodo means that it is unquestionably dead or obsolete, or has gone out of fashion.
(A dodo is a bird that is now extinct.)
"The floppy disk is an invention that is now (as) dead as a dodo."

dead as a doornail
This expression is used to stress that something or someone is very definitely dead.
"They've started fighting again, so the peace agreement is now as dead as a doornail."

dead cert
Something that is certain to happen or be achieved is a dead cert.
"After such praise, his appointment as captain of the team is a dead cert."

dead duck
This expression refers to a project or scheme which has been abandoned or is certain to fail.
"The project for the new cinema is going to be a dead duck because the location is too far away from the town centre."

dead in the water
A plan or project that is dead in the water is at a standstill or has ceased to function and is unlikely to be reactivated in the future.
"Because of the crisis, the planned housing development is now dead in the water."

dead loss
Someone or something described as a dead loss is absolutely useless or a complete failure.
"When it comes to gardening, my brother is a dead loss."

dead man walking
A dead man walking is someone who will inevitably be in great trouble very soon, especially a person who is about to lose their job or position.
"Because of the way he handled the recent riots, the minister is a dead man walking."

dead right
This is an emphatic way of telling someone that what they are saying is absolutely correct, without doubt.
"This is a bad time to leave a job - you're dead right!"

dead set against
If you are dead set against something, you are strongly opposed to it.
"My father wanted a dog, but my mother was dead set against the idea."

dead wood
The term dead wood refers to people or things which are no longer considered useful or necessary.
"The new manager wants to reduce costs by cutting out the dead wood."

dead to the world
A person who is dead to the world  is fast asleep.
"Don't worry. You won't disturb him. He's dead to the world!"

wouldn't be caught dead
If someone says that they wouldn't be caught or seen dead in a particular place or doing something, they mean that they would be too ashamed or embarrassed.
"My seven-year-old son thinks he's a big boy; he wouldn't be caught dead holding my hand in front of his friends!"

(turn a) deaf ear
If you turn a deaf ear to something, you refuse to listen.
"Sandy turned a deaf ear to the guide's advice and got lost in the mountains."

raw deal
If you say that someone got a raw deal, you think they were treated unfairly or badly.
"When Gary lost his job after arranging the merger, he really got a raw deal!"

deck out
If you deck out someone or something, you dress or decorate them in a special way.
"Paul decked out his car for the wedding."

deep down
If you talk about how someone is, or feels, deep down, you are describing what they are like or what they really feel deep inside, behind the outward appearance.
"Tom appears to be indifferent to his son's success, but deep down he's very happy."

deep pockets
A person or organisation who has deep pockets has a lot of money.
"Andy's business is not doing well at the moment. He says he needs a friend with deep pockets!"

go off the deep end
A person who goes off the deep end becomes suddenly very angry or emotional.
"He started shouting and throwing things around the office. He really went off the deep end."

like a deer/rabbit caught in the headlights
When you are so surprised that you are momentarily confused or unable to react quickly, you are like a deer (or a rabbit) caught in the headlights.
"Surprised by the journalist's question, he was like a deer caught in the headlights."

by degrees
If something happens or develops by degrees, it happens gradually or little by little as time goes by.
"By degrees their business relationship grew into friendship."

deliver the goods
If a person delivers the goods, they do what is expected of them or what they have promised to.
"Let's hope that new whiz-kid the boss hired can deliver the goods!"

out of your depth
If you are out of your depth, you are in a situation which is too difficult for you, or which you know little about.
"She started building a website with little computer knowledge, so she was soon out of her depth and had to look for help."

left to one's own devices
If you leave someone to their own devices, you let them look after themselves, without help or supervision.
"When left to their own devices, many children watch TV and eat junk food."

devil's advocate
During a discussion or debate, if you play devil's advocate, you pretend to be against an idea or plan in order to determine the validity of the arguments in favour of it.
"She decided to play devil's advocate just to see how strongly people felt about the project."

the devil is in the details
This expression refers to a task or a job which appears simple but is in fact more difficult to accomplish.
"Framing a picture looks easy but the devil is in the details."

the devil makes hard work for idle hands
This expression means that people who do not have enough to do are often tempted to do something wrong.
"It's not good for kids to have nothing to do at the week-end; the devil makes work for idle hands!"

the devil take the hindmost
This expression means that you should think of yourself and not worry about other people.
"When the boat capsized it was a case of 'the devil take the hindmost', but luckily they all survived."

there'll be the devil to pay
This is a way of announcing that there will be trouble if something happens.
"Be careful. There'll be the devil to pay if you break anything!"

between the devil and the deep blue sea
If you are between the devil and the deep blue sea, you are in a situation where there are two equally unacceptable alternatives.
"When the new product didn't take off, the company was caught between the devil and the deep blue sea: abandon the product or start a new marketing campaign."

speak of the devil!
This is said to refer to a person who appears just when his/her name is mentioned.
"Well, speak of the devil! We were just talking about your invitation."

dial it back
If you dial it back, you reduce the intensity of something, or tone
it down.
"When Lucas started getting all excited, his mother said: Hey Lucas, dial it back a bit!"

the dice are loaded (against someone)
If everything seems to work to your disadvantage, and you are not likely to succeed, the dice are loaded against you.
"I applied for the job, but being a woman, and over forty, the dice were loaded against me."

dice with death
If you put your life at risk by doing something very dangerous, you dice with death.
"Going mountain-climbing alone is dicing with death."

a dicey situation
Any situation that is potentially risky or dangerous is called a dicey situation.
"The politician put himself in a dicey situation by getting involved with an intern."

the die is cast
To say that the die is cast means that an irrevocable decision has been made that will determine the future.
"I've handed in my resignation, so now the die is cast!"

die with one's boots on
A person who dies with their boots on dies while still leading an active life.
"He says he'll never retire. He'd rather die with his boots on!"

as different as night and day
Two people or things that are very different from each other are as different as night and day.
"Although they are twins they are as different as night and day."

a different kettle of fish
To describe a person, thing or situation as a different kettle of fish means that it is completely different from what was previously mentioned.
"You may have good business relations, but living in that country is a different kettle of fish."

different strokes for different folks
Each individual has their own tastes and requirements. What suits one person may not suit another.
"Alison really enjoys gardening, whereas Julie finds it a chore. Different strokes for different folks!"

dig in one's heels
If you dig in your heels, you refuse to do something, especially if someone is trying to convince you to do so.
"My grandfather dug in his heels and refused to move to an apartment."

dig one's own grave
A person who digs their own grave does something which causes their own downfall.
"If you drop out of college now, with such high unemployment, you'll be digging your own grave."

take a dim view of something
If you take a dim view of something, you dislike or disapprove of it.
"My previous boss took a dim view of wearing casual clothes to work."

dip your toes in the water / get your feet wet
If you dip your toes in the water, or get your feet wet, you start to do something new or unfamiliar, or explore new territory for the first time.
"It will be a new experience for me, but I can't wait to get my feet wet!"

in dire straits
If a person or organisation is in dire straits, they are in a very difficult situation.
"The loss of major contracts has put the company in dire straits."

do somebody's dirty work
To do somebody's dirty work means to do the unpleasant or difficult work that another person does not want to do.
"Life is easy for Ben. He always finds someone to do his dirty work!"

wash one's dirty linen in public
To wash one's dirty linen in public means to talk about unpleasant personal matters in the presence of others.
"'Argue in private.  Don't wash your dirty linen in public.' was my grandmother's advice."

disappear (or vanish) into thin air
If someone or something disappears into thin air, they vanish in a mysterious way.
"After being accused of embezzlement, the director disappeared into thin air."

disaster written all over it
If something, such as a plan or idea, has disaster written all over it, it is thought to be heading for complete failure, or will cause a lot of trouble.
"Mary's idea of a holiday with her in-laws has disaster written all over it!"

dive in headfirst
If you begin something enthusiastically, without thinking about the possible consequences, you dive in headfirst.
"Tony accepted the project without calculating the time it would take; he always dives in headfirst!"

do a double take
Someone who does a double take looks again in surprise at something unexpected.
"He did a double take when he saw his wife in a restaurant with another man."

do a disappearing act
If someone does a disappearing act, they simply vanish, especially if they have done something wrong or dishonest.
"Just before the police arrived, the suspect did a disappearing act."

do a good turn
If you dosomeone a good turn, you act in a helpful way.
"Mike is a great guy - always ready to do a good turn."

(not) do justice
Something that does not show the true value of someone or something does not do justice to them/it.
"The photograph doesn't do her justice; she's much prettier than that."

do more harm than good
If the effect of an action is more damaging than helpful, it does more harm than good.
"Giving him money did more harm than good - he spent it on alcohol."

do nothing by halves
When a person does everything they are engaged in completely and thoroughly, they are said to do nothing by halves .
"When she cooks, it's a four-course meal - she does nothing by halves!"

do somebody's dirty work
To do somebody's dirty work means to do the unpleasant or difficult work that another person does not want to do.
"Life is easy for Harry. He always finds someone to do his dirty work!"

do the spadework
Someone who does the preparatory work or the preliminary research.
"Although I did all the spadework, my name was never mentioned."

do the trick
If something does the trick, it does exactly what is needed, or achieves the desired effect.
"Another coat of paint should do the trick."

just what the doctor ordered
If something is just what the doctor ordered, it is extremely pleasant and will help you feel better.
"A week-end in the sun - just what the doctor ordered!"

a doddle
If a task or activity is a doddle, it is very easy to do or perform.
"How did the exam go?"  "No problem, it was a doddle."

dodge a bullet
If you dodge a bullet, you narrowly avoid a very serious problem or a disaster.
"I dodged a bullet when I missed the plane. It crashed just after take-off."

dog eat dog
This expression refers to intense competition and rivalry in pursuit of one's own interests, with no concern for morality.
"The business world is tough today. There's a general dog-eat-dog attitude."

a dog and pony show
A dog and pony show is a marketing event or presentation which has plenty of style but not much content.

dog in the manger
A person referred to as a dog in the manger is someone who stops others from enjoying something he/she cannot use or doesn't want.
"She hates the guitar so she won't allow her son to learn to play it - a real dog in the manger!"

like a dog with two tails
If someone is like a dog with two tails, they are extremely happy.
"When Paul won the first prize he was like a dog with two tails."

every dog has its day
This expression means that everyone can be successful at something at some time in their life.
"I didn't win this time, but I'll be lucky one day. Every dog has its day."

give a dog a bad name
People who lose their reputation have difficulty regaining it because others continue to blame or suspect them.
"Tom was suspected as usual. Give a dog a bad name!"

old dog for a hard road
This expression means that experience is invaluable when one is faced with a difficult task.
"The case calls for an experienced lawyer, an old dog for a hard road."

small dog, tall weeds
This expression is used to refer to someone who does not have the ability or the resources necessary to perform a task.
"It may be too difficult for the trainee - small dog, tall weeds!"

why keep a dog and bark yourself?
This expression means that if someone or something can do a task for you, there's no reason to do it yourself.
"My grandmother has an electric mixer but she continues to make her cakes by hand. Why keep a dog and bark yourself?"

a dog's breakfast
To describe something as a dog's breakfast means that it is a complete mess.
"The new secretary made a dog's breakfast out of the filing system."

a dog's life
People use this expression when complaining about a situation or job which they find unpleasant or unsatisfactory.
"It's a dog's life working in the after-sales department."

go to the dogs
To say that a company, organisation or country is going to the dogs means that it is becoming less successful or efficient than before.
"Some think the company will go to the dogs if it is nationalised."

let sleeping dogs lie
If you tell someone to let sleeping dogs lie , you are asking them not to interfere with a situation so as to avoid making matters worse.
"Look, they've settled their differences. It's time to let sleeping dogs lie."

my dogs are barking
When a person says that their dogs are barking they mean that their feet are hurting.
"I've been shopping all day. My dogs are barking!"

doggie bag / doggy bag
A bag provided by a restaurant so that you can take home the leftover food is called a doggie (or doggy) bag.
"The portions were so big that I decided to ask for a doggie bag."

in the doghouse
If you are in the doghouse, someone is angry with you because you have done something wrong.
"Mark is in the doghouse because he damaged his father's car."

in the doldrums
To say that a person, a business or the economy in general is in the doldrums means that the situation is gloomy and that nothing new is happening.
"Despite the recent measures, the economy is in the doldrums."

on the dole
A person who receives financial assistance from the government when they are unemployed is on the dole.
"Their father is on the dole so the family is living on a tight budget."

(a) done deal
A done deal refers to an agreement or decision which has been reached on a certain matter.
"We're still considering several proposals, so it's not a done deal yet."

done and dusted
When a project, task or activity is done and dusted, it is completely finished or ready.
"I've nearly finished preparing the presentation. When it's all done and dusted I'll be able to relax."

(the) done thing
The correct way to behave in a particular social situation is called the done thing.
"Wearing jeans to play golf is not the done thing."

donkey work
The expression donkey work is used to describe the unpleasant, repetitive or boring parts of a job.
"I do the donkey work - my boss gets the credit"

donkey's years
If someone has been doing something for donkey's years, they have been doing it for a very long time.
"He knows the town inside out. He's been living here for donkey's years."
(This expression was originally 'as long as donkey's ears', which are very long.)

doom and gloom
A general atmosphere of pessimism, and a feeling that the situation is not going to improve, is referred to as doom and gloom.
"Fortunately it's not doom and gloom for all businesses, in spite of the economic situation."

(the) door swings both ways
If you say that thedoor swings both ways, you mean that the same principle or argument applies to both sides of a situation.
"You don't contact me either. The door swings both ways you know!"

(not the) shadow of a doubt / beyond the shadow of a doubt
This expression is used to indicate absolute certainty about something.
"There wasn't a shadow of  a doubt in our minds about Susan's sincerity."

doubting Thomas
A 'doubting Thomas' is a person who will not believe something without proof, or without seeing it for themselves.
"I had to show him my membership card. What a doubting Thomas!"

down at heel
A person who is down-at-heel is someone whose appearance is untidy or neglected because of lack of money.
"The down-at-heel student I first met became a successful writer."

down in the dumps
Someone who is down in the dumps is depressed or feeling gloomy.
"Alex has been down in the dumps since he failed his exam."

down in the mouth
When someone is down in the mouth, they look unhappy, discouraged or depressed.
"You look a bit down in the mouth. What's the matter?"

down payment
When someone makes a down payment, they pay part of the total amount agreed when signing a purchase deal or contract.
"Emma and Paul are excited. They put a down payment on their first house yesterday."

down the drain
To say that money, time or energy has gone down the drain means that it has been wasted or lost.
"His years of research went down the drain when the company went bankrupt."

down to earth
Someone who is down to earth is not a dreamer but a realistic and practical person who has sensible reactions and expectations.
"Don't ask Suzy for help. She's fun, but not very down to earth."

down to the wire
If something such as project or a match goes down to the wire, the situation can change up until the last possible moment.
"There's nothing as exciting as watching a game that goes down to the wire."

all downhill / downhill all the way
If something is all downhill or downhill all the way, it is very easy to achieve considering the difficulties encountered beforehand.
"The hardest part for the burglars was turning off the alarm system. After that it was all downhill."

go downhill
When something goes downhill, it deteriorates or gets worse little by little.
"His health has been going downhill since the last operation."

drag one's feet
If you drag your feet, you delay a decision or participate without any real enthusiasm.
"The government is dragging its feet on measures to reduce pollution."

drop like flies
If people drop like flies, they fall ill or die in large numbers.
"There's a 'flu epidemic right now. Senior citizens are dropping like flies."

drop of a hat
If you do somethingat the drop of a hat, you do it immediately and without hesitation.
"I've got great friends. They're ready to help out at the drop of a hat."

drop names
When you drop names, you mention the names of famous people you know or have met in order to impress others.
"There goes Jack dropping names again. People will get tired of listening to him!"

drop in the ocean
A drop in the ocean is a very small quantity compared to the amount needed or expected.
"The revenue from the proposed tax reform is a drop in the ocean compared to the deficit."

drop someone a line
If you drop someone a line, you write a letter to them.
"I always drop her a line to wish her a Merry Christmas"

drop like a hot potato
If you drop someone or something like a hot potato, you leave them or immediately stop associating with them.
"As soon as the unflattering article was published, she dropped him like a hot potato."

ready to drop
Someone who is ready to drop is nearly too exhausted to stay standing.
"I've been shopping all day with Judy. I'm ready to drop!"

drum into someone's head
If you teach something to someone through constant repetition, you drum it into their head.
"When we were kids at school, multiplication tables were drummed into our heads."

(a) dry run / dummy run
If you organise a rehearsal, a trial exercise or a practice session of something, in realistic conditions, to see how well it will work before it is launched, you do a dry run.
"Let's do a dry run of the ceremony to make sure everything goes smoothly."

(a) sitting duck
A sitting duck is an easy target, a person who is easy to deceive.
"The young girl was a sitting duck for the photographer."

dull at ditchwater / dull as dishwater
Something as dull as ditchwater is very boring.
"The film was as dull as ditchwater. I nearly fell asleep."

(as) dumb as an oyster
Someone who is asdumb as an oyster will never reveal something told in confidence or betray a secret.
"Sophie will never repeat what you tell her. She's as dumb as an oyster."

dumbing down
If something, such as a television programme or a film production, is dumbed down, it is deliberately made less intelligent or less demanding in order to attract a larger audience.
"Some TV channels are dumbing down their programmes in an attempt to increase their audience ratings."

bite the dust
This expression is used to talk about death in a light-hearted way.
"It's a story about a cowboy who hits the dust during a train robbery."

(as) dry as dust
Something that is as dry as dust is very dry indeed.
This expression can also refer to something dull and uninteresting.
"The ground was as dry as dust."
"His speech was as dry as dust."

dust bunnies
Dust bunnies are clumps of dust, usually found on the floor, in corners or under furniture, in places where the housework is not done regularly.
"The house hadn't been cleaned in weeks. There were dust bunnies everywhere."

dust has settled
To say that the dust has settled means that the situation has become calmer after a series of unpleasant or chaotic events.
"After her difficult divorce, she waited until the dust had settled before making any plans."

throw dust in eyes
If you throw dust in someone's eyes, you prevent them from seeing the truth by misleading them.
"He threw dust in the old lady's eyes by pretending to be a police officer, then stole her jewellery."

go Dutch
To go Dutchwith somebody means to share the cost of something such as a meal or a concert.
"Young people today tend to go Dutch when they go out together."

above and beyond the call of duty
If a person does something which is over and above the call of duty, they show a greater degree of courage or effort than is usually required or expected in their job.
"The fire-fighter received a medal for his action which went above and beyond the call of duty."

duty bound
If you are duty bound to do something, you are required to do it as part of your obligations.
"Teachers are duty bound to report a pupil's absence from school."

dwell on something
If someone dwells on something, they think or talk about it all the time.
"My mother-in-law has health problems, but I wish she wouldn't always dwell on the subject!"

dyed-in-the-wool
This expression is used to describe a person who has fixed, uncompromising, deep-felt beliefs to which they are committed.
"Bob and Jane are dyed-in-the-wool ecologists who use only
biodegradable products."

dying for something
If you are dying for something, you have a strong desire for it!.
"I'm dying for a cup of tea!"

eager beaver
The term eager beaver refers to a person who is hardworking and enthusiastic, sometimes considered overzealous.
"The new accountant works all the time - first to arrive and last to leave. He's a real eager beaver!"

eagle eyes
Someone who has eagle eyes see or notices things more easily than others.
"Tony will help us find it - he's got eagle eyes!"

in one ear and out the other
To say that information goes in one ear and comes out the other means that it is immediately forgotten or ignored.
"I keep telling him about the risks but it goes in one ear and out the other. He never listens!"

lend an ear
If you lend an ear to someone, you listen carefully and sympathetically.
"I know something is troubling you. I'll lend you an ear if you want to talk about it."

make your ears burn
If something makes your ears burn, you are embarrassed by what you hear, especially if the conversation is about you.
"The comments I overheard made my ears burn."

music to your ears
To say that something is music to your ears means that the information you receive makes you feel very happy.
"The compliments I received were music to my ears."

play it by ear
This expression means to improvise or do something without preparation, according to the demands of the situation.
(music : to play by remembering the tune, without printed music.)
"I'm not sure what attitude we should adopt so just let's play it by ear."

turn a deaf ear
A person who turns a deaf ear to something such as a request or a complaint refuses to pay attention to it.
"I tried to explain the situation to the manager but he turned a deaf ear."

earmark something
If you earmark something, you assign it to a particular person or reserve it for a specific use.
"A certain number of  those chairs have been earmarked for the conference room."

earn while you learn
This expression refers to the possibility of earning a salary while in training.
"Become an apprentice and get paid while in training. Earn while you learn!"

easier said than done
To say that something is easier said than done means that what is suggested sounds easy but it is more difficult to actually do it.
"Put the TV aerial on the roof? Easier said than done!"

easy does it!
You can say 'easy does it!' when you want something to be done slowly and carefully.
"Easy does it" said my husband as the sofa was carried through the hall door."

easy as pie
Something that is (as) easy as pie is very easy to do.
"How did the English test go?" "No problem, it was (as) easy as pie!"

eat crow
If you eat crow, you admit that you were wrong about something and apologize.
"Jack had no option but to eat crow and admit that his analysis was wrong."

eat dirt
If someone eats dirt, they are forced to accept insults or bad treatment without complaining.
"As jobs are very scarce in the region, the boss can bully the employees and make them eat dirt with no risk of social unrest."

eat a horse
If you say that you could eat a horse you mean that you are very hungry.
"Let's get something to eat. I'm starving. I could eat a horse!"

eat, sleep and breathe something
If you eat, sleep and breathe something, you are so enthusiastic and passionate about it that you think about it constantly.
"He's an enthusiastic golfer; he eats, sleeps and breathes it!"

eat someone alive
If you criticize someone severely because you are angry with them, you eat them alive.
(You can also be eaten alive - bitten repeatedly - by insects.)
"The boss will eat me alive if the report arrives late."

eat out of house and home
This is a humorous way of saying that someone is eating large quantities of your food.
"I stock up with food when my teenage sons invite their friends over. They'd eat you out of house and home!"

eat/dip into one's savings
If you eat or dip into your savings, you spend part of the money you have put aside for future use.
"I had to dip into my savings to have the car repaired."

eat out of someone's hand
If you eat out of somebody's hand, you are eager to please and will accept to do anything that person asks.
"She is so persuasive that she has people eating out of her hand in no time."

eat your words
If you eat your words, you have to admit that what you said before was wrong.
"After predicting disastrous results, he had to eat his words when he saw the success of the new product."

economical with the truth
To say that a person is economical with the truth means that, without actually lying, they omit important facts or give incomplete information.
"The politician was accused of being economical with the truth."

(on the) edge of one's seat
Someone who is on the edge of their seat is very interested in something and finds it both extremely exciting and nerve-wracking.
"Look at Bob! He's on the edge of his seat watching that rugby match!"

egg someone on
If you egg someone on, you urge or strongly encourage them to do something.
"She didn't really want to learn to drive but her children kept egging her on."

bad egg
To refer to someone as a bad egg means that they cannot trusted.
"I don't my son to be friends with Bobby Smith. Bobby's a bad egg!"

(a) nest egg
If you have a nest egg, you have a reserve of money which you put aside for future needs.
"Our parents consider the money from the sale of their house as a nest egg for their old age."

all your eggs in one basket
If you have all your eggs in one basket, you depend on one plan or one source of income.
"If you invest your savings in one bank, you'll have all your eggs in one basket."

walk on eggshells
If you walk on eggshells with someone, you are careful not to hurt or offend them.
"She's so sensitive, you have to walk on eggshells with her all the time."

ego trip
If you do something primarily to draw attention to yourself and feel important or superior to others, you are on an ego trip.
"His speech about creating an association to help the underprivileged was one long ego trip."

one over the eight
If a person has one over the eight, they are slightly drunk.
"Don't listen to him. Can't you see he's one over the eight!"

elbow grease
If you use elbow grease, you need energy and strength to do physical work such as cleaning or polishing.
"It took a considerable amount of elbow grease to renovate the old house."

elbow room
If you need some elbow room, you need more space to move.
"We shared a small office where neither of us had much elbow room."

in your element
When you are in your element, you are doing something that you do well, and you are enjoying yourself.
"My brother, who is an estate agent, was in his element house-hunting for our parents."

(an) elephant in the room
A problem that no one wants to discuss, but is so obvious that it cannot be ignored, is called an elephant in the room.
"Let's face it, his work is unsatisfactory. It's an elephant in the room that we need to discuss."

(at the) eleventh hour
If something happens at the eleventh hour, it happens when it is almost too late, or at the last possible moment.
"Our team won after they scored a goal at the eleventh hour."

(an) embarrassment of riches
When there is much more of something than necessary, and it is difficult to make a choice, you have an embarrassment of riches.
"Our hosts presented us with an embarrassment of riches. There was so much food that we didn't know where to start!"

(make) ends meet
If you find it difficult to pay for your everyday needs because you have very little money, it is hard for you to make ends meet.
"Anne's salary is so low that she finds it hard to make ends meet."

enough said
This expression is used to indicate that you completely understand the situation and you do not need any further details.
"Your mother-in-law arrived unexpectedly last night? Enough said!"

err on the side of caution
When uncertain about what to do, if you err on the side of caution you do more than what is adequate rather than take any risks.
"When I'm not sure how much food to prepare, I tend to err on the side of caution and prepare far too much."

see the error of one's ways
When someone sees the error of their ways, they understand that what they are doing is wrong and accept to change their behaviour.
"He talked to a counsellor who tried to make him see the error of his ways."

in essence
The term 'in essence' means 'basically', fundamentally' or 'essentially', and refers to the most important or essential facts.
"In essence, lightning is a great big spark of electricity."

(on an) even keel
A situation or person who stays on an even keel manages to remain calm, stable and untroubled in all circumstances.
"She managed to keep her life on an even keel in spite of the difficulties."

even the score
When a person decides to even the score, they try to get their revenge on someone who has cheated or done them harm.
"When Jack discovered that Bob had cheated, he was determined to even the score."

even steven
Two or more people who are even stevens are equal to each other. None of them has more than the others; none is owed anything or has anything due.
"The two boys shared equally the money they made delivering pizzas so now they're even stevens."

even a worm will turn
Even someone who never complains will react to an intolerable situation.
"If he continues to treat his wife badly, she'll leave him - even a worm will turn."

every dog has its day
This expression means that everyone can be successful at something at some time in their life.
"I didn't win this time, but I'll be lucky one day. Every dog has its day!"

every nook and cranny
Every nook and cranny means every possible part of a place.
"She searched every nook and cranny of the old town looking for antiques."

every Tom, Dick and Harry
This expression means everyone or everybody.
"Every Tom, Dick and Harry has a credit card nowadays!"

a necessary evil
If you say that something is a necessary evil, you don't like it but you understand that it has to exist and be accepted.
"Vaccinations are a necessary evil if you want to travel."

exception proves the rule
If something is different from a general belief or theory, it shows that the belief or theory is true.
"Most teenagers love fast food, but Ben is the exception that proves the rule - he's the only one of our children who insists on healthy food!"

excuse my French
This expression is used as an apology for using crude or offensive language.
"He's a bloody nuisance, if you'll excuse my French."

explore all avenues
If you explore all avenues, you try out every possibility in order to obtain a result or find a solution.
"We can't say it's impossible until we've explored all avenues."

the apple of your eye
A person, usually a child, who is the apple of your eye is one for whom you have great affection.
"My grandson is the apple of my eye."

eye of the storm
A person or organisation who is in the eye of the storm is deeply involved in a difficult situation which affects a lot of people.
"The Prime Minister was often in the eye of the storm during the debate on the tax reform."

in the eye of the storm
A person or organisation who is in the eye of the storm is deeply involved in a difficult situation which affects a lot of people.
"The minister was often in the eye of the storm during the debate on the war in Syria."

one in the eye
If an event or development is an unexpected disappointment or defeat for someone, you can say that it is one in the eye for that person.
"My promotion was one in the eye for my ambitious colleague."

more (to it) than meets the eye
This expression means that something is more complicated or more interesting than it first appears.
"They say it's just a disagreement, but we think there's more to it than meets the eye."

eagle eyes
Someone who has eagle eyes see or notices things more easily than others.
"Tony will help us find it - he's got eagle eyes!"

eyes in the back of one's head
If someone has eyes in the back of their head, they are very observant and notice everything happening around them.
"You need eyes in the back of your head to look after young children."

before your very eyes
If someone does something before your very eyes, they do it in front of you, without attempting to hide what they are doing.
"Before my very eyes, he took the rubbish and threw it into the neighbour's garden!"

cry one's eyes out
If you cry your eyes out, you cry a lot and for a long time.
"My son cried his eyes out when he discovered his bike had been stolen."

eyes like a hawk
If you've got eyes like a hawk, you have good eyesight and notice every detail.
"Of course Dad will notice the scratch on his car - he's got eyes like a hawk."

keep your eyes peeled
To keep one's eyes peeled means to watch out very carefully for something.
"I mislaid my wedding ring at home, so I asked my children to keep their eyes peeled."

with your eyes (wide) open
If you do somethingwith your eyes open, you are fully aware of what you are doing.
"I took on the job with my eyes wide open so I'm not complaining"

eyes on stalks
If your eyes are on stalks when you look at something, they are wide open with surprise or amazement.
"The child's eyes were on stalks as he watch the magician's performance."

(put on) a brave face/a bold face
If you put on a brave or bold face, you pretend that something upsetting or worrying is not as unpleasant as it really is.
"When Tom lost his job, he put on a brave face and announced that he would find a new job easily."

face like a bulldog chewing a wasp
To say that someone has a face like a bulldog chewing a wasp means that you find them very unattractive because they have a screwed-up ugly expression on their face.
"Not only was he rude but he had a face like a bulldog chewing a wasp!"

face like thunder
If someone has a face like thunder, they look very angry.
"When Dad is really angry, he has a face like thunder!"

face like a wet week-end
If someone has a face like a wet week-end, they look sad and miserable.
"What's the matter with Pete? He's got a face like a wet week-end!"

face only a mother could love
This is a humorous way of saying that someone is ugly or unattractive.
"The poor guy has a face only a mother could love."

face that would stop a clock
Someone who has a face that would stop a clock has a shockingly unattractive face.
"You'll recognize him - he's tall and thin, with a face that would stop a clock!"

face your demons
If you face your demons, you have the courage to confront your fears or some cause of anguish that you normally try to avoid.
"Sam has a problem with alcohol. He will either have to face his demons at the office party, or simply not go."

face the music
If you have to face the music, you have to accept the unpleasant consequences of your actions.
"He was caught stealing. Now he has to face the music."

face value
If you take something at its face value, you assume that it is genuinely what it appears to be.
"The car seems to be in good condition, but don't take it at its face value; get a mechanic to check it out."

facelift (give something a facelift)
If you give something a facelift (a building, a room, offices, etc.) you so something to improve the appearance.
"Weâ€™ve given our living-room a facelift â€“â€“ new sofa, new curtains and new flooring. The improvement is amazing!"

lose face
In a situation where you lose face, you feel that you are humiliated or are not respected.
"We must reach a satisfactory compromise and make sure that neither party loses face."

poker face
If you have a poker face, you show no emotion at all.
"All during the trial the criminal kept a poker face."

straight face
If you keep a straight face, you look serious although you really want to laugh.
"Our teacher was dressed so strangely that it was hard to keep a straight face!"

fact of the matter is
This expression is used to emphasise the reality of a situation, or what is really true.
"His mother thinks Sammy needs help with his homework, but the fact of the matter is : Sammy is just lazy!"

facts speak for themselves
When the facts of a situation are so clear that no further explanation or extra details are necessary, the facts speak for themselves.
"No need to tell you that the situation is disastrous. The facts speak for themselves."

fair and square
If something is obtained or won fair and square, it is done in an honest and open manner, the rules are respected and there is no cheating or lying.
"Gavin won the competition fair and square - there was no doubt about the result."

fair hearing
When accused of wrongdoing, if someone gets a fair hearing, they get an opportunity to present evidence or give their side of the story, usually in court.
"I can guarantee that you will get a fair hearing."

fair-weather friend
Someone who acts as a friend when times are good, and is not there when you are in trouble, is called a fair-weather friend.
"I thought I could count on Bill, but I've discovered he's just a fair-weather friend."

fait accompli
The French expression 'fait accompli' refers to something that has been done and cannot be changed.
"He used his savings to buy a motorbike and then presented his parents with a fait accompli."

fall at first hurdle
If you fall at the first hurdle, you fail to overcome the first difficulty encountered.
"Scott fell at the first hurdle. He didn't study enough and failed his first exam."

fall between stools
If something falls between two stools, it is neither totally one thing nor another, and is therefore unsatisfactory.
"The book didn't sell because it fell between two stools. It appealed neither to historians nor to the general public."

fall by the wayside
If a plan or project falls by the wayside, it remains unfinished or people stop trying to do it.
"Local residents protested so strongly that plans for a new motorway fell by the wayside."

fall flat
If a joke, a story or a form of entertainment falls flat, it does not amuse people, or fails to have the effect that was intended.
"He made a few attempts at humour during his speech but most of his jokes fell flat."

fall from grace
To say that someone has fallen from grace means that they have done something wrong, immoral or unacceptable, and as a result have lost their good reputation.
"The Finance Minister fell from grace as a result of a sex scandal."

fall into one's lap
If something good falls into your lap, it happens to you without any effort on your part.T
"She's not making much effort to find work. Does she think a job is going to fall into her lap?"

fall into place
When different elements fall into place, they fit well together or become organised so that progress can be achieved in a satisfactory manner.
"The preparatory work was difficult but gradually everything fell into place and the project was finished on time."

fall on deaf ears
If something you say falls on deaf ears, it is either ignored or attracts no attention.
"Her warning about the need to repair the roof fell on deaf ears."

fall on one's sword
If you fall on your sword, you accept the consequences of an unsuccessful or wrong action.
"The organiser of the referendum resigned when the poor results were announced. It was said that he 'fell on his sword'."

fall off the back of a lorry
Goods that have fallen off the back of a lorry are stolen goods.
"Judging by the price of that camera, it must have fallen off the back of a lorry!"

fall over backwards
If you fall over backwards to accomplish something, you do everything you possibly can to please and impress.
"Sally's mother fell over backwards to make her wedding reception a memorable event."

fall short
If something proves inadequate or insufficient, or does not reach the required standard, it falls short of what is expected.
"Sales of the new product fell short of the company's expectations."

false move
In a dangerous or risky situation, if you make a false move, you
do something which may have unpleasant consequences.
"He is under close surveillance. If he makes one false move he'll be arrested."

false pretences
If you obtain something under false pretences, you deceive others by lying about your identity, qualifications, financial or social position, in order to get what you want.
"The journalist obtained the interview under false pretences."

take a fancy to
If you take a fancy to someone or something, you develop a fondness for them or begin to like them.
"I think Paul has taken a fancy to the new intern!"

far from me be it
This expression means that the speaker does not feel in a position to say or do something.
(Usually said before giving advice or expressing an opinion.)
"Far be it from me to chose your friends, but I think you should avoid that man."

farm something out
If something, such as work, is farmed out, it is sent away to be done by others.
"We farmed out the packaging to another company."

fast and furious
If an activity is fast and furious, it is done quickly and with a lot of energy.
"Eager to win the race, the competitors came fast and furious around the bend."

fast talker
A person who speaks quickly and easily but cannot always be trusted is called a fast talker.
"The salesman was a fast talker who persuaded the old lady to buy a new washing machine."

fast track something
If you decide to fast track something, such as a task or project, you give it high priority so that the objective is reached as quickly as possible.
"In view of the number of homeless, it was decided to fast track the construction of low-cost housing."

fat cat
To refer to a rich and powerful person as a fat cat means that you disapprove of the way they use their money or power.
"The place was full of fat cats on their big yachts."

fat chance
The expression fat chance is used to indicate that something is not very likely to happen.
"The boss is thinking of me for the job? Fat chance!"

the fat hits the fire
When trouble breaks out, or a situation deteriorates as a result of something said or done, it is said that the fat hits the fire.
"The situation was already tense, but the fat hit the fire when Larry was accused of cheating."

to a fault
To say that someone has a good quality to a fault means that they have a lot, or even too much, of that quality.
"My aunt is generous to a fault, always ready to help anyone who claims to be in need."

feast your eyes
If you feast your eyes on something, you are delighted and gratified by what you see.
"As he drove along the coast, he feasted his eyes on the beautiful scenery."

feather in your cap
To describe someone's achievement as a feather in their cap means that it is something they can be proud of or something that may serve as an advantage.
"The overwhelming victory of the team was a feather in the cap for the new coach."

feather your nest
To say of someone that they are feathering their nest means that they are taking advantage of their position in order to obtain money and enjoy a comfortable life.
"Some people think that government officials use their position to feather their own nest."

knock down with a feather
To say 'you could have knocked me down with a feather' emphasizes the fact that you were extremely surprised.
"When I heard the name of the winner, you could have knocked me down with a feather!"

feed someone a line
If you feed someone a line, you tell them something that may not be quite true, often as an excuse.
"When I asked for a pay increase, the boss fed me a line about the number of contracts that had not been renewed."

feed the kitty
If you feed the kitty, you contribute to a collection of money called a 'kitty' in order to help a good cause.
"Come on! Every little helps. You should feed the kitty for a good cause!"

feeding frenzy
A situation in which a lot of people attack, pursue or compete with each other in an excited or frantic way, because they all want to obtain something, is called a feeding frenzy.
"As soon as the reconstruction plan was announced, there was a feeding frenzy among major companies to obtain contracts."

feel on top of the world
If you feel on top of the world, you feel wonderful or ecstatic about something.
"I've been feeling on top of the world since I got the results - I'm qualified!"

feel the pinch
When someone feels the pinch, they begin to suffer from a lack of money.
"With the drop in tourism, hotels and restaurants are beginning to feel the pinch."

feet of clay
If someone who is admired is found to have a weakness, fault or defect of character, they are said to have feet of clay.
"No one is perfect. Many successful people have feet of clay."

back on your feet
If you are back on your feet, after an illness or an accident, you are physically healthy again.
"My grandmother had a bad 'flu, but she's back on her feet again."

drag one's feet
If you say that a person is dragging their feet, you think they are unnecessarily delaying a decision which is important to you.
"The government is dragging it's feet on measures to reduce pollution."

find one's feet
To say that someone in a new position is finding their feet means that they are learning what to do and gaining self-confidence.
"Our new trainee is beginning to find his feet."

get cold feet
If you get cold feet about something, you begin to hesitate about doing it; you are no longer sure whether you want to do it or not.
"I wanted to enter the competition but at the last minute I got cold feet."

itchy feet
A person who has itchy feet is someone who finds it difficult to stay in one place and likes to move often and discover new places.
"Scott never stays long anywhere. He's got itchy feet!"

keep one's feet on the ground
A person who keeps their feet on the ground continues to act in a sensible and practical way, even if they become successful.
"Success hasn't changed him. He has always kept his feet on the ground."

rushed off your feet
If you are rushed off your feet, you are extremely busy.
"I'd love to have lunch with you but I'm rushed off my feet at work!"

think on one's feet
A person who thinks on their feet is capable of making good decisions without previous thinking or planning.
"Good lawyers need to be able to think on their feet when pleading a case."

(have) two left feet
If you have two left feet, you are clumsy or awkward in your movements.
"I'm afraid I'm a bad dancer! I've got two left feet!"

on the fence
When faced with a choice, a person who is on the fence has not yet reached a decision.
"The candidates have such similar ideas that many electors are still on the fence."

fender bender
This expression refers to a minor car accident in which there is little damage and no injuries.
"I can't believe that a small fender bender can cause a major traffic jam!"

fever pitch
If a situation or feeling reaches fever pitch, it becomes very intense and exciting.
"Reaction to the affair has reached fever pitch all over the country."

few and far between
Items, places or events which are few and far between are rarely found or do not happen very often.
"Restaurants in this part of the country are few and far between."

play second fiddle
If you play second fiddle to someone, you accept to be second in importance to that person, or have a lower position.
"John resented having to play second fiddle to the sales manager when the company was restructured."

fiddling while Rome burns
To say that someone is fiddling while Rome burns means that they are doing unimportant things while there are serious problems to be dealt with.
"His visit to the trade fair was 'fiddling while Rome burns' according to the strikers."

field day
A field dayrefers to a day or period of great excitement and activity.
"Journalists will have a field day with the latest political scandal."

fifth wheel
This expression refers to a person who find themselves in a situation where their presence is unnecessary and as a result they feel useless.
"Everyone seemed to have a specific role except me. I felt like a fifth wheel"

fight (or argue) like cat and dog
Two people who fight or argue like cat and dog frequently have violent arguments, even though they are fond of each other.
"They fight like cat and dog but they're still together after 30 years."

can't fight the city hall
This expression means that it is useless to try to win a battle against a politician, establishment or bureaucracy ingeneral.
"Brian decided it was a waste of energy trying to obtain a tax refund - you can't fight the city hall."

fight a losing battle
If someone is fighting a losing battle, they are trying to do something even when there is little chance of succeeding.
"The headmaster is fighting a losing battle trying to ban mobile phones at school."

fight shy (of something)
If you fight shy of something, such as a task, a problem or a duty, you want to avoid doing it or you are unwilling to confront it.
"He had money problems for years but he fought shy of asking his children for help."

fight tooth and nail
If you fight tooth and nail for something, you fight with energy and determination.
"The Transport Minister fought tooth and nail to have the proposed road safety law accepted."

fight an uphill battle
A person who fights an uphill battle has to struggle against very unfavourable circumstances.
"After the terrible accident, he had to fight an uphill battle all the way to recovery."

figment of one's imagination
A figment of one's imagination is an appearance, event or incident that is not considered to be real but only imaginary.
"Other people saw the car, so it's not a figment of my imagination!"

down to fine art
When you learn to do something perfectly, you get it down to a fine art.
"Entertaining her husband's business associates is not a problem for Jane; she's got that down to a fine art!"

fine-tooth comb
To go over something with a fine-tooth comb means to examine it closely and thoroughly so as not to miss any details.
"The police are examining the scene of the crime with a fine-tooth comb."

fine tuning
Small changes to something to improve it or make it work better are called fine tuning.
"We are still fine-tuning our new website and appreciate your patience."

a finger in every pie
If someone has a finger in every pie, they are involved in many activities.
"For information about the activities in this town, you should talk to John Brown. He's got a finger in every pie."

put a finger on (something)
If you are able to identify or understand something such as the cause of a problem or the solution to it, you put your finger on it.
"The atmosphere at the meeting was strange, but Marie couldn't put a finger on the cause of it."

keep your finger on the pulse
If you keep your finger on the pulse, constantly aware of the most recent events or developments.
"A successful investor keeps his finger on the pulse of international business."

all fingers and thumbs
If you are all fingers and thumbs, you are awkward and clumsy and do things incorrectly.
"Would you mind wrapping this for me? I'm all fingers and thumbs!"

let slip through your fingers
If you let something slip through your fingers, such as a good opportunity, you fail to obtain it or keep it.
"He should have accepted the job when it was offered. He let the opportunity slip through his fingers."

work your fingers to the bone
A person who works their fingers to the bone is extremely hardworking.
"He deserves his success; he worked his fingers to the bone when he started the business."

five-finger discount
If somebody gets a five-finger discount, they take something without paying; in other words, they steal.
"How could he afford that watch?"
"Who knows - perhaps with a five-finger discount?"

fire away
If you tell someone to fire away, you encourage them to begin to talk or ask questions.
"If you've got any questions, fire away!"

firing line
Someone who is in the firing line is in a position to be criticized because of their responsibilities or the position they hold.
"The managing director of the bank is in the firing line since the fraud was discovered."

first and foremost
This expression is used to state what you consider to be more important than anything else.
"First and foremost I want to thank our hosts for their wonderful reception."

get to / reach first base
When you get to (or reach) first base, you make progress or begin to have success with someone or something.
"If you go to the interview dressed like that, you won't get to first base!"

first come first served
This expression means that there will be no favouritism or preferential treatment. People will be served strictly in the order they arrive.
"Tickets for the match will be sold on a 'first come first served' basis."

(at) first hand
If you experience something yourself directly, without any intermediary, you experience it (at) first hand.
"Getting to see the performance (at) first hand is much better than watching it on television."

first out of the gate
If you are first out of the gate, you are the first to make a start at something that others have also accepted to do.
"Sandra was so enthusiastic about the project that she was first out of the gate."

in the first place
Something that is done or said in the first place is done or said at the start, before anything else.
"Why didn't you tell me he was your boyfriend in the first place?"

(of the) first water
Something that is of the first water is of the finest or most exceptional quality (like being compared to a diamond).
"The violinist gave a performance that was of the first water."

other fish to fry
If you have other fish to fry, you have more important things to do.
"I don't think he'll attend the office party; he's got other fish to fry."

big fish in a small pond
This term refers to an important or highly-ranked person in a small group or organisation.
"He could get a job with a big company but he enjoys being a big fish in a small pond."

(plenty of) other fish in the sea
To say this means that there are many other people just as good as the person mentioned.
"The candidate we selected refused the job? Never mind - there are (plenty of) other fish in the sea!"

like a fish out of water
If you feel like a fish out of water, you feel uncomfortable in unfamiliar surroundings.
"As a non-golfer, I felt like a fish out of water at the clubhouse."

fish in troubled waters
If you fish in troubled waters, you try to gain advantages for yourself from a disturbed state of affairs.
"Between the declaration of independence and the first elections, some people were accused of fishing in troubled waters."

neither fish nor fowl
This expression is used to describe people or things that are difficult to classify, that are neither one thing nor another.
"Medical interns are neither fish nor fowl. They are neither students nor fully qualified practitioners."

fishing expedition
If someone is on a fishing expedition, they are trying to obtain information in any way possible.
"The lunch invitation was clearly a fishing expedition to obtain information about his private life."

fishing for compliments
When someone is obviously waiting for you to say something nice, they are fishing for compliments.
"I know why she invited us to her new house - she's just fishing for compliments."

fits the bill
If someone or something fits the bill, they are exactly right for a particular situation.
"They wanted a quiet place to stay and the country inn fitted the bill."

(as)fit as a fiddle
A person who is as fit as a fiddle is in an excellent state of health or physical condition.
"My grandfather is nearly ninety but he's as fit as a fiddle."

fit like a glove
If something fits like a glove, it fits you perfectly.
"I was lucky! The first skirt I tried on fitted me like a glove!"

(a) fit of pique
Someone who reacts by showing their resentment or annoyance when their pride has been wounded, or they feel insulted, is said
to have a fit of pique.
"She left the table in a fit of pique."

fit for purpose
Something that is suitable for a particular function and is fully operational is said to be fit for purpose.
"The mayor promised that the new leisure centre would be ready on time and fit for purpose."

fit to be tied
If you are fit to be tied, you are extremely irritated, upset or angry.
"Harry was fit to be tied when his dog dug up the flowers he had planted"

in fits and starts
If you do something in fits and starts, you do it in an irregular manner, often stopping and starting again.
"You'll never make progress in English if you work at it in fits and starts."

five o'clock shadow
This expression refers to a patch of stubble on the face of a man who hasn't shaved for at least a day.
"He looked tired and had a five o'clock shadow."

fixed in your ways
People who are fixed in their ways do not want to change their normal way of doing things.
"My grandparents are very fixed in their ways and dislike any changes."

flag of convenience
If a ship, boat or yacht sails under a flag of convenience, it is registered in a foreign country in order to avoid regulations and taxes, and reduce operating costs.

get/take flak
If you get or take flak, you receive severe criticism for something you have done.
"He got a lot of flak for the way he handled the situation."

(a) flash in the pan
If you refer to somebody's success as a flash in the pan, you mean that it is not likely to be repeated.
"The coach hoped that the team's unexpected victory was not just
a flash in the pan."

(a) flea in one's ear
After an attempt at something, if you are sent away with a flea in your ear, you are angrily reprimanded or humiliated.
"When Andy tried to put the blame on Pete, he was sent away with a flea in his ear."

makes your flesh crawl
Something that makes your flesh crawl fills you with disgust or makes you feel very nervous.
"Just talking about snakes makes my flesh crawl!"

no flies on (someone)
To say that there are no flies on someone means that they are quick to understand and cannot be tricked or deceived easily.
"It's better to tell him all the facts. There are no flies on him."

(a) flight of fancy
To refer to an idea or plan as a flight of fancy means that it is very imaginative but not at all practical or sensible.
"Jason often has good ideas but his latest proposal is just a flight of fancy!"

fling yourself into (something)
If you fling yourself into an activity, you do it with a lot of energy and enthusiasm.
"Ever since she flung herself into the anti-pollution campaign, she rarely has a free moment!"

flog a dead horse
To say that someone is flogging a dead horse means that they are wasting time and effort trying to do or achieve something that is not possible.
"Mark is flogging a dead horse trying to get his money reimbursed. The company has gone bankrupt!"

fly by night
A fly-by-nightperson, business or venture is considered untrustworthy because they operate briefly and disappear overnight
"I bought it in one of those fly-by-night stores and now I can't exchange it. The place has closed down."

fly by the seat of your pants
If you fly by the seat of your pants, you do something without any knowledge or experience, using only your instinct and hoping that you will succeed.
"Without any formal training, he decided to fly by the seat of his pants and try his luck in New York."

fly in the face of (something)
If an action or statement flies in the face of something, it is completely opposite to what is usual or expected.
"His style of teaching flies in the face of the school's established methods."

on the fly
If you do something on the fly, you do it quickly, without thinking much about it, while doing something else.
"I'm so busy I usually have lunch on the fly."

(a) fly in the ointment
A fly in the ointment refers to something that prevents a situation from being completely satisfactory.
"Tony's poor English was a fly in the ointment when he applied for the job."

fly off the handle
A person who flies off the handle becomes suddenly very angry.
"Dad flew off the handle when I told him I had damaged his new car."

(a) fly on the wall
A person who watches a situation without being noticed is called a fly on the wall.
"I'd like to be a fly on the wall when the management discusses my project."

it will never fly
To say that something will never fly means that it will not be successful.
"He's got incredible ideas, but the latest one will never fly!"

with flying colours
To achieve something with flying colours means to do it very successfully.
"My daughter passed the entrance exam with flying colours. I'm so proud of her."

(a) flying start
If something gets off to a flying start, it is immediately successful.
"Sales of the book got off to a flying start and exceeded our expectations."

foam at the mouth
Someone who foams at the mouth is extremely angry about something.
"The director was foaming at the mouth when he saw a picture of his children in the newspaper."

follow your nose
If you follow your nose, you go straight ahead. (This expression can also mean to follow your instinct in life.)
"The station is at the end of the road - just follow your nose."

follow in someone's footsteps
If you follow in someone's footsteps, for example a parent, you lead a similar life or do the same job.
"Lily followed in her her mother's footsteps and became a teacher."

follow suit
If you follow suit, you do the same as another person has just done.
"The first robber held up his hands, then the other two followed suit."

food for thought
If something give you food for thought, it makes you think seriously about a particular subject.
"The documentary on poverty in the world really gave me food for thought."

(a) fool's errand
If you go on a fool's errand, you try to do something which is useless, unnecessary or has no chance of success.
"I could see that it was a fool's errand to look for a bank in such an isolated region."

fool's paradise
If someone is living in a fool's paradise, they are in a state of contentment that will not last because their happiness is based on illusion or false hope.
"Lisa is living in a fool's paradise if she thinks her boss is going to marry her."

my foot!
This expression is used to show that you do not believe something that has just been said.
"He said he had a summer home? My foot! I doubt if he owns a tent!"

(a) foot in the door
To say that someone has a foot in the door means that they have a small but successful start in something and will possibly do well in the future.
"With today's unemployment, it is difficult to get a foot in the door in any profession."

foot in the grave
A person who is either very old or very ill and close to death has one foot in the grave.
"It's no use talking to the owner. The poor man has one foot in the grave."

foot in one's mouth
If you put your foot in your mouth, you do or say something that offends, upsets or embarrasses someone else.
"She really put her foot in her mouth when she mentioned the housewarming party - Andy hadn't been invited!"

put one's foot down
To put one's foot down means to exert authority to prevent something from happening.
"The child wanted to sleep on the sofa, but his father put his foot down and made him go to bed."

right/wrong foot
To get off (or start off) on the right/wrong foot means to start a relationship well or badly.
"I was looking forward to working with Anna but we seem to have started off on the wrong foot."

get a foothold
If you get a foothold somewhere, you secure a position for yourself in a business, profession or organisation.
"The contract got the firm a foothold in the local administration."

footloose and fancy free
A person who is footloose and fancy free has few responsibilities or  commitments of any kind and feels free to do as they please.
"John will never get married. He says he prefers to be footloose and fancy free."

for the birds
If you think something is for the birds, you consider it to be uninteresting, useless or not to be taken seriously.
"As far as I'm concerned, his theory is for the birds."

for the time being
If you talk about how a situation is for the time being, you mean that it is temporary and will probably change in the future.
"Laura has left Ben and is living with her parents for the time being."

force of habit
When something is done out of force of habit, it has become automatic through frequent repetition.
"Why do I always park here? Out of force of habit I suppose."

force someone's hand
If you force someone's hand, you make them do something unwillingly or sooner than planned.
"The interviewer forced Brad's hand and made him reveal his relocation plans."

forewarned is forearmed
This expression means that if you know something is going to happen, you can be prepared for it.
"The Chairman is going to attend the meeting tomorrow. Your presentation had better be good. Forewarned is forearmed!"

forty winks
If you have forty winks, you have a short sleep or rest, generally during the day.
"Dad likes to have forty winks after a game of golf."

foul one's own nest
If you act in a way that harms your own interests, your position or your reputation, you foul your own nest.
"He fouled his own nest by wrongly accusing his boss."

on all fours
If you are on all fours, you are down on your hands and knees.
"When I arrived, he was on all fours playing with his grandchildren."

fraught with danger
An activity or situation that is fraught with danger is full of risks or serious difficulties.
"His journey across the mountains was fraught with danger."

(as) free as a bird
If someone is as free as a bird, they are completely at liberty to do as they please.
"My dad's very happy - he's as free as a bird since he retired."

free for all
This term refers to an uncontrolled situation such as a discussion, argument or fight where everyone present can do or say whatever they like.
"It started as a serious debate but turned into a free-for-all."

free hand
If you have a free hand, you have permission to make your own decisions, especially in a job.
"My boss gave me a free hand in the choice of supplier."

free lunch
The expression 'there's no such thing as a free lunch' means that nothing is free. If somebody helps you, they always expect some form of payment in return.
"If you accept his offer, he'll be forever asking you for favours. There's no such thing as a free lunch!"

free ride
Someone who gets a free ride benefits from a collective activity without participating in it.
"Only those who share the work can share the benefits - nobody gets a free ride!"

of your own free will
If you do somethingof your own free will, you do it voluntarily, without any pressure from others.
"He decided to tell the truth, and he did it of his own free will."

freeze someone out
If you deliberately isolate someone or prevent them from participating in a social or business activity by treating them unfairly or harshly, you freeze them out.
"Pablo was treated unfairly. He was frozen out of the project by the rest of the team."

take French leave
If you leave an official or social event without notifying the person who invited you, you take French leave.
"Is Bill coming back for the closing speech or has he taken French leave?"

(as) fresh as a daisy
Someone who is (as) fresh as a daisy is lively and attractive, in a clean and fresh way.
"I met Molly the other day. She looked as fresh as a daisy."

Freudian slip
A Freudian slip is a mistake made by a speaker which is considered to reveal their true thoughts or feelings.
"So you got the job - I'm so sad ...  Sorry, I mean 'glad'!"

friends in high places
If you know important or influential people in business or government, you have friends in high places.
"He wouldn't have succeeded without help from friends in high places."

eat the frog / eat that frog!
This expression is used to encourage someone do the most difficult or most unpleasant task of the day first, before anything else, rather than avoiding or postponing it. In that way nothing worse can happen all day. Original expression:
"If you have to eat a frog, donâ€™t look at it for too long.â€

(have a) frog in one's throat
A person who has a frog in their throat has difficulty in speaking clearly because they have a cough or a sore throat.
"Teaching was difficult today.I had a frog in my throat all morning."

juggle frogs
A person who is juggling frogs is trying to deal with many different tasks at the tame time and finding the situation difficult.
"I've got so many things to do at the moment, I feel like I'm juggling frogs!"

from the word go
The expression 'from the word go' means from the very beginning of an activity.
"Right from the word go he was rejected by the rest of the group."

front runner
In a contest, race or election, the front runner is the person who is most likely to succeed or win.
"Who are the front runners in the coming elections?"

out of the frying pan into the fire
This expression means to go from one difficult situation to another one which is usually even worse.
"The flight was delayed because of snow. When the plane eventually took off, it had to turn back because of engine trouble - out of the frying pan into the fire!"

full of beans
A person who is full of beans is lively, active and healthy.
"He may be getting old but he's still full of beans."

full of hot air
Someone who is full of hot air is full of nonsense and talks a lot without saying anything worthwhile.
"Don't listen to Alex - he's full of hot air!"

full of the joys of spring
If you are full of the joys of spring, you are happy, enthusiastic and full of energy.
"Barbara is full of the joys of spring at the moment! Has she got a new boyfriend?"

full of piss and vinegar
People who are full of piss and vinegar are very lively, boisterous or full of youthful vitality.
"I had to look after a group of kids full of piss and vinegar."

in full swing
When something, such as an event, gets into full swing, it is at its busiest or liveliest time.
"When we got back to the office, the Christmas party was in full swing."

(as) full as a tick
If someone is (as) full as a tick, they have eaten or drunk too much.
"The little boy ate biscuits and drank lemonade until he was as full as a tick."

funny business
A business which is conducted in a deceitful, dishonest or unethical manner is called funny business.
"I've got suspicions about that association. I think they're up to some funny business."

fur coat and no knickers
A person who tries to appear distinguished but has no real class is referred to as 'fur coat and no knickers'.
"Don't let her impress you.; She's what we call 'fur coat and no knickers'"

gift of the gab
To say that somebody has the gift of the gab means that they are able to speak confidently and easily.
"As a politician, not only is he competent, but he has the gift of the gab too!"

game not worth the candle
To say that the game (or the cake) is not worth the candle means that the advantages to be gained from doing something are not worth the effort involved.
"He recorded an album but sold very few copies; the game wasn't worth the candle"

take a gander
If you take or have a gander at something, which is generally new or unusual, you have a look at it or go to check it out.
"Let's take a gander at the new shopping centre. Sally says it's fantastic."

gatecrash
If someone gatecrashes, they attend a private social event without being invited.
"We need volunteers to keep an eye out for gatecrashers tonight."

gather dust
An idea, plan or project which is gathering dust is in fact stagnating or has not attracted attention for some time.
"Just before the elections, the outgoing mayor produced plans for a new bridge which had been gathering dust for several years."

all his geese are swans
This expression refers to someone who constantly exaggerates the importance or the qualities of somebody or something.
"Don't let him impress you. He always exaggerates. All his geese are swans."

gentleman's agreement
When an agreement is neither written nor signed, because the two parties trust each other completely, it is called a gentleman's agreement.
"It was a gentleman's agreement. I can't change my mind now!"

get a grip on yourself
If you get a grip on yourself, you try to control your feelings so as to be able to deal with a situation.
"After the initial shock of the accident, Lisa got a grip on herself and called an ambulance."

get a load of (something)
This slang expression means to pay attention or take notice of something.
"Hey! Get a load of that outfit!"

get a move on
If someone tells you to get a move on, they are asking you to hurry up.
"You'd better get a move on or you'll miss the bus!"

get a raw deal
If you say that someone got a raw deal, you think they were treated unfairly or badly.
"When Gary lost his job after supervising the merger and doing all the extra work involved, he really got a raw deal!"

get away with murder
Someone who gets away with murder can behave badly, or do something that is forbidden, without being punished for it.
"Sally has no control over her kids. They get away with murder."

get your act together
If you get your act together, you organise your affairs better than you have done previously and deal with things more efficiently.
"Jack's plan won't work unless he gets his act together."

get/give the all clear
If you are allowed to do something after a check-up to make sure that everything is all right, you get the all clear.
"Dad says he's going to play golf again as soon as he gets the all clear from his doctor."

get the axe
If someone gets the axe, they lose their job.
"When a company is restructured, the senior staff are often the first to get the axe."

get cold feet
If you get cold feet about something, you begin to hesitate about doing it; you are no longer sure whether you want to do it or not.
"Billy wanted to enter the competition but at the last minute he got cold feet."

get cracking
When you get cracking, you start doing something immediately.
"You'd better get cracking Alex or you'll never get your homework done."

get down to brass tacks
When people get down to brass tacks, they start to discuss the essential aspects of a problem or situation.
"The situation was so serious that after a few polite exchanges they quickly got down to brass tacks."

get it down to a fine art
When, through practice or experience, you learn to do something perfectly, you get it down to a fine art.
"Entertaining her husband's business associates is not a problem for Jane; she's got it down to a fine art!"

get your ducks in a row
If you get your ducks in a row, you get things well organised.
"We need to get our ducks in a row if we want our project to succeed."

get your feet wet
If you get your feet wet, you start to do something new or unfamiliar or explore new territory for the first time.
"It will be a totally new experience for me but I can't wait to get my feet wet!"

get your fingers burnt
If someone gets their fingers burnt, they suffer as a result of an unsuccessful action and are nervous about trying again.
"He got his fingers burnt so badly in the last elections that he decided to withdraw from politics."

get into gear
When a person or activity gets (or cranks) into gear, they start to work or become effective.
"Immediately after the announcement, a group of protesters got into gear."

get out of hand
mmediately after the announcement, a group of protesters got into gear.
"During the student demonstration, things got out of hand and several shop windows were broken."

get your hands dirty
If you get your hands dirty in your job, you become involved in all aspects of it, including work that is physical, unpleasant or less interesting.
"His willingness to get his hands dirty won the respect and approval of the whole team."

get hold of
If you obtain something, or manage to contact someone, you get hold of them.
"I'd like to contact the owner. Do you know where I can get hold of him?"

get/give the low-down
If you get or give the low-down, you get or give complete information or facts about something.
"I'll call you after the meeting and give you the low-down."

get the message
When you get the message, you understand what someone is trying to tell you even if it is not stated clearly.
"Next time he asks you to replace him, tell him you've got an important appointment - he'll get the message."

get off my back!
If you tell someone to get off your back, you are annoyed and ask them to stop finding faults or criticizing you.
"Get off my back Liz! You've been making comments about my work all day!"

get off the ground
If you get something off the ground, you put it into operation after having organised it.
"After a lot of hard work, we finally got the campaign off the ground."

get off the hook
If you do something wrong and manage to get off the hook, you avoid punishment or blame.
"Barry was questioned by the police but his lawyer managed to get him off the hook."

get on your high horse
If you get on your high horse, you start behaving in a haughty manner, as though you should be treated with more respect.
"He got on his high horse when he was asked to show his membership card."

get on in years
Someone who is getting on in years is growing old.
"My grandmother is getting on in years. She needs help nowadays."

get on like a house on fire
Two people who get on like a house on fire have similar interests and quickly become good friends.
"As soon as Sarah met her brother's girlfriend, they got on like a house on fire."

get one's just deserts
When someone gets their just deserts, they are rewarded or punished according to what they deserve.
"Liz got her just deserts when she was excluded from the committee;
she is totally unreliable."

get a rise out of (someone)
If you make someone react angrily by jokingly saying something that you know will irritate them, you get a rise out of them.
"He gets a rise out of his daughter by asking her about her latest diet."

get a second bite of the cherry
This expression means that you get a second opportunity to do or try something.
"He was eliminated in the semi-finals but he'll get a second bite at the cherry next year."

get someone's drift
If you get someone's drift, you understand in a general way what they are trying to say.
"I didn't understand every word but I got the drift."

get (or have) someone by the short hairs
If you get (or have) someone by the short hairs, you put them in a difficult situation from which they cannot escape, so you have complete control over them.
"They are in no position to refuse; we've got them by the short hairs!"

get someone's goat
Something that get someone's goat annoys or irritates them.
"People who keep pushing when you're standing in line really get my goat!"

get something off the ground
If you , you put it into operation after having organised it.
"After a lot of hard work, we finally got the campaign off the ground."

get something out of your system
This expression means that you get rid of a strong emotion or desire by expressing it openly or trying to fulfill it.
"Tell you parents how you feel - it's better to get it out of your system."

get the better of you
If someone or something gets the better of you, it defeats you.
"She went on a diet but it didn't last long - her love of chocolate got the better of her!"

get (or have) the jitters
If you get or have the jitters, especially before an important event, you become very nervous or anxious and begin to shake.
"Some people get the jitters when they have to make a speech."

get the message
If you get the message, you understand what someone is trying to tell you, even if it is expressed in actions or gestures rather than words.
"When Tony pointed to his watch, I got the message - it was time to leave for the airport."

get the picture
A person who gets the picture understands what is being explained or described.
"The alarm went off and people started running everywhere - you get the picture I'm sure!"

get the sack
If someone gets the sack, they lose their job, usually because they have done something wrong.
"Charlie got the sack when his boss caught him stealing."

get the show on the road
If you manage to put a plan or idea into action, you get the show on the road.
"OK, we've got all we need, so let's get the show on the road."

get your knickers in a twist
If you get your knickers in a twist, you are angry, nervous or upset faced with a difficult situation.
"Don't get your knickers in a twist! Everything is under control."

get your skates on
If you tell someone to get their skates on, you want them to hurry up.
"You'd better get you skates on or you'll be late!"

get to the bottom of (something)
If you get to the bottom of a problem or mystery, you solve it by finding out the true cause of it.
"We have a problem of goods disappearing during transport. Hopefully the investigation will get to the bottom of it."

get wise to something
If you get wise to something, you learn something that you were not aware of before.
"The old lady finally got wise to the fact that children were stealing apples from her garden."

get (or be) worked up
If you get worked up about something, you become upset, annoyed or excited, often unnecessarily.
"It's his first day at school tomorrow and he's all worked up about it"

give the benefit of doubt
If you give someone the benefit of doubt, you choose to believe that they are innocent, honest or telling the truth because there is no evidence to the contrary.
"Although he found it hard to believe the boy's explanation, the teacher decided to give him the benefit of doubt."

give the game away
If you give the game away, you reveal a secret or a plan, often unintentionally.
"The singer hoped nobody in the hotel would recognize him, but an employee gave the game away."

give as good as you get
This expression means that you are prepared to treat people as badly as they treat you, and fight for your beliefs.

(not) give a hang
If you do not give a hang about something, you are totally indifferent to it and do not care at all about it.
"I'm not interested in football so I don't give a hang about which team wins."

give (someone) a hard time
If you give someone a hard time, you annoy them or make things difficult for them.
"Susan says the pupils in her new school are giving her a hard time."

give it a rest
If someone tells you to give it a rest, they are asking you to stop doing something such as complaining or talking continuously.
"All you talk about is politics - give it a rest ... please!"

give the once-over
If you give someone or something a quick visual examination, to see what they are like or to check if everything is all right, you give them the once-over.
"She gave the living-rom a quick once-over before opening the door to her guests."

give a piece of your mind
If you tell someone exactly what you think, in a very angry manner, you give them a piece of your mind.
"Jack was so irritated by his neighbours' behaviour that he decided to give them a piece of his mind."

give the rough edge of your tongue
If you give the (rough) edge of your tongue, you scold someone severely or speak to them very aggressively or rudely.
"My boss was so angry that I really got the rough edge of his tongue."

give (someone) a run for their money
If you give someone a run for their money, you present strong competition in circumstances where the other person expects to win easily.
"We didn't win the match but we gave the other team a run for their money."

give the run-around
If someone gives you the run-around, they deliberately give you confusing information or evasive answers.
"I'm trying to contact the manager, but every time I call the firm I'm given the run-around."

give the shirt off one's back
This expression is used to describe a kind-hearted or generous person who would give you anything he/she owns to help you.
"Mike would give the shirt off his back to help a friend in difficulty."

give the slip
If you give the slip to somebody who is following you, you manage to hide or get away from them.
"The police were on his trail, but he managed to give them the slip."

give a tongue-lashing
When you scold someone severely, you give them a tongue-lashing.
"The teacher gave Jeremy a tongue-lashing when he arrived late for school for the third time."

give up the ghost
If someone or something gives up the ghost, they die or stop working.
"My mother's old TV set has finally given up the ghost. I'm off to buy her a new one"

give or take (a quantity or number)
This term is used when expressing an amount or estimate that is not exactly right.  It means 'plus or minus', 'more or less', or 'approximately'.
"The nearest town is about 100 miles away, give or take a few miles."

gizmo
The term 'gizmo' refers to a gadget or any small technological item which is unusual or novel, and for which the proper term is unknown or forgotten.

glass ceiling
This term refers to a discriminatory barrier perceived by women and minorities that prevents them from rising to positions of power or responsibility.
"Claire knew she would never break the glass ceiling and rise to a senior management position"

(the) gloves are off
This expression is used when there are signs that a fight is about to start.
"The two candidates are out of their seats. The gloves are off!"

glowing terms
If you speak about something in glowing terms, you talk about it in a very positive way.
"Mary talks about her home town in glowing terms; it must be a wonderful place."

glutton for punishment
If you say that someone is a glutton for punishment, you express your surprise that they continue to do something which they find unpleasant or difficult.
"You get seasick but you're going to travel by boat - you're a glutton for punishment!"

gnomes of Zurich
This is a disparaging term for Swiss bankers who control a lot of money, are said to be uninterested in the provenance of funds and protect their clients' identity.
"The gnomes of Zurich refuse to cooperate with the investigating officials."

go against the grain
If something goes against the grain, it is difficult to accept because it is very different from what is considered normal or natural.
"Having to import apples in an apple-growing region really goes against the grain!"

go against the tide
If you go against the tide (or the stream), you refuse to conform to current trends, or the opinions or behaviour of other people.
"Bill can be difficult to work with; he constantly goes against the tide."

go all out
If you go all out to achieve or obtain something, you make a great effort, using all possible strength and resources
"The candidate went all out to obtain the nomination."

go along for the ride
If you join a group of people you find interesting, without wanting to take an active part in their action, you go along for the ride.
"Not all the protesters were active in the movement - some just went along for the ride."

go bananas
If someone becomes very emotional and starts behaving in a crazy way, they go bananas.
"If you announce that you are going to drop out of school, your parents will go bananas!"

go ballistic
When someone goes ballistic, they become very angry.
"My dad went ballistic when he saw the state of the garden after the barbecue."

go belly up
If a business or project goes belly up, it is unsuccessful or goes bankrupt.
"The restaurant went belly up before the end of the first year."

go down in history
This expression refers to an event that is so important or unusual that it will be recorded in history.
"The recent discovery will go down in history"

go down well
If an idea or proposal goes down well, it is well accepted.
"The new timetable went down well with the employees"

go downhill
When something goes downhill, it deteriorates or gets worse little by little.
"His health has been going downhill since the last operation."

go for a song
If something goes for a song, it is sold at an unexpectedly low price.
"I was able to buy the car simply because it was going for a song."

go the extra mile
If you go the extra mile, you do more than what is expected of you.
"You can count on Tom; he's always willing to go the extra mile."

go to extremes
People who go to extremes behave in a way that lacks moderation.
"My parents tend to go to extremes. They live on a tight budget and then they go on expensive holidays."

go with the flow
If you go with the flow, you follow the general tendency and go along with whatever happens.
"When my colleagues organise an office party, I just go with the flow."

go great guns
If someone or something is going great guns, they are doing very well.
"Fred's night club is going great guns. It's becoming hard to get in!"

go to great lengths
When trying to achieve something, if you go to great lengths or great pains, you do everything that is possible in order to succeed.
"The two parties went to great lengths to reach an agreement."

go hand in hand
If two or more things , they are associated or often happen at the same time.
"In big cities, poverty and violence often go hand in hand."

go haywire
If something goes haywire, it becomes disorganised or goes out of control.
"The photocopier has gone completely haywire. It's only printing half of each page!"

go hell for leather
If you , you go somewhere or do something very fast.
"I saw Tom going hell for leather towards the station."

go the whole hog
When you go the whole hog, you do something thoroughly or completely.
"The put up a few decorations for Christmas, then they decided to go the whole hog and buy a tree and all the trimmings."

go into overdrive
If someone or something goes into overdrive, they begin to work very hard or start to perform intensely.
"At the start of every new collection my imagination goes into overdrive."

go nuts
To say that a person has gone nuts means that they have become completely foolish, eccentric or mad.
"I think the old lady has gone nuts! It's very hot today and she's wearing a fur coat!"

go off the deep end
If a person goes off the deep end, they become so angry or upset that they cannot control their emotions.
"Eva will go off the deep end if her kids leave the kitchen in a mess again."

go off the rails
If someone goes off the rails, they go out of control and begin to behave in a manner that is unacceptable to society.
"Given the unstable environment, it's a miracle that none of their children ever went off the rails."

go off on a tangent
If someone goes off on a tangent, they change the subject completely in the middle of a speech or conversation.
"Sometimes when he's teaching, he goes off on a tangent and starts talking about his dog!"

go off with a bang
If something such as an event or performance goes off with a bang, it is very successful.
"The party went off with a bang - everyone enjoyed it."

go out of business
If a shop, firm or enterprise goes out of business, it closes down or goes bankrupt.
"If the new road bypasses the town, a lot of shops will go out of business."

go out of your way
If you go out of your way, you take particular care or make a special effort when doing something.
"Aunt Betty went out of her way to make us feel comfortable."

go out the window
If a quality, principle or opportunity goes out the window, it disappears, is lost or abandoned.
"When the plant closed down, all hopes of finding a job went out the window."

go overboard
If you go overboard, you are over-enthusiastic about something and do too much or behave in an excessive way.
"We need to prepare the dining room for Christmas, but don't go overboard with the decorations."

go pear-shaped
If a plan or project goes pear-shaped, it either goes wrong or it produces an undesirable result.
"Jane organised a treasure hunt in the park for the kids but it all went pear-shaped and everyone was disappointed."

go to pieces
If you go to pieces, for example after a terrible shock, you are so upset or distressed that you cannot lead a normal life.
"Jack nearly went to pieces when his son died in a car crash."

go postal
If someone goes postal, they lose their temper and express their anger in a violent way.
"My parents will go postal when they see the state of the house!"

go to hell in a handcart
If something is going to hell in a handcart, it is in a bad state and continues to deteriorate.
"This used to be a nice place to live but now the area is going to hell in a handcart."

go to rack and ruin
If something goes to rack and ruin, it falls into very bad condition because of lack of care.
"When the factory closed down, the building went to rack and ruin."

go spare
If you go spare you lose your temper completely.
"Lea's dad would go spare if he knew how much she spent in London!"

go through the roof
If someone goes through the roof, they become very angry.
"My father went through the roof when Paul damaged his new car."

go (or be put) through the mill
If you , you experience a very difficult period, or are exposed to rough treatment.
"When I was an intern, I was put through the mill. Nothing went unnoticed."

go through the motions
If someone goes through the motions, they do something because they have to, but without enthusiasm.
"After his wife died, he tried to continue life as before, but he just went through the motions."

go up in smoke
If a plan or project goes up in smoke, it is spoiled, fails, or ends before producing a result.
"When Amy and Tom separated, my mother's dream of a romantic wedding went up in smoke."

(a) going concern
A business or activity that is dynamic and successful is a going concern.
"They opened a coffee shop that is a going concern today."

going places
To say that someone is going places means that they show talent and ability that will no doubt lead to a successful future.
"Even at college it was obvious that Paul was going places."

when the going gets tough
This expression means that when faced with a difficult or dangerous situation, strong people take action in order to solve the problem.
"Tom has a positive attitude. He often says 'when the going gets tough, the tough get going'."

golden handcuffs
The term golden handcuffs refers to a large sum of money or a generous financial arrangement granted to an executive as an incentive to stay in their job, or to ensure long-term cooperation after their departure.

golden handshake
A golden handshake is a generous sum of money given to a person when they leave a company or retire (sometimes given to encourage early retirement).

golden opportunity
A golden opportunity is a favourable time or an excellent occasion which should not be missed.
"An internship in that company would be a golden opportunity for you - it might lead to a permanent job later."

golden parachute
A golden parachute is a clause in an executive's employment contract stating that the executive will receive certain large benefits if their employment is terminated.

golden rule
The most important rule or principle to be remembered when doing something is called the golden rule.
"When travelling abroad, the golden rule is to respect the local customs"

gone with the wind
If something has gone with the wind, it has disappeared forever.
"I lost everything during the crisis. My savings are gone with the wind."

good as gold
A child who is as good as gold is obedient and well-behaved.
"Your children are always as good as gold when I look after them."

good riddance!
This expression is used to express relief at becoming free of an unpleasant or unwanted person or thing.
"Our horrible neighbour has moved house, and all I can say is 'good riddance'!"

good turn
If you do someone a good turn, you act in a helpful way.
"Mike is a great guy - always ready to do a good turn."

good value for money
An article that is good value for money is worth the money spent on it.
"The quality is excellent so it's good value for money."

good walls make good neighbours
This expression means that respecting one another's privacy helps create a good relationship between neighbours.
"We try not to disturb the people next door. Good walls make good neighbours!"

goose pimples
If you have goose pimples, you are cold or so afraid that your skin is temporarily raised into little lumps.
"I was so scared that I had goose pimples all through the film!"

wild goose chase
If someone is sent on a wild goose chase, they waste their time looking for something that there is little chance of finding.
"They tried to find out who sent the anonymous complaint, but it turned out to be a wild goose chase."

play gooseberry
If you play gooseberry, you join or accompany two people who have a romantic relationship and want to be alone.
"They invited me to join them but I didn't want to play gooseberry."

got it made
Someone who has got it made is so happy and successful in life that they have no worries.
"With a happy family life, a new house and a super job, Sam's got it made."

grab a bite to eat
If you grab a bite to eat, you get something to eat quickly.
"We should have time to grab a bite to eat before the show."

grasp at straws
If you are in a desperate situation and you grasp at straws, you try any method, even if it has little chance of success, in an attempt to find a solution.
"In his search for a cure, he turned to a faith healer, knowing that he was grasping at straws."

grass roots
The term grass roots refers to the ordinary people who form the main body of an organisation.

not let the grass grow under your feet
If someone doesnot let the grass grow under their feet, they do not delay in getting something done.
"As soon as he received the permit, he started to build. He never lets the grass grow under his feet!"

(on the) gravy train
If someone is on the gravy train, they have found an easy way to make money, one that requires little effort and is without risk.
"Since the village has become fashionable, he charges for every photograph taken of his house - he's on the gravy train!"

grease somebody's palm
If you accuse someone of greasing somebody's palm, you are accusing them of giving money to someone in order to gain an unfair advantage or to obtain something they want.
"In some countries, it is common practice to grease government officials' palms."

grease the skids
When you grease the skids, you facilitate something or smooth the way for its success.
"Lunch was organised for the delegates before the meeting in order to grease the skids for the negotiations."

green fingers
To have green fingers means to be good at gardening.
"My dad was born with green fingers. He's great with plants."

green light
If you give or get the green light, you give or get a signal or permission to do something.
"We're ready to launch the campaign as soon as we get the green light."

green with envy
Someone who is green with envy is a person who is very envious.
"Dave will be green with envy when he sees Simon's new sports car!"

grey area (US: gray)
To refer to something as a grey area means that it is not clear or easy to define, and is therefore difficult to deal with.
"The law concerning email is still a grey area in some countries."

grey area (US: gray)
To refer to something as a grey area means that it is not clear or easy to define, and is therefore difficult to deal with.
"The law concerning email is still a grey area in some countries."

grey existance
To have a grey existence means to lead a dull, monotonous life.
"I feel sad for the old lady. She seems to have such a grey existence."

grey matter
Grey matter refers to the brain, or the grey colour of brain tissue.
"Try using your grey matter and you might find the answer." said the teacher."

grin and bear it
When faced with a difficult or unpleasant situation, if you say that someone will have to grin and bear it, you mean that they will have to accept it without complaining.
"The only seat available is on a low-cost flight. You'll just have to grin and bear it!"

grin from ear to ear
If somebody grins from ear to ear, they look vey satisfied and happy.
"When we saw Paul grinning from ear to ear, we knew he had passed the exam."

grin like a Cheshire cat
When someone has a smile on their face because they are happy or satisfied about something, they grin like a Cheshire cat.
"I knew she had obtained what she wanted when I saw her with a grin like a Cheshire cat."

keep your nose to the grindstone
A person who keeps their nose to the grindstone is someone who concentrates on working hard at his/her job, or studies.
"Julia was so determined to get into the college of her choice that she kept her nose to the grindstone all year."

grit your teeth
When you are determined to do something in spite of the difficulties involved, you grit your teeth.
"To reach safety I had to grit my teeth and wade through the mud."

groan inwardly
If you groan inwardly, you feel like expressing despair, disapproval or distress, but you remain silent.
"On his return, when Pete saw the pile of files on his desk, he groaned inwardly."

nurse/bear a grudge
If you nurse/bear a grudge against someone, you have a feeling of resentment or ill-will towards them.
"Ever since I got a promotion, Sam has been holding a grudge against me."

your guess is as good as mine
When talking to another person, 'your guess is as good as mine' means that neither of you knows the answer.
"What happened between Bill and Harry?"  "Your guess is as good as mine!"

guilty pleasure
Enjoying something which is not generally held in high regard, while at the same time feeling a bit guilty about it, is called aguilty pleasure.
"Reading gossip magazines is a guilty pleasure for many womenâ€¦ and some men too!"

guinea pig
People who are used as guinea pigs are people on whom new methods, treatment or ideas are tested.

gut feeling
If you have a gut feeling about something, you have a strong intuition that you cannot explain, but you're sure that you are right.
"As I read the story, I had the gut feeling that the postman was lying ... and I was right!"

gutter press
This term refers to newspapers that print a lot of sensational stories about people's private lives.
"Of course the gutter press was quick to print a sensational version of the incident!"

old habits die hard
This expression means that people are often reluctant to change the way they do something, especially if they have been doing it for a long time.
"My grandfather refuses to use a mobile phone - old habits die hard!"

hair of the dog
Using as a remedy a small amount of what made you ill, for example a drop of alcohol when recovering from drinking too much, is called 'a hair of the dog that bit you'.
"Here, have a drop of this. It's a hair of the dog that bit you!"

hair's breadth
If you avoid or miss something by a hair's breadth, you only just manage to escape from a danger.
"A slate fell off the roof and missed the child by a hair's breadth."

get in someoneâ€™s hair
If you are getting in someone's hair, you are annoying them so much that they can't get on with what they are doing.
"I'd finish the report more quickly if my colleague wasn't getting in my hair all the time."

(not) a hair out of place
If someone does not have a hair out of place, their appearance is perfect.
"Angela is always impeccably dressed - never a hair out of place."

let your hair down
If you suggest that someone should let their hair down, you are telling them to relax and enjoy themselves.
"Come on! We're not in the office now. You can let your hair down!"

tear your hair out
If someone is tearing their hair out, they are extremely agitated or distressed about something.
"I've been tearing my hair out all morning trying to find the error."

split hairs
People who split hairs pay too much attention to differences that are very small or unimportant.
"If we start splitting hairs, we'll never reach an agreement!"

hairy at the heel
A person who is hairy at the heel is thought to be untrustworthy or even dangerous.
"Rumour has it that the owner of the club is a bit hairy at the heel."

hale and hearty
Someone, especially an old person, who is hale and hearty is in excellent health.
"My grandmother is still hale and hearty at the age of ninety."

half the battle
This expression refers to a significant part of the effort or work needed to achieve something.
"We've already obtained a loan for the project - that's half the battle!"

half an eye
If you have or keep half an eye on something, you watch it without giving it your full attention.
"Sarah kept half an eye on the TV screen while she was preparing dinner."

half a mind
If you have half a mind to do something, you are thinking seriously about it but have not yet reached a decision.
"I've half a mind to start up my own business but first I need some advice."

(you don't know the) half of it
This expression is used to tell someone that they know some of the facts but they don't know how bad the situation is.
"You don't know the half of it! He was beating her and terrifying the children. That's why she left him."

hammer home
If you hammer home a point or an argument, you repeat it often to make sure that it is fully understood.
"The police hammered home the dangers of drinking and driving."

(got at it) hammer and tongs
If people are going at it hammer and tongs, they are arguing fiercely, with a lot of energy and noise.
"Our neighbours are going at it hammer and tongs again. They're constantly arguing."

on hand
If something, such as supplies or people, are on hand, they are present or readily available.
"Extra pillows and blankets are on hand if needed."

(go) hand in hand
If two or more things go hand in hand, they are associated or often happen at the same time.
"In big cities, poverty and violence often go hand in hand."

hand in glove
Two or more people who are in collusion, or work in close association, are said to be hand in glove.
"After the match, it was discovered that he was hand in glove with the referee."

hand it to someone
If you hand it to someone, you admit, perhaps unwillingly, that they deserve credit or praise for their achievements.
"You've got to hand it to Sophie. She may be a snob, but her presentations are always excellent."

handed (to someone) on a platter
If someone gets something easily, without having to make an effort to obtain it, it is handed to them on a platter.
"Alex was appointed sales director in his father's company. The job was handed to him on a platter."

get (or gain) the upper hand
If a person or organisation gets or gains the upper hand, they take control over a situation.
"The authorities claim to have gained the upper hand in the fight against drinking and driving."

one hand washes the other (and together they wash the face)
This expression means that when people cooperate and work well together, there is a better chance of a achieving results.

(have your) hands full
If you have your hands full, you are very busy or have a lot to do.
"Jenny has her hands full looking after three young children."

all hands on deck
When there is a need for all hands on deck, everyone must help, especially if there's a lot of work to be done in a short amount of time.
"As the opening day approached, it was all hands on deck to have everything ready in time."

in safe hands
If something is in safe hands, it is being looked after by a reliable person or organisation, and is therefore at no risk.
"I'll look after Jamie while you go shopping.Don' worry - he'll be in safe hands."

show of hands
A show of hands is a method of voting where people give their opinion by raising a hand.
"How many people agree? Could we have a show of hands please?"

have your hands tied
If a person has their hands tied, something such as an agreement or a rule is preventing them from doing what they would like to do.
"Mark deserves to earn more, but the manager's hands are tied by the recent salary agreement."

wash your hands of (something)
If you wash your hands of a problem or situation, you refuse to deal with it any longer.
"You can't just wash your hands of David's behaviour. He's your son!"

handbrake on a canoe
Is something is as much use as a handbrake on a canoe, it is completely useless or serves no purpose.
"With no electricity, a refrigerator would be as much use as a handbrake on a canoe."

handle with kid gloves
If you handle someone with kid gloves, you treat them very carefully or tactfully, either because they are very important or because they are easily upset.
"He is so determined to obtain her agreement that he is handling her with kid gloves."

fly off the handle
A person who flies off the handle becomes suddenly very angry.
"Dad flew off the handle when I told him I had damaged his new car!"

get the hang of (something)
When you get the hang of an activity, you now know how to do it correctly.
"The apprentice found the task difficult at first but he soon got the hang of it."

hang in there
This expression is used to encourage someone to persevere and not give up in spite of the difficult circumstances.
"I know the atmosphere is very tense, but just hang in there and things will eventually calm down."

hang (or hold) on for dear life
If you hang (or hold) on for dear life, you grip something firmly so as not to fall.
"Andy took his mother on the back of his motorbike where she hung on for dear life!"

hang on by the fingernails
When you hang on by the fingernails, you succeed in continuing to do something in a very difficult situation.
"The restaurant is losing more and more customers; the owner is just hanging on by his fingernails."

hang out to dry
If you abandon someone who is in difficulty, without giving any assistance or support, you hang them out to dry.
"You'll get no help from Jack. He'll hang you out to dry if your plan fails."

hang up one's boots
When a sports player hangs up their boots, they stop playing and retire.
(This expression is often used to refer to retirement in general.)
"Dad says he's going to hang up his boots at the end of the year."

have a hangover
To have a hangover means to suffer from the unpleasant after-effects of drinking too much alcohol.
"Many young people have a hangover after a party or celebration."

happy camper
Someone who is ahappy camper is generally content or satisfied with what is happening in their lives and has no complaints.
"With his new job and his new car, Andy is a happy camper."

happy as a flea in a doghouse
If someone is (as) happy as a flea in a doghouse, they are very happy and contented.
"Since she moved to a smaller apartment, my mother is as happy as a flea in a doghouse!"

happy as Larry
If you are (as) happy as Larry, you are very happy indeed.
"My dad's as happy as Larry at the week-end when we all arrive home."

happy-go-lucky
If you are a happy-go-lucky person, you are cheerful and carefree all the time.
"He's a happy-go-lucky sort of guy - always in good humour."

hard and fast
Something which is hard and fast is inflexible or cannot be altered.
"Unfortunately there are no hard and fast rules related to English spelling."

hard of hearing
If someone is hard of hearing, they can't hear very well.
"You'll have to speak louder to Mr. Jones. He's a bit hard of hearing"

hard as nails
A person who is (as) hard as nails is unsentimental and shows no sympathy.
"Don't expect any sympathy from him. He's as hard as nails."

(no) hard feelings
If you have no hard feelings, you feel no resentment or bitterness about something.
"When Alan was promoted instead of Steve, he said to Steve : 'No hard feelings I hope"

hard up
If you are hard up, you have very little money.
"We were so hard up that we had to sleep in the car."

hard time
If you give someone a hard time, you annoy them or make things difficult for them.
"Susan says the pupils in her new school are giving her a hard time."

hard to come by
Something that is hard to come by is rare or difficult to find.
"Experienced carpenters are hard to come by these days."

hard to swallow
When something is difficult to accept or believe, it is hard to swallow.
"She invented an excuse that the teacher found hard to swallow."

run with the hare and hunt with the hounds
If you run with the hare and hunt with the hounds, you want to stay on friendly terms with both sides in a quarrel.
"Bob always wants to keep everyone happy, but he can't run with the hare and hunt with the hounds this time - the issue is too important."

harebrained idea
A is an idea or suggestion that is considered to be silly, foolish or totally impractical.
"We'll never make any progress if you have nothing but harebrained ideas to offer!"

harp on
If you harp on (about) something, you tire others by talking continuously and tediously about it.
"My parents are always harping on about my school results."

hat in the ring
If you throw or toss your hat in the ring, you announce that you are going to enter a competition or take up a challenge.
"He finally threw his hat in the ring and announced that he was going to stand for election."

bury the hatchet
When people who have had a disagreement decide to forget their quarrel and become friends again, theybury the hatchet.
"I don't get on well with my mother-in-law, but to keep my wife happy I decided to bury the hatchet."

haul over the coals
If you haul someone over the coals, you reprimand them harshly because they have done something wrong or incorrectly.
"He was hauled over the coals for the poor quality of his presentation."

have (something) down pat
If you memorise or practise something until you know it perfectly or have it exactly right, you have it down pat.
"I rehearsed my presentation until I had it down pat."

have you gone out of your mind?
If you ask someone if they have gone out of their mind, you think they are crazy, foolish or insane.
"You're going to ask for a 100% increase in salary? Have you gone out of your mind?"

have kittens
To say that you're going to have kittens is a dramatic way of expressing worry, anxiety or fear.
"His mother nearly had kittens when Alex announced that he wanted to be a trapeze artist."

have the makings of
A person who has the makings of something has qualities and potential that could be developed.
"The teacher says Sarah has the makings of an excellent journalist."

make hay while the sun shines
This expression is used as an encouragement to take advantage of a good situation which may not last.
"Successful athletes are advised to make hay while the sun shines."

head and shoulders above
To say that one person is head and shoulders above the others means that they are much better than the rest of them.
"The award winner was head and shoulders above the others."

old head on young shoulders
This expression refers to a child or young person who thinks and expresses themselves like an older more-experienced person.
"When she heard Emily warning her brother to stay out of trouble, her mother thought : "That's an old head on young shoulders."

(bang) head against brick wall
If you bang your head against a brick wall, you continue vainly to try and achieve something in spite of several unsuccessful attempts.
"I've been banging my head against a brick wall trying to explain the internet to my grandmother."

head in the clouds
If you have your head in the clouds, you are so absorbed by your thoughts that you are not paying attention to what is happening around you.
"He doesn't listen to the teacher - he's got his head in the clouds all the time!"

(want someone's) head on a platter
If someone makes you so angry that you want them to be punished, you want their head on a platter.
"He was so angry when he read the article about his family that he wanted the journalist's head on a platter."

(have your) head screwed on
Someone who has their head screwed on is a sensible and realistic person.
"Don't worry about him. He's adventurous but he's got his head screwed on."

(a) head start
If you have a head start, you have an advantage that enables you to make progress more quickly and have a greater chance of success.
"Bringing detailed maps of the area gave us a head start over the others in the treasure hunt."

head over heels in love
When a person falls passionately in love with another, they are said to be head over heels in love.
"Tony's only interest at the moment is Maria. He's head over heels in love with her!"

headless chicken
If a person rushes about like a headless chicken, they act in a disorderly way, without thinking or analyzing the situation carefully.
"As soon as the store opened, my mother started running around like a headless chicken, eager to find bargains."

hear a pin drop
To say that you could hear a pin drop means that it is so silent you could hear the slightest noise.
"People were listening so intently that you could hear a pin drop."

hear through the grapevine
If you hear of something through the grapevine, you learn about it informally, for example through friends or colleagues.
"How did you hear that?" "Oh, through the grapevine as usual!"

heart's content
If you do something to your heart's content, you do it as much and for as long as you want.
"When my parents are away, I can watch television to my heart's content!"

heart in your mouth
A person who has their heart in their mouth feels extremely anxious or nervous faced with a dangerous or unpleasant situation.
"Emma had her heart in her mouth when she saw her two-year-old son standing in front of the open window."

heart in the right place
A person who has their heart in the right place has kind feelings and good intentions, even if the results are not too good.
"The old lady's cake wasn't wonderful but she's got her heart in the right place!"

heart of the matter
The most important part or aspect of a situation is called the heart of the matter.
"We need to get to the heart of the matter - what caused the accident?"

heart on your sleeve
If you wear your heart on your sleeve, you allow others to see your emotions or feelings.
"You could see she was hurt - she wears her heart on her sleeve."

heart of stone
Someone who has aheart of stone is a cold person who shows others no understanding, sympathy or pity.
"She's not the person to go to if you've got problems - she's got a heart of stone!"

heart misses (or skips) a beat
If your heart misses (or skips) a beat, you have sudden feeling of fear or excitement.
"When the lights suddenly went out, my heart missed a beat."

heart set on something
Someone who has their heart set on something wants it very much.
"From an early age Tiger has his heart set on becoming a professional golfer."

heart sinks
If your heart sinks, you feel very unhappy and despondent.
"My heart sank when I saw the amount of work waiting for me."

heat is on
To say that the heat is on means that you are under a lot of pressure to get something done, usually within a time limit.
"The project must be ready for next Friday, so the heat is on."

turn on/up the heat
If you turn on/up the heat on a person or organisation, you put pressure on them in order to obtain what you want.
"If the goods are not delivered this week, we'll have to turn on the heat."

(the) heavens open
When the heavens open, it suddenly starts to rain heavily.
"As soon as the race started, the heavens opened and the runners were soaked."

heavy hand
Dealing with or treating people with a heavy hand means acting with discipline and severity, with little or no sensitivity.
"He ran the juvenile delinquent centre with a heavy hand."

hedge your bets
If you hedge your bets, you choose two or more courses of action in order to reduce the risk of loss or error.
"The company hedged its bets by developing a second line of products."

heebie-jeebies
A state of apprehension, nervousness or anxiety is called the heebie-jeebies.
"Having to go down to the car park at night gives me the heebie-jeebies."

(all) broke loose
To say that (all) hell broke loose means that there was a sudden angry, noisy reaction to something.
"All hell broke loose when it was announced that the plant was going to close down."

(come) hell or high water
If you declare that you will do something come hell or high water, you mean that you will do it in spite of the difficulties involved.
"Come hell or high water I've got to be on time for the interview."

go to hell in a handcart
If someone or something is going to hell in a handcart, their condition is poor and continues to deteriorate.
"This used to be a nice place to live, but now the area is going to hell in a handcart."

hell-bent on something
If you are hell-bent on doing something, you are recklessly determined to do it, even if it is dangerous or stupid.
"Although he is still weak, he's hell-bent on playing the match."

help a lame dog over a stile
If you help a lame dog over a stile, you help someone who is in difficulty or trouble.
"You can trust him - he's always ready to help a lame dog over a stile."

hem and haw
When someone hems and haws, they are very evasive and avoid giving a clear answer.
"Bobby hemmed and hawed when his parents asked him where had spent the night."

herd mentality
People with the herd mentality tend to do what everyone else does, no matter how ridiculous or stupid.
"One example of herd mentality is when people rush to get on the first bus when there are several empty ones waiting. "

herding cats
This expression refers to the difficulty of coordinating a situation which involves people who all want to act independently.
"Trying to arrange an outing for a group of people from different countries is like herding cats!"

here today, gone tomorrow
This is said of something which appears and disappears very quickly, or does not last long.
"The shops in this area change very often - here today, gone tomorrow."

neither here nor there
Something which isneither here nor there is considered to have no effect on the situation.
"OK, he lives close to you, but that's neither here nor there. We're talking about his results!"

hide one's light under a bushel
If you hide your light under a bushel, you are modest or do not reveal a talent, quality or skill you possess.
"So you play the saxophone in a club on Saturday nights - you really hide your light under a bushel, don't you!"

hide (or cover) a multitude of sins
If something hides (or covers) a multitude of sins, it prevents people from seeing the less pleasant reality.
"Loose-fitting clothes can cover a multitude of sins!"

hidden agenda
If a person or organisation has a hidden agenda, they have hidden interests or ulterior motives.
"I can guarantee that we have no hidden agenda. Our intentions have always been clear."

high and dry
If you are left high and dry, you find yourself in a difficult situation without help or resources.
"When her husband walked out on her, Amanda was left high and dry with two kids to raise."

(get on) high horse
If you get on your high horse, you start behaving in a haughty manner, as though you should be treated with more respect.
"He got on his high horse when he was asked to show his membership card."

high and mighty
Someone who is high and mighty behaves in a haughty manner as though they were superior to others.
"Don't get all high and mighty!" said my grandmother to my cousin. "Everyone helps with the housework in this house."

highways and byways
If you travel the highways and byways, you take large and small roads to visit every part of the country.
"He travelled the highways and byways looking for traces of his ancestors."

my way or the highway
It you say to someone 'it's my way or the highway', you are telling that person that either they accept what you propose or they leave the project.
"You don't have much choice when someone says 'it's my way or the highway'."

(up) to the hilt
When someone does something (up) to the hilt, they do it completely, fully or to the maximum degree.
"He was involved in the conspiracy to the hilt."

Himalayan blunder
If you stupidly make a serious mistake or error, you commit a Himalayan blunder.
"Apparently he lost his job because of a Himalayan blunder."

hit and run accident
When the driver of a vehicle hits another vehicle without stopping to provide help, identification or insurance, and fails to report the accident to the police, the collision is called a hit-and-run accident.
"A hit-and-run accident deserves serious punishment."

hit the airwaves
When someone hits the airwaves, they go on radio and/or TV to be interviewed or to promote something.
"The hospital was embarrassed when the patient hit the airways with his side of the story."

hit the dust
The expression hit the dust is a humorous way of referring to death.
"You can have my computer when I hit the dust!"

hit the dust running
If someone hits the ground running, they are ready and eager to start immediately on a new activity.
"He intends to hit the ground running when he starts his new job."

hit the hay (or sack)
When you hit the hay (or hit the sack), you go to bed.
"The boys were so exhausted that they hit the hay as soon as they reached the campsite."

hit the nail on the head
When you hit the nail on the head, you are absolutely right about something or have guessed the exact nature of a problem or situation.
"You hit the nail on the head when you said Mark had money problems. He's lost his job."

hit/strike pay dirt
If you hit pay dirt, you are lucky and suddenly find yourself in a successful money-making situation.
"Charlie finally hit pay dirt with his latent invention."

hit the panic button
When you hit or press the panic button, you raise the alarm too quickly or react too hastily in a difficult or stressful situation.
"Calm down! There's no need to hit the panic button yet!"

hit the road
When you hit the road, you begin a journey.
"It's getting late and we've got a long way to go. Let's hit the road."

hit the spot
If something hits the spot, it is exactly what is needed or wanted.
"On such a hot day, a cool drink would really hit the spot!"

hitch one's wagon to a star
Someone who hitches their wagon to a star has great ambitions and is very determined to reach their goal.
"At an early age she decided to hitch her wagon to a star and become famous."

hive of activity
A place where there are lots of things happening, and everyone is very busy, is called a hive of activity.
"When I went to offer help, the kitchen was already a hive of activity."

go the whole hog
When you go the whole hog, you do something thoroughly or completely.
"They put up a few decorations for Christmas, then they decided to go the whole hog and buy a tree and all the trimmings."

hold all the aces
A person who holds all the aces is in a very strong position because they have more advantages than anyone else.
"Given the high unemployment rates today, employers hold all the aces."

hold your breath
If someone is holding their breath, they are waiting anxiously or excitedly for something to happen or be announced.
"I went for a second interview today - now I'm holding my breath!"

hold (or hang) on for dear life
If you hold (or hang) on for dear life, you grip something firmly so as not to fall.
"Andy took his mother on the back of his motorbike where she held on for dear life!"

hold the field
If something holds the field, it has not been replaced and remains valid or is still in use.
"The founder's management principles still hold the field today."

hold the fort
When you hold the fort, you look after a place or a business in the absence of the person who is normally in charge.
"Rosie, could you hold the fort please while I go to the post office?"

hold good
If something such as a statement, saying or theory holds good, it continues to be true, valid or applicable.
"The author's version of the event still holds good."

hold your horses
If you tell someone to hold their horses, you think they are doing something too fast and should slow down and not rush into further action.
"Hold your horses! We need to get the customer's approval first!"

hold one's own
If you can hold your own, you are well able to defend yourself when under attack.
"We should ask Jane to represent us; she can hold her own in any argument."

hold the reins
The person who holds the reins is someone who is in complete control of a company, firm or organisation.
"He's been holding the reins for over 20 years and intends to continue for as long as possible."

hold your tongue
If you hold your tongue, you remain silent and say nothing.
"Harry was of a different opinion but he decided to hold his tongue."

(not) hold water
If an explanation or argument does not hold water, it does not stand up to critical examination and can be shown to be unfounded.
"The reasons given for the government's new measures just do not hold water."

holier-than-thou
The attitude of people who consider themselves to be more virtuous or morally superior to others can be called 'holier-than-thou'.
"I can't stand the holier-than-thou attitude of some political candidates"

hollow victory
A victory obtained in unsatisfactory conditions, which as a result seems worthless or without significance for the winner, is called a hollow victory.
"Won in the absence of the major ski champions, his gold medal was a hollow victory."

on the home stretch
To say that you are on the home stretch means that you are approaching the end of something such as a task, a race or a journey.
"Don't give up - we're on the home stretch now."

home truths
If you tell somebody some home truths, you tell them some unpleasant facts about themselves which are often difficult to accept.
"David needs to be told some home truths, whether he likes it or not!"

(the) honeymoon is over
To say that the honeymoon is over means that the initial period of friendship and cooperation between people, groups or organisations has ended.
"He was elected only six months ago, but the honeymoon is already over."

honour among thieves
This expression means that even criminals have a sense of loyalty and they respect a certain code of behaviour.
"The bank robber refused to reveal the names of his accomplices which shows that there is honour among thieves."

by hook or by crook
If you say that you will do something by hook or by crook, you mean that you will succeed in doing it in whatever way is necessary, whether it is honest or not.
"I'll get my revenge, by hook or by crook!"

get off the hook
If you do something wrong and manage to get off the hook, you avoid punishment or blame.
"Barry was questioned by the police but his lawyer managed to get him off the hook."

hook, line and sinker
If you fall for a story or an explanation hook, line and sinker, you completely believe it.
"I didn't think he'd believe my story, but he fell for it hook, line and sinker!"

(not) give a hoot
To say that you don't or couldn't give a hoot means that you don't care at all about something.
"She wears eccentric clothes but she couldn't give a hoot about what others think."

hop, skip and a jump
To say that a thing or place is only a hop, skip and a jump away from another means that they are very close to each other.
"The school is just a hop, skip and a jump away from our new house."

hope against hope
If you hope against hope, you continue to hope even when the situation looks bad.
"The whole building was destroyed by fire. John's parents are hoping against hope that he escaped in time."

horns of a dilemma
If you are on the horns of a dilemma, you are faced with a choice between two equally unpleasant options.
"I'm on the horns of a dilemma; I have to choose between a boring job with a good salary or a more interesting job with a lower salary"

horse of a different colour
To describe a person or a problem as a horse of a different colour means either that the person does things differently from others, or that the nature of the problem is entirely different.
"I expected to negotiate with the sales manager, but the chairman turned up - now he's a horse of a different colour!"

horse sense
Someone who has horse sense is a practical thinker who has the ability to make sensible decisions.
"Don't worry. Andrew has good horse sense. He'll do the right thing."

dark horse
If you refer to someone as a dark horse you mean that they are secretive or that little is known about them.
"I can't say I know my neighbour. He's a bit of a dark horse."

could eat a horse
To say that you could eat a horse means that you are very hungry.
"Let's get something to eat. I'm starving. I could eat a horse!"

flog a horse
To say that someone is flogging (or beating) a dead horse means that they are wasting time and effort trying to do or achieve something that is impossible.
"Mark is flogging a dead horse trying to get his money reimbursed.  The company has gone bankrupt."

horses for courses
This expression means that because horses race better on a course that suits them, it is important to match people with suitable jobs or tasks. A person suited to one activity may not be suited to another.
"His experience in sales doesn't necessarily make him ideal for the job. Horses for courses, as the saying goes!"

straight from horse's mouth
If you learn something straight from the horse's mouth, the information is given to you by someone who is directly involved.
"How do you know Sam has resigned?"
"I got it straight from the horse's mouth - Sam told me himself!"

hot off the press
If a news article, for example, is hot off the press, it has just been published and contains the most recent information on the subject.
"I just got it hot off the press; another bank has gone bankrupt."

hot on the trail
If you are hot on the trail of someone or something, you are very close to finding them.
"The police are hot on the trail of the bank robber."

hot under the collar
If you get hot under the collar, you feel annoyed, indignant or embarrassed.
"If anyone questions his proposals, Joe immediately gets hot under the collar."

hot potato
A hot potato is a very sensitive and controversial matter which is difficult to deal with.
"The new Prime Minister hasn't been confronted with any hot potatoes yet."

like a house on fire
Two people who get on like a house on fire have similar interests and quickly become good friends.
"As soon as Sarah met her brother's girlfriend, they got on like a house on fire."

(not) give house room
If you refuse togive house room to someone or something, you do not accept them into your home because you dislike or disapprove of them.
"I wouldn't give house room to that painting - it's grotesque!"

on the house
Something which is on the house is offered free of charge, usually in a bar or restaurant.
"The new owner of the bar offered us a drink on the house."

put (your) house in order
If you tell someone to put their house in order, you are saying that they should organise their own affairs or take care of their own problems before giving advice to other people.
"You should put your house in order before telling me what to do!"

household name
When the name of something becomes very familiar because it is so often used, it is called a household name or word.
"The product was so successful that its name became a household name in no time."

how the other half lives
This expression refers to the way of life of another social group.
"He prefers not to know how the other half lives."

hue and cry
If there is a hue and cry about something, there is loud opposition to it.
"There will no doubt be a great hue and cry when the reorganisation is announced."

hunky-dory
Using the expression 'hunky dory' is an informal way of saying that everything is satisfactory and there are no problems.
"Need any help?"  Everything's hunky dory, thanks."

hustle and bustle
This term refers to busy energetic activity in an atmosphere of general excitement.
"I prefer to live in the country. I hate the hustle and bustle of city life."

break the ice
A person who breaks the ice is someone who does or says something to make people relax in an uncomfortable situation.
"He started by telling a joke to break the ice."

icing on the cake
If something is referred to as icing on the cake, it is an extra benefit that makes a good situation even better.
"Good news! I get the job ... and the icing on the cake is that I get a company car too!"

identity theft
The crime of using another person's personal information (name, credit card number, etc.) without his/her knowledge, to set up and use bank accounts and credit facilities is known as identity theft.

idiot box
Some people consider television to lack educational value and refer to it as the idiot box.
"He spends all his free time in front of the idiot box."

if it ain't broke don't fix it
This expression means that if a system or method works well, you shouldn't change it.
"We're not touching our alarm system. As the saying goes : if it ain't broke, don't fix it!"

if you can't stand the heat (get out of the kitchen)
The expression 'if you can't stand the heat, get out of the kitchen' means that if you feel there is too much pressure, you can leave.
Amid the growing tension the organiser declared : "If you can't stand the heat, get out of the kitchen!"

ignorance is bliss
This means that if you don't know about a problem or unpleasant fact, you won't worry about it.
"I didn't know our neighbour was an escaped prisoner until the police arrived - ignorance is bliss!"

ill-gotten gains
Money, profit or benefits that are made in a dishonest or illegal manner are called ill-gotten gains.
"He won money by cheating and is now enjoying his ill-gotten gains."

industrial strength
This is a humorous way of referring to something which is very strong, powerful or concentrated.
"I've got an industrial-strength headache this morning!"

Infomania
If you are constantly checking and responding to email and text messages, you may be the victim of a recent addiction called infomania.
"The abuse of technology has lead to a state of infomania; employees are becoming addicted to checking email and text messages during meetings."

in cahoots (with)
If one person is in cahoots with another, they are working in close partnership, usually conspiring to do something dishonest.
"There was a rumour that the mayor was in cahoots with a chain of supermarkets."

in a class of one's own
If someone is in a class of their own, they are unequalled and considered better than anyone else of their kind.
"As a singer, Maria Callas was in a class of her own."

in dire straits
If a person or organisation is in dire straits, they are in a very difficult situation.
"The loss of major contracts has put the company in dire straits."

in essence
The term in essence means 'basically', fundamentally' or 'essentially' and refers to the most important or essential facts.
"In essence, lightning is a great big spark of electricity."

in the first place
Someone that is done in the first place is done at the beginning, before anything else.
"Why didn't you tell me in the first place that he was your boyfriend?
It would have saved a lot of embarrassment."

in keeping with
If something is in keeping with, for example, a style or tradition, it is suitable or appropriate in a particular situation.
"We exchange presents at Christmas in keeping with tradition."

in the heat of the moment
If you say or do something in the heat of the moment, you say or do it without pausing to think, at a time when you are experiencing unusually strong emotions such as anger, excitement, etc.
"I was so angry that in the heat of the moment I said things that I later regretted."

in the interim
Something that happens in the interim  takes place during a period of time between two events.
"I won't have the apartment until next month. In the interim I'm staying at a local hotel."

in inverted commas
When describing something, if you use a word which you say is 'in inverted commas', you indicate that the word is not quite true or appropriate.
"We were served a 'meal', in inverted commas, but we were too hungry to complain."

in leaps and bounds
If you do something in leaps and bounds, you make rapid or spectacular progress or growth.
"The number of subscribers to the newsletter has grown in leaps and bounds."

in the long run
The term 'in the long run' refers to something that will have effect over or after a long period of time.
"Learning Chinese is going to be difficult, but it'll be worth it in the long run because it will help me to get a better job."

in the lurch
If something leaves you in the lurch, it leaves you in a difficult or embarrassing situation.
"When Paul missed the last bus, he was left in the lurch."

in the middle of nowhere
If a place is in the middle of nowhere, it is in a remote area, far from towns, villages or houses
"The campsite was in the middle of nowhere so I couldn't send you a postcard."

in mint condition
Something that is in mint condition is in such perfect condition that it looks new or as good as new.
"His father's car is 10 years old but according to Tom it's in mint condition."

in one's own sweet time
If you do something in your own sweet time, you take as long as you please to do it, in spite of the wishes of others.
"OK, I'll do it - but in my own sweet time!"

in over your head
If you are in over your head, you are involved in something that is too difficult for you to handle.
"I accepted to organise the festival, but I quickly realized that I was in over my head."

in raptures
If you are in raptures, you are delighted or very enthusiastic.
"Amanda is in raptures about her new apartment."

in retrospect
The term â€˜in retrospectâ€™ is used when thinking about a past situation or event with the knowledge you have today, particularly if your present opinion is different from the one you had in the past.
"In retrospect, we were not aware of the effects on the environment at that time."

in safe hands
If something is in safe (or good) hands, it is being looked after by a reliable person or organisation and is therefore at no risk.
"I'll look after Jamie while you go shopping. Don't worry, he'll be in safe hands."

in seventh heaven
If you are in seventh heaven, you are extremely happy.
"Every time Julia wins a match, she's in seventh heaven!"

in a stew / get into a stew
When someone is in a stew about something, they are worried and agitated.
"When she was organizing the wedding reception, Laura got into a stew over the seating arrangements. "

in trouble with the law
If someone is in trouble with the law, they are being questioned by the police in connection with something illegal or criminal.
"The suspect has often been in trouble with the law."

in the twinkling of an eye
Something that happens in the twinkling of an eye happens very fast or instantaneously.
"Public opinion can change in the twinkling of an eye."

in two shakes of a lamb's tail
To do something in two shakes of a lamb's tail means to do it very quickly or in a moment.
"I'll be ready in two shakes of a lamb's tail."

in vino veritas
The expression in vino veritas, which in Latin means 'in wine there is truth', is a way of saying that wine makes people less inhibited and leads them to speak more freely and reveal their true feelings.
"After a few drinks he told us the whole story - in vino veritas!"

in words of one syllable
If you explain something in words of one syllable, you use very simple language.
"Not so fast! Say that again in words of one syllable."

ins and outs
The term 'ins and outs' of a situation means all the details or facts.
"I know he was involved in a car accident, but I don't know the ins and outs of his injuries."

add insult to injury
To add insult to injury means to make a bad situation worse by harming or upsetting someone you have already harmed in some other way.
"Not only did he steal money from his best friend, he added insult to injury by damaging his car!"

(an) iron fist/hand in a velvet glove
This expression is used to describe someone who, behind an appearance of gentleness, is inflexible and determined.
"To impose the necessary reforms, the leader used persuasion followed by force - an iron fist in a velvet glove."

(a few/many) irons in the fire
If you have a few, or many, irons in the fire, you are involved in several projects at the same time.
"The travel agency is not his only venture - he's got more than one iron in the fire."

(have) itchy feet
A person who has itchy feet is someone who finds it difficult to stay in one place and likes to travel and discover new places.
"Andrew's got itchy feet again. He says he's going to teach in China for a few years."

itching (or itchy) palm
Someone who has an itching palm is greedy for money, for example tips or commission (as if putting money in the palm of their hand would ease the itch).
"He's said to have an itching palm - he does nothing without payment!"

it's anyone's call
This expression is used when the result of a contest or election is difficult to predict.
"Who do you think will win?"  "I don't know. It's anyone's call."

it's a small world
People say 'it's a small world' when they are surprised to meet someone familiar in an unexpected place.
"Wow!  It's a small world.  I never expected to meet a neighbour on a transatlantic flight!"

it's no use crying over spilt milk
This expression means that it is useless to complain or have regrets about something that is done and cannot be changed.
"Sometimes I regret not accepting the offer, but it's no use crying over spilt milk."

be an item
To say that two people are an item means that they are involved in a romantic relationship.
"So Sally and Harry are an item, are they?"

jack of all trades
A jack of all trades is a person who can do many different things but is not very good at any one of them.
"I'm looking for a skilled worker, not a jack-of-all-trades."

jaw drops
If someone's jaw drops, they show total amazement.
"When the prize was announced, the winner's jaw dropped.

jazz something up
If you jazz something up, you add something to try to improve it or make it more stylish."
"The dress needs a scarf or a necklace to jazz it up."

je ne sais quoi
This expression (in French: 'I don't know what') is used to refer to a good quality that is difficult to describe.
"The place has a certain 'je ne sais quoi' that makes it really attractive."

get the jitters
If you get (or have) the jitters, especially before an important event, you become very nervous or anxious and begin to shake.
"Some people get the jitters when they have to make a speech."

jog someone's memory
When you help someone to remember something they have forgotten, you jog their memory.
"You don't remember who was with us that day? Here's a photograph to jog your memory."

join the club!
By saying to somebody 'join the club!', you express sympathy for an unpleasant experience that you have had too.
"Oh no! My wallet has been stolen." "Mine was stolen last week - join the club!"

(don't) judge by appearances
This expression means that you should not form an opinion based on outward appearances only.
"Sophie looks self-confident but don't judge by appearances. She's actually shy."

juggle frogs
A person who is juggling frogs is trying to deal with many different tasks at the tame time and finding the situation difficult.
"I've got so many things to do at the moment, I feel like I'm juggling frogs!"

juggling act
If you do a juggling act, you try to do different things in a way that is satisfactory for all concerned.
"For many women, managing a career and looking after a family can be quite a juggling act."

jump on bandwagon
If a person or organisation jumps on the bandwagon, they decide to do something when it is already successful or fashionable.
"When organic food became popular, certain stores were quick to jump on the bandwagon and promote it."

jump to conclusions
A person who jumps to conclusions reaches a decision or makes a judgement too fast, before taking the time to check out all the facts.
"We haven't got the full story yet so let's not jump to conclusions."

jump in the deep end
When you jump in (or are thrown in) at the deep end, you do something without any help or preparation, in an area where you have little or no experience.
"Charlie got a job as a salesman, for which he had no training, so he just had to jump in at the deep end."

jump the gun
If you jump the gun, you do something too soon or take premature action based on incomplete information.
"Steve ordered a new car before the job was confirmed - now that's jumping the gun!"

jump for joy
When people jump for joy, they express their happiness through excited movements and gestures.
"The player jumped for joy when he scored the winning goal."

jump the lights
If you continue driving when the traffic lights turn red, you jump the lights.
"It's very dangerous to jump the lights.  No wonder he was stopped by the police."

jump out of one's skin
If you jump out of your skin, you are extremely surprised or shocked.
"Jane nearly jumped out of her skin when the horse put its head through the kitchen window!"

jump down someone's throat
If someone jumps down another person's throat, they suddenly start shouting at them in a very angry manner.
"When I said the instructions were not very clear, she jumped down my throat!"

stay one jump ahead
If you stay one jump ahead, you keep an advantage over others by making sure you are better informed, or taking action before they do.
"He is a successful journalist because he always stays one jump ahead of the others."

(the) jury is still out
To say that the jury is still out means that something is under consideration but no decision has been reached yet.
"The jury is still out as concerns the location of the new station."

just around the corner
If something is just around the corner, it will happen very soon.
"With spring just around the corner, the new collection should begin to sell."

just as well
Something that is a good or lucky thing to happen.
"The picnic was cancelled, which was just as well because it rained all day."

(get your) just desserts
When someone gets their just desserts, they are rewarded or punished according to what they deserve.
"Liz got her just desserts when she was excluded from the committee. She is totally unreliable."

just in time
If you arrive somewhere just in time, you arrive at the last possible moment before it is too late.
"I arrived at the station just in time to catch the train."

just off the boat
A person who is just off the boat is naive and lacks experience.
"How do you expect me to work with a trainee who's just off the boat!"

just one of those things
The expression just one of those things refers to an unexpected occurrence that was unavoidable.
"There was a traffic jam, so I was late for the meeting - it was just one of those things."

just the job
If you describe something as being just the job, you mean that that is well-suited for a specific purpose.
"I don't need a big container. That plastic bag is just the job."

(not) just a pretty face
A person who is not just a pretty face is not only attractive but intelligent or talented as well.
"The candidate was determined to show that she was not just a pretty face".

just saying
The expression just saying is used when you mention something without intending to cause offence.
"Your son is old enough to mow the lawn - just saying...".

just the ticket
If something is just the ticket, it is exactly right, or just what you need.
"I'm not hungry enough for a meal. A bowl of soup would be just the ticket."

just what the doctor ordered
If something is just what the doctor ordered, it is exactly what is needed and will make you feel better.
"A week-end in the sun - just what the doctor ordered!"

poetic justice
Poetic justice is an ideal form of justice in which virtue is rewarded and evil punished, often in a particularly appropriate manner, by an ironic twist of fate.
"It is poetic justice that the country responsible for the ecological disaster should suffer most from its effects."

kangaroo court
A kangaroo court is an illegal tribunal set up by a group of people who have taken the law into their own hands and conduct trials which deny fundamental justice.
"Calm down please! Is this a meeting or a kangaroo court?"

keen as mustard
If someone is as keen as mustard, they are very eager, enthusiastic or motivated.
"We should ask Emily to join our team. She's as keen as mustard."

keep at arm's length
If you keep someone at arm's length, you do not allow yourself to become too friendly with them.
"It's not easy to become friends with Sophie; she tends to keep everyone at arm's length."

keep your back covered
If you do something in case a problem arises later for which you might be blamed, you keep your back covered.
"You'd better make a copy of that letter to keep your back covered."

keep body and soul together
If someone is able to keep body and soul together, they manage to survive.
"Ben was unemployed and homeless, but somehow he managed to keep body and soul together."

keep a civil tongue
People who keep a civil tongue express themselves in polite terms.
"Don't speak so rudely! You must learn to keep a civil tongue in all circumstances."

keep your ear to the ground
If you keep your ear to the ground, you make sure that you are aware of all that is happening and being said.
"We don't know what has been decided, but Jack is keeping his ear to the ground!"

keep one's feet on the ground
A person who keeps their feet on the ground continues to act in a sensible and practical way, even if they become successful.
"Leo's invention was an instant success but he kept his feet on the ground and invested his money very wisely."

keep a finger on the pulse
If you keep a finger on the pulse, you are constantly aware of the most recent events or developments.
"A successful investor keeps his finger on the pulse of international business."

keep your fingers crossed
If you keep your fingers crossed, you hope that something will be successful.
"I'm doing my driving test tomorrow. Keep your fingers crossed for me!"

keep one's head above water
To keep one's head above water means to try to survive by staying out of debt, for example a small business.
"Business has been slow, but we've managed to keep our head above water."

keep a level head
If you keep a level head, you remain calm and sensible no matter how difficult or distressful the situation may be.
"All through the hijacking the pilot kept a level head."

keep the lid on
If you keep the lid on something, you hide it or control it to prevent people from finding out about it.
"The company tried to keep a lid on the negotiations but word got out to the press."

keep a low profile
A person who keeps a low profile tries not to attract public attention.
"The inventor is a discreet man who keeps a low profile."

keep your nose clean
A person who keeps their nose clean behaves well and avoids trouble.
"Joe spent a term in prison a few years ago but he's kept his nose clean ever since."

keep your nose to the grindstone
A person who keeps their nose to the grindstone is someone who concentrates on working or studying hard.
"She was so determined to get into the college of her choice that she kept her nose to the grindstone all year."

keep your options open
When you keep your options open, you postpone making a decision so that you can choose among several possible courses of action.
"The offer sounds good, but keep your options open until you're sure it's the best choice."

keep someone posted
If someone asks you to keep them posted, they want you to keep them informed about a situation.
"Our agent promised to keep us posted on developments in the negotiations."

keep things in proportion
If you react to a situation in a sensible way, without exaggerating the importance or seriousness of the facts, you keep things in proportion.
"Yes, we've got a problem, but let's try to keep things in proportion."

keep your shirt on!
If you tell somebody to keep their shirt on, you are asking them to calm down.
"Keep your shirt on Bob. Just give your version of what happened!"

keep a stiff upper lip
If a person keeps a stiff upper lip, they contain their emotion and do not let other people see their feelings.
"When she heard the bad news, she kept a stiff upper lip."

keep something under your hat
To keep something under one's hat  means to keep a secret.
"My boss has promised me a promotion, but it's not official yet, so keep it under your hat."

keep something under wraps
If something is kept under wraps, it is held secret and not revealed to anyone.
"The plan was kept under wraps until the contract was officially signed."

keep up appearances
A person who keeps up appearances  maintains an outward show of prosperity or well-being in order to hide their difficulties from others.
"Leo continued to keep up appearances even when business was bad."

keep up with Joneses
Someone who tries to keep up with the Joneses  tries to have the same possessions or social achievements as someone else in order to appear equally important.
"First the Browns moved their children to an expensive school. Now the Smiths have done the same. It's silly how some people feel they have to keep up with the Joneses!"

keep the wolf from door
To keep the wolf from the door  you need to have enough money to buy food and other basic essentials in order to survive.
"My grandparents earned barely enough money to keep the wolf from the door."

put the kibosh on
If you do something to prevent a plan or activity from happening or developing, you put the kibosh on it.
"The bank's refusal to grant him a loan put the kibosh on Jack's project."

kick the bucket
The expression kick the bucket  is a lighthearted way of talking about death.
"Hugo will inherit when his grandfather kicks the bucket."

kick up a fuss
A person who kicks up a fuss  creates a disturbance, especially by complaining or protesting about something.
"The service was so slow in the restaurant that several customers began to kick up a fuss."

get a kick out of something
If you get a kick out of something, you feel enjoyment or excitement from something.
"Tania is a bit strange - she gets a kick out of listening to other people's phone messages."

kick yourself
If you feel like kicking yourself, you are angry with yourself for something you have or have not done.
"I could have kicked myself for forgetting Emily's birthday."

a kickback
The term 'kickback' refers to money paid illegally for favourable treatment.
"The property developers were accused of giving kickbacks to the local authorities."

kill two birds with one stone
If you kill two birds with one stone, you succeed in doing two things at the same time.
"By studying on the train on the way home, Claire kills two birds with one stone."

kill with kindness
When you are excessive in your efforts to be helpful or generous, you can harm someone, or kill them with kindness.
"The children are overweight, but their grandmother continues to give them chocolates and cookies - she'll kill them with kindness!"

kindred spirit
People who have a lot in common and share the same beliefs, attitudes and feelings are kindred spirits.
"The immediately felt they were kindred spirits and became close friends."

kiss goodbye to something
If you accept as certain that you will not get something that you want, you kiss (or say) goodbye to it.
"There will be no bonus this year, so I can kiss goodbye to the new car I wanted!"

be on its knees / bring to its knees
When something such as a country or organisation is on its knees, or brought to its knees, it is in a very weak situation.
"The civil war brought the country to its knees."

knee-high to a grasshopper
This term refers to the height of a very young or small child.
"Look how tall you are! Last time I saw you, you were knee-high to a grasshopper!"

(get your) knickers in a twist
If you get your knickers in a twist, you are confused, worried or upset faced with a difficult situation.
"Don't get your knickers in a twist! Everything is under control."

knock sense into someone
When you knock sense into somebody, you use strong words or methods in order to get that person to stop behaving stupidly.
"When Jason announced that he was going to drop out of college, his uncle managed to knock some sense into him."

knock your socks off
If something amazes you, or impresses you greatly, it knocks your socks off.
"The magnitude of the project will knock the socks off everyone in the office."

knock someone down with feather
To say 'you could have knocked me down with a feather' emphasizes the fact that you were extremely surprised.
"When I heard the name of the winner, you could have knocked me down with a feather!"

know better than to do something
If you know better than to do something, you are experienced or wise enough not to do it.
"You should know better than to go sailing in stormy weather."

know the ropes
Someone who knows the ropes is familiar with the way something is done and/or knows how to do it.
"Charlie can fill in for Sam. He knows the ropes."

know someone inside out
If you know someone inside out, you know them very well.
"Sue and Anne have been friends since childhood. They know each other inside out."

know the score
When you know the score, you are well-informed about a situation and know what to expect.
"If Laura damages the car, her dad won't lend it to her again. She knows the score."

know your own mind
If you know your own mind, you know what you want or like, and are capable of making a decision.
"I don't want to influence you. You're old enough to know your own mind."

know something like the back of your hand
If you know something like the back of your hand, you are very familiar with it or know it in detail.
"Of course I won't get lost. I know London like the back of my hand!"

(not) know what hit you
If you don't know what hit you, you are so surprised, shocked or confused by something that you do not know how to react.
"When I was told that I was the winner of the competition, I didn't know what hit me!"

know which side your bread is buttered
If you know which side your bread is buttered, you know where your interests lie or what will be to your advantage.
"Jack never argues with his father-in-law. He knows which side his bread is buttered."

know which way the wind is blowing
This expression means that it is advisable to know how a situation is developing in order to be prepared for any changes.
"Before we decide on anything, we need to know which way the wind is blowing."

knuckle down to something
If someone knuckles down to something, they start to work on it seriously.
"If you want to succeed, you'll have to knuckle down to some serious work."

kowtow to someone
If you are very respectful and submissive, giving way to the wishes of a person or organisation in authority in order to please them, you kowtow to them.
"Mark refused to kowtow to the committee and decided to work as a consultant."

labour of love
A task that is done for your own pleasure and satisfaction and not for reward or profit is called a labour of love.
"Preparing Christmas dinner for the family is what my mother calls a labour of love."

lame duck
A person or organisation in difficulty and unable to manage without help is called a lame duck.
"Some banks have become lame ducks in recent years."

lame excuse
A lame excuse is an explanation which is weak and unconvincing.
"If you're scared to do it, just say so. Don't just invent some lame excuse!"

land of the living
This is a humorous way of saying that someone is still alive.
"Hi there!  We haven't seen you in a long time. Glad to see you're still in the land of the living!"

land on your feet
If you land on your feet, you make a quick recovery after a difficulty such as a business failure, an illness, a loss, etc.
"Don't worry about Bob. He always lands on his feet."

landslide victory
The victory of a candidate or a political party by an overwhelming majority is called a landslide victory.
"Major newspapers predict a landslide victory for the Democratic Party."

larger than life
A person who is larger than life attracts special attention because they are very impressive or unusually remarkable in their appearance, behaviour or personality.
"George was a larger-then-life character, both onstage and behind the scene."

lash out
If you lash out at somebody, you attack them, usually verbally.
"On the ninth hole, Pete suddenly lashed out at Scott and accused him of cheating."

last but not least
When introducing a number of people, this expression is used to assure the audience that the last person mentioned is no less important than those previously named.
"And now, last but not least, here is the final candidate."

last legs
If you are on your last legs, you are in a very weak condition or about to die.
"I was so sick that I felt as though I was on my last legs!"

last thing on one's mind
If you say that something is the last thing on your mind, you mean that it is not an important matter at all, especially when you have more serious problems to consider.
"I'm so busy that food is the last thing on my mind."

last resort
To say that you would so something as a last resort means that it is the last thing you would do if you were desperate and all other courses of action had failed.
"I still haven't found a hotel for the night; I can always sleep in the car as a last resort."

last straw
Something described as the last word is the most recent or most fashionable in its category.
"After a long day of negotiations with the protesters, the traffic jam was the last straw!"

last word
Something described as the last word is the most recent or most fashionable in its category.
"Steve's new computer is the last word in technology."

laugh all the way to the bank
A person who makes a lot of money easily, especially through someone else's stupidity, is said to laugh all the way to the bank.
"If we fail to renew the contract, our competitors will be laughing all the way to the bank."

laugh off
When you laugh about something that has upset or hurt you, to make it seem less important or to try to show that you do not care, you laugh it off.
"Lisa overheard her colleague's critical remark, but she laughed it off."

laugh up your sleeve
If you laugh up your sleeve, you are secretly amused at another person's problems or difficulties.
"Tom felt that his demonstration was confusing and that his colleague was laughing up his sleeve."

laughing stock
A person who does something stupid or ridiculous which causes others to laugh becomes a laughing stock.
"If you wear that to school you'll be the laughing stock of the class!"

law of the jungle
A situation in which people are prepared to use unscrupulous methods in order to succeed or survive is called the law of the jungle.
"Some businesses today seem to be governed by the law of the jungle."

law unto yourself
If someone is , they do things their own way and ignore what is generally considered as acceptable.
"They're against discipline and allow their children complete freedom - they're a law unto themselves."

lay it on the line
If you speak frankly and make something very clear, you lay it on the line.
"The boss laid it on the line and told Jimmy that if he arrived late for work again he would lose his job."

lay down the law
Someone who lays down the law tells people very forcefully and firmly what to do.
"The volunteers helped in a disorganised way. They needed someone to lay down the law."

lead someone up the garden path
If someone leads you up the garden path, they deceive you by making you believe something which is not true.
"I still haven't got the promotion I was promised. I think my boss is leading me up the garden path!"

lead to a dead end
If a plan or project leads to a dead end, it develops no further because it has no future.
"In spite of the scientists' efforts, the research lead to a dead end."

in leaps and bounds
If you do something in leaps and bounds, you make rapid or spectacular progress or growth.
"The number of subscribers to the newsletter has grown in leaps and bounds."

learn the hard way
If you learn the hard way, you learn through your own experience, good and bad, rather than from the advice or guidance of others.
"His refusal to accept any help meant that he had to learn the hard way."

learn the ropes
If you learn the ropes, you learn how to do a particular job correctly.
"He's bright. It won't take him long to learn the ropes."

learning curve
The length of time needed to learn something new is called the learning curve.
"The new system has a long learning curve so we'll have to give the staff time to get used to it."

leave the door open
If you leave the door open, you behave in such a way as to allow the possibility of further action.
"Both parties left the door open for further negotiations."

leave high and dry
If you are left high and dry, you find yourself in a difficult situation without help or resources.
"When her husband walked out on her, Amanda was left high and dry with two kids to raise."

leave no stone unturned
If you try everything possible in order to achieve or to find something, you leave no stone unturned.
"The management left no stone unturned in their efforts to find a solution to the crisis."

leave well alone
If you leave well alone, you decide not to interfere with or change something that is acceptable or adequate.
"It would be hard to get a better deal. Let's just leave well alone."

(be) led by the nose
Someone who is led by the nose is dominated or controlled by a person or group who makes them do exactly what they want.
"Jack has always been led by the nose by his mother."

left hand doesn't know what the right hand is doing
To say that 'the left hand doesn't know what the right hand is doing' means that within a group or organisation, communication is so bad that one person doesn't know what another person is doing.

left hanging in the air
If a problem or issue is left hanging in the air (or in mid-air), no decision has been taken so it remains without a solution.
"No solution was proposed during the meeting so the question was left hanging in the air."

left to your own devices
If you leave someone to their own devices, you leave them to look after themselves, with any help or supervision.
"When left to their own devices, many children watch TV and eat junk food."

pull someone's leg
If you pull someone's leg, you tease them by telling them something that is not true.
"Of course I'm not going to buy a sports car. I was just pulling your leg!"

(hot have) a leg to stand on
To say that someonedoesn't have a leg to stand on means that they can't prove what they say.
"Three people testified against him. He didn't have a leg to stand on."

(buy) a lemon
If you buy something, especially a car, that is defective, unsatisfactory, constantly gives problems or stops running after a short time, you buy a lemon.
"The car I bought was a real lemon. It broke down two weeks later."

lend an ear
If you lend an ear to someone, you listen carefully and sympathetically.
"The best person to talk to is Jenny. She's always ready to lend an ear."

lend oneself to
If you lend yourself to something, you approve of it or become associated with it.
"No decent father would lend himself to violent behaviour."

less is more
This expression, used particularly in architecture and design, conveys the idea that things that are simple in style and smaller in size are better.
"Simplicity is fashionable today. Less is more."

lesser of two evils
If you choose the lesser of two evils, you opt for the less unpleasant of two poor options.
"I didn't want to go. Choosing the train instead of driving was the lesser of two evils; at least I could relax on the way."

let bygones be bygones
If you let bygones be bygones, you decide to forget about past disagreements.
"When Charlie's son was born, he decided to let bygones be bygones and contacted his parents."

let me bounce this off you
You can say this when you present an idea or plan to someone in order to test their reaction or obtain feedback.
"I think I've found a way of making money. Let me bounce this off you."

let the cat out of the bag
If you let the cat out of the bag, you reveal a secret, often unintentionally.
"When the child told her grandmother about the plans for her birthday, she let the cat out of the bag. It was supposed to be a secret!"

let your hair down
If you suggest that someone should let their hair down, you are telling them to relax and enjoy themselves.
"Come on! We're not in the office now. You can let your hair down!"

let off steam
A person who lets off steam releases surplus energy or strong feelings either through intense physical activity or by talking in an unrestrained manner.
"Let's bring the kids to the playground so they can let off steam."

let it ride
When you decide to do nothing about a particular situation and allow it to remain as it is, you let it ride.
"Bill didn't like the way his wife spoke to the operator, but he let it ride because he didn't want another quarrel."

let sleeping dogs lie
If you tell someone to let sleeping dogs lie, you are asking them not to interfere with a situation because they could cause problems.
"Look, they've settled their differences. It's time to let sleeping dogs lie."

let slip through fingers
If you let something slip through your fingers, such as a good opportunity, you fail to obtain it or keep it.
"He should have accepted the job when it was offered. He let the opportunity slip through his fingers."

to the letter
If you follow instructions or directions to the letter, you do exactly as is told or written.
"Although she followed the instructions to the letter, she couldn't get the DVD player to work."

on the level
If you say that someone is on the level, you are referring to a truthful or honest person.
"Tell me straight : Is he on the level or not?"

barefaced liar
Someone who lies easily, with a total lack of shame, is called a barefaced liar.
"That barefaced liar stole my watch and then said that he'd found it!"

licence to print money
An officially authorized activity which enables people to make a lot of money without much effort is called a licence to print money.
"The contract to supply computers to schools was a licence to print money."

lick/smack your lips
A person who is licking (or smacking) their lips is showing that they are excited about something and are eager for it to happen.
"He was licking his lips at the idea of the money he was going to make."

a lick and a promise
If you give something a lick and a promise, you make a quick attempt to clean it, with the intention of doing it more thoroughly later.
"She gave the kitchen a lick and a promise before she ran to catch the bus."

lick into shape
If you make an effort to put someone or something into satisfactory condition or appearance, you lick them into shape.
"I've got to lick this place into shape before my in-laws arrive."

lick someone's boots
To say that one person is licking another's boots means that they are trying to please that person, often in order to obtain something.
"Sam is licking the manager's boots in the hope of obtaining a pay rise."

lick one's wounds
When a person licks their wounds, they try to recover their confidence or spirits after a defeat, failure or disappointment.
"Poor Harry is licking his wounds after being dropped from the team."

keep a lid on
If you keep the lid on something, you hide it or control it to prevent people from finding out about it.
"The company tried to keep a lid on the negotiations but word got out to the press."

lie in
If you lie in, you stay in bed after the normal time for getting up.
"Great! Tomorrow I'm not on duty so I can lie in!"

lie your way in/out (of something)
If you obtain something or get out of a situation by telling lies,
you lie your way in or out of it.
"He lied his way into a well-paid position."

lie through your teeth
If you lie through your teeth, you lie openly and brazenly, knowing that what you are saying is completely false.
"I saw him breaking the window. If he denies it, he'll be lying through his teeth."

white lie
If you tell a white lie, you say something which is not true in order to protect someone or to avoid hurting their feelings.
"Some parents prefer to tell their children a white lie rather than announce bad news."

risk life and limb
If you risk life and limb, you are in danger of death or serious injury.
"The roads are icy today; you'll risk life and limb if you go by car."

life of Riley
A person who lives the life of Riley has a comfortable and enjoyable life, without having to make much effort.
"He married a millionaire, and since then he's been living the life of Riley!"

life is just a bowl of cherries
This expression means that life is pleasant and uncomplicated.
(This phrase is often used ironically to mean the opposite.)
"Now that he's retired, my grandfather says 'life is just a bowl of cherries'."

life and soul of the party
The life and soul of the party is the most lively and amusing person present at an event.
"I'm so glad we invited Emily. She was the life and soul of the party."

(not) lift a finger
Someone who doesnot lift a finger makes no effort to help or provide assistance when it is needed.
"Many people saw the boy falling off his bike but not one of them lifted a finger."

light bulb moment
A light bulb moment is when you have a sudden moment of inspiration, comprehension or realization.
"Danny had a light-bulb moment when he finally realized what was blocking the mechanism."

light at end of tunnel
If you see light at the end of the tunnel, you see signs of hope for the future after a long period of difficulty.
"Sales dropped heavily last year but we're beginning to see light at the end of the tunnel."

make light work
When a person makes light work of something, they do it very easily or with little effort.
"After the party, the boys made light work of the cleaning up. The house was spotless in no time."

light years ahead
If someone or something is light years ahead, they are far more advanced in terms of development or progress.
"We've got to invest more in research - our competitors are light years ahead!"

lights on but no one home
This is a humorous way of referring to someone who is lacking intelligence or sanity, or to someone who is simply preoccupied and not paying attention.
"Forget about Andy today - the lights are on but no one is home!"

see in a new light
If you see something in a new light, you view it in a way that makes you change the opinion you had before.
"After listening to my colleague, I began to see things in a new light."

shed light
If you shed light on something, you help to explain it or make it easier to understand.
"It was hoped that the testimony of the witnesses would shed light on the circumstances of the accident."

out like a light
If a person is out like a light, they are so tired that they fall asleep very quickly.
"As soon as his head touched the pillow, he was out like a light."

like it or lump it!
If you tell someone to like it or lump it, you mean that they will have to accept something even if they don't like it, because the situation is not going to change.
"We're spending a week this summer with your grandparents - like it or lump it!"

(a) likely story
This expression is used to say that you do not believe what has just been said.
"He said he'd found the money on the street - that's a likely story!"

bottom line
If you use the termbottom line in an explanation or discussion , you refer to the most essential point or the conclusion reached.
"The bottom line is that part of the manufacturing will be outsourced."

cross the line
If you cross the line you go beyond the authorized limits by doing something unacceptable.
"He has an unpleasant habit of telling jokes that really cross the line."

line of least resistance
If you opt for the line of least resistance, you choose the easiest way of doing something.
"To make sure the children would stay inside, he chose the line of least resistance and rented a film."

read between the lines
To read between the lines means to understand the real meaning of what is written or said, without need for any further detail.
"Reading between the lines, I'd say that the situation is worse than expected."

lion's share
The lion's share of something is the largest portion, or the best part.
"He left very little money to his children; the lion's share was donated to charity."

pay lip service
If you pay lip service to an idea or cause, you give verbal support or approval, but fail to actually do anything.
"In spite of promising equal pay for women, the management is paying lip service to the promotion of women's rights."

keep a stiff upper lip
If a person keeps a stiff upper lip, they contain their emotion and do not let other people see their feelings.
"When she heard the bad news, she kept a stiff upper lip."

lips are sealed
If you say that your lips are sealed, you promise not to reveal a secret.
"I promise I won't tell anyone. My lips are sealed."

smack or lick your lips
To say that a person is smacking or licking their lips means that they are showing that they are excited about something and are eager for it to happen.
"They were smacking their lips at the idea of the money they were going to make."

lipstick on a pig
This expression means that trying to 'dress up' something unappealing or ugly, in a vain attempt to make it look better, is like putting lipstick on a pig.
"Flowers will not improve that ugly bridge; every one agrees that it's lipstick on a pig."

live a lie
If you spend your life hiding something important about yourself, or inventing something which is not true, you live a lie.
"To hide his humble origins, he told his wife he had no family and spent his life living a lie."

live beyond your means
If someone lives beyond their means, they spend more money than they earn or can afford.
"The cost of living was so much higher in New York that Charlie was soon living beyond his means."

live from hand to mouth
If you live from hand to mouth, you don't have any money to save because whatever you earn is spent on food and other essentials.
"Most families in that area live from  hand to mouth."

live high off the hog
Someone who lives high off the hog has a lot of money and a very comfortable lifestyle.
"Now he's wealthy and living high off the hog."

live in an ivory tower
A person who lives in an ivory tower has a lifestyle that preserves them from the problems and difficulties experienced by others.
"You're completely out of touch - it's time to come out of your ivory tower and see what's going on!"

live in clover
Someone who lives in clover has enough money to lead a very comfortable  life.
"I dream of making an enormous amount of money and living in clover for the rest of my life!"

live on borrowed time
This expression refers to a period of time after an illness or accident which could have caused death.
"After heart surgery, many patients feel that they're living on borrowed time."

live on the breadline
People who live on the breadline have a very low income or barely enough money to survive.
"Due to the recent crisis, there are more people on the breadline than ever before."

live on the edge
If you live on the edge, your lifestyle involves dangerous or risky activities.
"Extreme sportsmen or gamblers are examples of people who live on the edge."

live out of a suitcase
Someone who lives out of a suitcase travels a lot, moving from place to place, and is therefore restricted to the contents of their suitcase.
"Sarah's job involves so much travelling that she lives out of a suitcase."

life of Riley
A person who lives the life of Riley has a comfortable and enjoyable life, without having to make much effort.
"He married a millionaire, and since then he's been living the life of Riley!"

live to fight another day
This expression means that even though you have had a negative experience, you will have another chance in the future to try again.
"He was defeated in the final match but he lived to fight another day."

live to a ripe old age
This expression means to live until you are very old.
"If you lead a healthy life you'll live to a ripe old age." said the doctor.

live to tell the tale
Someone who lives to tell the tale survives a terrible experience.
"Only two members of the expedition lived to tell the tale."

lives up to your reputation
If someone or something lives up to its reputation,  it is as good,
or as bad, as people say.
"The guesthouse lived up to its reputation; the owners were as friendly and hospitable as we had been told."

live wire
Someone who is highly vivacious, energetic and full of enthusiasm is a live wire.
"Things have brightened up since Charlie arrived.  He's a real live wire!"

lo and behold!
This term is used to express surprise, especially at a sudden or unexpected appearance.
"I was watering the flowers when, lo and behold, there was the watch I'd lost!"

load/weight off your mind
If something takesa load off your mind, it brings great relief because a problem has been solved.
"When the company closed down, finding a new job took a load off Tom's mind."

loan shark
A loan shark is a person who lends money at extremely high interest rates to people who are unable to obtain a loan from the bank.
"The young immigrant was beaten because he was late paying back money to a loan shark."

lock horns
If you lock horns with somebody, you argue or fight with them about something.
"If there is another incident like that in the building, the occupants will be locking horns!"

lock, stock and barrel
Lock, stock and barrel means 'everything' or 'every single item'.
"Maggie found the apartment empty. Dave had taken everything - lock, stock and barrel!"

at loggerheads
If you are at loggerheads with a person or organisation, you disagree very strongly with them.
"The management and the trade unions are at loggerheads over the decision to close down the plant."

by a long chalk/shot
This expression means 'not at all' or 'not in any way' or 'not by any means'.
"The matter hasn't been settled yet, not by a long shot!"

long in the tooth
A person who is long in the tooth is a bit too old to do something.
"She's a bit long in the tooth for a cabaret dancer, isn't she?"

long roe to hoe
A difficult task, assignment or undertaking that will take a long time is a long row to hoe.
"Getting through medical school is going to be a long row to hoe."

come a long way
When someone hascome a long way, they have made a lot of progress or have become successful.
"Tony has come a long way since he opened his first little restaurant."

look before you leap
This is something you say when advising someone to think carefully about the possible problems before doing something.
"Don't decide too quickly. Look before you leap!"

look on the bright side
If you look on the bright side, you view a mostly unpleasant situation in a positive and optimistic way and the see the favourable aspects.
"OK. You know nobody. But look on the bright side - you'll make lots of new friends!"

look daggers
Someone who looks daggers at another looks at them very angrily.
"David looked daggers at Paul when he invited his new girlfriend to dance."

look down one's nose
If someone looks down their nose at a person or thing, they consider that person or thing as inferior.
"Intellectuals often look down their noses at amusement parks and such."

look the part
If you look the part, your appearance makes you ideally suited for a particular job or role.
"It was a mistake to choose a pretty young girl to play the witch. She didn't look the part at all."

look the picture
If someone looks the picture, they look very pretty.
"The little girl looked the picture in her new dress."

look the picture of health
To look the picture of health means to look extremely healthy.
"Nice to see you again Mr. Brown. I must say you look the picture of health."

look a sight
If a person looks a sight, their appearance is awful, unsuitable or very untidy.
"She looks a sight in that dress!"

(by the) look of things
This expression is used to express an opinion based on what you actually see.
"I glanced into the kitchen and by the look of things dinner will be late!"

look out for nÂ°1
If you take care of yourself first, and look after your own interests rather than those of other people, you look out for number one.
"Andy's father told him that looking out for number one should be his first priority."

loose cannon
Someone who is referred to as a loose cannon cannot be completely trusted because of unpredictable and irresponsible behaviour which can cause trouble.
"Keep an eye on Jamie. He tends to turn into a loose cannon when he has a few drinks."

loose end
A person who is at a loose end has some spare time, and feels quite bored by having nothing in particular to do.
"When the meeting was cancelled at the last minute, Julie unexpectedly found herself at a loose end."

lose one's marbles
If someone loses their marbles, they become mentally confused, or no longer behave sensibly or rationally.
"The old man is acting very strangely. He seems to have lost his marbles."

lose the plot
If a situation becomes so confusing that you are unable to understand what is happening or what you are supposed to do, you lose the plot.
"His instructions were so long and confusing that I just lost the plot!"

lose your shirt
If you lose your shirt, you lose all your money or possessions, especially as a result of speculation or gambling.
"Our neighbour lost his shirt when the bank went bankrupt."

(not) lose sleep
When something happens that in your opinion is not a cause for worry, you can say that you will not lose (any) sleep over it.
"I've mislaid the book but I'm not going to lose any sleep over it."

lose the thread
If you lose the thread of a conversation or story, you are unable to follow it.
"There were so many interruptions during the film that I completely lost the thread."

lose your touch
If you lose your touch, you no longer have the ability to do something skillfully.
"My mother used to make great cup cakes but she seems to have lost her touch."

lose track of time
When you give all your attention to something and become so engrossed in it that you don't realize what time it is, you lose track of time.
"Whenever I start surfing on the web, I lose track of time."

lose your train of thought
If you forget what you were saying, for example after a disturbance or interruption, you lose your train of thought.
"Now what was I telling you? I'm afraid I've lost my train of thought."

at a loss
If a person is at a loss, they don't know what to say or do in a particular situation.
"Teachers are at a loss to know how to deal with the increasing violence in schools."

lost ball in high weeds
Someone who is totally confused, and doesn't know what they are doing or how to do it, is a lost ball in high weeds.
"The new intern in a lost ball in high weeds - he has no idea now to begin the task he's been given."

love me, love my dog
This expression means that if someone loves you, they must love everything about you, including everyone and everything you love.
"Harry didn't like Sally's best friend, but Sally said : 'love me, love my dog!'"

no love lost
To say that there is no love lost between two people or organisations means that they do not like each other at all.
"There is no love lost between the Conservatives and Democrats."

not for love or money
If you say that you cannot or will not do something for love or money, you mean that you will not do it under any circumstances.
"I would not try bungee jumping for love or money!"

at a low ebb
A person or organisation at a low ebb is not as strong or successful as usual.
"The recent political crisis has left the country at a low ebb."

low-hanging fruit
To refer to something as a low-hanging fruit means that it is a target that can be easily reached, or a goal that can be accomplished with a minimum of effort.
"Teenagers are low-hanging fruit for fashionable mobile devices."

lower than a snake's belly
To say that someone is lower than a snake's belly means that they are bad, dishonest or have very low moral standards.
"Anyone who is capable of taking advantage of young vulnerable children is lower than a snake's belly."

luck of the draw
To refer to something that happens as the luck of the draw means that it is the result of pure chance, with no possibility of choice.
"The samples distributed varied in size and value; it was the luck of the draw."

lull before the storm
A period of unnatural calm before a difficult time or violent activity is called the lull before the storm.
"The sales start on January 1st. The quiet period before that is just the lull before the storm."

lump in your throat
If you have a lump in your throat, you have a tight feeling in your throat because of a strong emotion such as sadness or gratitude.
"The speech was so touching that I had a lump in my throat."

(at the) top of your lungs
If you shout at the top of your lungs, you shout as loudly as you possibly can.
"The place was so noisy that I had to shout at the top of my lungs to be heard."

in the lurch
Someone who is left in the lurch is left in a difficult or embarrassing situation.
"Paul was left in the lurch when he missed the last bus."

mad as a hatter
To say that someone is as mad as a hatter means that they are very strange or insane.
"The old lady next door is as mad as a hatter. She says the strangest things!"

made of money
A person who is made of money is very rich and can buy whatever they want.
"Hey! I can't afford to spend that much. I'm not made of money!"

make an ass of yourself
If you behave so stupidly that you appear ridiculous, you make an ass of yourself.
"Tom made an ass of himself by singing a love song outside Laura's door!"

make a beeline for something
If you make a beeline for something, you hurry directly towards it.
"They were so hot and thirsty after the game that they made a beeline for the cool drinks."

make a big thing of
If you attach a lot of importance to something, or make it a special occasion, you make a big thing of it.
"It's Jack's birthday but he doesn't want to make a big thing of it, so please don't mention it."

make the best of things
If you make the best of things, you react in a positive way to an unsatisfactory situation that you cannot change and do the best you can with it.
"The apartment was badly located, but the rent was low, so they decided to stay there and make the best of things."

make one's blood boil
If something makes your blood boil, it makes you really angry.
"His condescending attitude made my blood boil!

make one's blood run cold
If something makes your blood run cold, it shocks or scares you a lot.
"The look in the prisoner's eye made my blood run cold!"

make no bones about something
If you make no bones about something, you don't hesitate to say something in a frank and open way.
"I made no bones about it. I told Tom his offer was unacceptable."

make or break
Circumstances or events that will make or break someone or something will cause either total success or total ruin.
"We'll see what happens. The assignment will make or break his career."

make cold calls
If you make cold calls, you telephone potential customers from a list of people you do now know.
"In my first job I had to make cold calls using the telephone directory."

make a comeback
When someone makes a comeback, they succeed in returning to their former successful career.
"After devoting several years to her children, she made a comeback on Broadway."

make the cut
If you make the cut, you reach a required standard or succeed in passing from one round of a competition to another.
"After intensive training, Sarah made the cut and joined the team."

make your ears burn
If something makes your ears burn, you are embarrassed by what you hear, especially if the conversation is about you.
"The comments I overheard in the hall made my ears burn."

make ends meet
If you find it difficult to pay for your everyday needs because you have very little money, it is hard for you to make ends meet.
"Anne's salary is so low that she finds hard to make ends meet."

make an exhibition of yourself
When someone behaves in such a foolish way in public that they look ridiculous, they make an exhibition of themselves.
"Get down off the table Fred! You're making an exhibition of yourself!"

make your flesh crawl
Something that makes your flesh (or skin) crawl fills you with disgust or makes you feel very nervous.
"Just talking about snakes makes my flesh crawl!"

make a go of (something)
When you make a go of something, you succeed in your enterprise or produce good results.
"Alex opened a restaurant and worked hard to make a go of it."

make your hair stand on end
If you are absolutely terrified of something, it makes your hair stand on end .
"Just the idea of getting on a plane makes my hair stand on end."

make your hackles rise
If someone or something makes your hackles rise, they make you angry.
"Her constant criticism really makes my hackles rise!"

make hay while the sun shines
This expression is used as an encouragement to take advantage of a good situation which may not last.
"Successful athletes are advised to make hay while the sun shines."

make headway
If you make headway, you make progress in what you are trying to achieve.
"Investigators have made little headway in their search for the causes of the catastrophe."

make inroads
If someone or something makes inroads, for example in a new field or area, they advance successfully or make progress.
"Foreign cars have made inroads into the European market."

make a killing
If you say that someone has made a killing you mean that they have had great financial success.
"Tony made a killing on the stock market."

make light of (something)
If you make light of something, you behave as though it is less serious than it really is.
"He has won several awards for his work but he makes light of it whenever the subject is mentioned."

make light work of
If a person makes light work of something, they do it very easily or with little effort.
"The boys made light work of the cleaning up. The house was spotless in no time."

make mincemeat of
If you make mincemeat of someone or something, you completely and utterly defeat or destroy them.
"A good lawyer would make mincemeat of your rival's accusations."

make a monkey (out) of
If you humiliate someone by making them appear ridiculous or foolish, you make a monkey (out) of that person.
"That's enough teasing.Don't make a monkey out of him."

make a mountain out of a molehill
If someone makes a mountain out of a molehill, they make a small, unimportant problem seem much more serious than it is.
"Stop making mountains out of molehills!  It's not a major problem."

(something) makes your mouth water
Food can make your mouth water when it looks and smells extremely good.
"That delicious smell from the kitchen is making my mouth water."

make no bones about something
If you , you don't hesitate to say what you think in a frank and open way.
"I made no bones about it. I told him his offer was unacceptable."

make nothing of
If you make nothing of something, you attach no importance to it.
"I took him an hour to walk to the station but he made nothing of it."

(can't) make an omelette without breaking eggs
This expression means that it is impossible to make important changes without causing someunpleasant effects.
"Some people will lose their jobs after the merger but you can't make an omelette without breaking eggs."

make a pig of yourself
If you make a pig of yourself, you eat and drink too much.
"Watch what you eat - don't make a pig of yourself!"

make a pig's ear of something
If you make a pig's ear of something, you do a task or a chore very badly or make a complete mess of it.
"Gary offered to paint the kitchen but he made a pig's ear of it."

make a point of (doing something)
If you make a point of doing something, you make an effort to do what you think is the right thing to do.
"The singer made a point of thanking the musicians and the technicians."

make the right noises
If you make the right noises, you behave as if you support or agree with something by making suitable or conventional remarks.
"Sam seemed to approve of the idea; he certainly made all the right noises."

make sense of (something)
If you make sense of something, you understand it or find the meaning.
"I couldn't make sense of the instructions."

make short work of (something)
If you make short work of something, you do it or finish it quickly.
"The players were hungry after the match so they made short work of the food."

make it snappy
If someone tells you to make it snappy, they are asking you very sharply to hurry up or be quick about something.
"Fetch me a bandage and make it snappy!"

make someone see reason
If you make someone see reason, you persuade them to stop acting foolishly and behave more sensibly.
"He wanted to drop out of medical school in his fourth year but his uncle managed to make him see reason."

make a song and dance about something
If someone complains in an annoying way or becomes unnecessarily excited about something unimportant, they make a song and dance about it.
"OK, you don't like carrots. Don't make a song and dance about it!"

make up for lost time
If you make up for lost time, you increase your efforts or work harder to complete something or meet a deadline.
"Progress has stopped because of bad weather, but we are determined to make up for lost time."

make your way to
If you to a destination, you manage to get there without difficulty.
"Don't worry. I'll make my way to your home from the station."

make yourself scarce
If you , you leave a place in order to avoid an embarrassing situation.
"When Mark and Laura started to argue, I decided to make myself scarce."

off the mark
If something is off the mark, it is incorrect or inaccurate.
"His estimation of the cost was completely off the mark."

meet (or find) your match
If you meet or find your match, you encounter someone who is equal to you in skills or abilities.
"Barry is an excellent tennis player, but he met his match in William."

(a) matter of time
If you say that it is only or just a matter of time before (or until) something happens, it is certain to happen or will inevitably take place, although you do not know when.
"Restrictive measures will have to be introduced. It's just a matter of time."

for that matter
This term is used to add something that is also true.
"She refuses to fly, and she won't travel by train either for that matter."

mean business
If someone means business, they are serious about what they announce.
"The boss says that in future any missing material will be reported to the police, and he looks as though he means business."

a taste of your own medicine
If you give someonea taste of their own medicine, you treat them in the same unpleasant way that they have treated you.
"People who always late should be given a taste of their own medicine."

meet halfway
If you meet someone half way, you accept to make a compromise and give them part of what they are trying to obtain.
"We can't agree to all your conditions but we could perhaps agree to meet halfway."

meet your maker
This expression is used to say (often humorously) that someone has died.
"Poor old Mr. Potter has gone to meet his maker."

meet-and-greet
This term refers to a reception (often informal) where a public figure or important person can introduce themselves and talk to the guests.
"The new mayor is going to schedule a meet-and-greet reception for the residents."

megaphone diplomacy
If the media, through press releases, interviews and announcements, is instrumental in facilitating dialogue between two or more countries, this is called megaphone diplomacy.

memory/brain like a sieve
Someone who has a memory (or brain) like a sieve has a very bad memory and forgets things easily.
"Oh, I forgot to buy the bread - I've got a brain like a sieve these days!"

(your) memory serves you well
If your memory serves you well, you remember correctly or you have not forgotten any details.
"You're Stella's daughter, if my memory serves me well."

trip down memory lane
If you take a trip (stroll or walk) down memory lane, you remember pleasant things that happened in the past.
"Every Christmas is a trip down memory lane for the family when our parents take out the photograph albums."

on the mend
Someone who is on the mend is recovering after an illness or injury.
"My grandmother hasn't been very well lately but she's on the mend now."

method in (your) madness
This expression means that someone's behaviour is not as irrational as it seems.
"He's efficient despite his strange way of working; there's method in his madness!"

middle of nowhere
If a place is in the middle of nowhere, it is in a remote area, far from towns, villages or houses.
"The campsite was in the middle of nowhere so I couldn't send you a postcard."

middle of the road (MOR)
This term refers to anything moderate, unadventurous or inoffensive that avoids extremes and appeals to the majority of people.
"He's a successful middle-of-the-road entertainer. My mother wouldn't miss a show!"

smack dab in the middle
If something is smack dab in the middle, it is right in the centre.
"I couldn't hide the stain on my shirt. It was smack dab in the middle."

burn the midnight oil
A person who burns the midnight oil stays up very late at night in order to finish a piece of work.
"Tony is working hard for his exams. He's been burning the midnight oil all week."

might is right
This saying expresses the belief that being the most powerful person or country gives you the right to do whatever you want.
"There are many leaders in the world today who believe that might is right."

(the) milk of human kindness
Someone who has, or is full of, the milk of human kindness, is naturally kind and compassionate to others.
"She's a wonderful person - full of the milk of human kindness."

go/put through the mill
If you go (or are put) through the mill, you experience a very difficult period, or are exposed to rough treatment.
"When I was an intern, I was put through the mill. Nothing went unnoticed."

look or feel like a million dollars
If you look or feel like a million dollars, you look or feel extremely good.
"With a tan and a new hairstyle, Stella looked like a million dollars."

millstone around your neck
Something described as a millstone around your neck refers to a problem or responsibility that becomes a burden and a source of worry.
"The money he borrowed became a millstone around his neck."

(not) mince words
Someone who does not mince their words expresses their opinions, ideas or thoughts very clearly, even if they offend others by doing so.
"Come on John! Tell us what you really think - and don't mince your words."

mind over matter
The mental power to influence one's body and overcome physical difficulties is said to be a question of mind over matter.
"He know he could not be cured, but he managed to live until the baby was born - a case of mind over matter."

(a) mind of your own
If you have a mind of your own, you are capable of forming an opinion and making decisions without being influenced by others.
"The boy doesn't need any advice; he's got a mind of his own."

the mind boggles
The expression 'the mind boggles' is used as a reaction to something that you find amazing or difficult to understand.
"She crossed the Atlantic alone - can you imagine? - the mind boggles!"

cross your mind
If an idea or thought crosses your mind, you suddenly think of it.
"It has just crossed my mind that the shops are closed today."

have you gone out of your mind?
If you ask someone if they have gone out of their mind, you think they are crazy, foolish or insane.
"You're going to ask for a 100% salary increase? Have you gone out of your mind?"

mind your own business!
Telling someone to mind their own business is a (rude) way of saying that they are too interested in what others are doing, or that they are interfering in something that does not concern them.
"Don't tell me what to do - just mind your own business!"

mind/watch your language
This is said to warn someone to be careful what they say so as not to upset or offend anyone.
"Your grandfather doesn't tolerate rudeness, so mind your language when we go to visit him!"

mind your Ps and Qs
If you tell someone to mind their Ps and Qs, you are advising them to be careful about how they behave and what they say.
"Politeness is very important to my grandparents, so mind your Ps and Qs."

in your mind's eye
If you can visualise something, or see an image of it in your mind, you see it in your mind's eye.
"I can see the village in my mind's eye but I can't remember the name."

in two minds
If you are in two minds about something, you have difficulty deciding what to do.
"I'm in two minds about whether or not to accept the offer."

(not) in your right mind
To say that someone is not in their right mind means that they are not behaving in a logical or sensible way.
"Emily wasn't in her right mind the day she bought that outfit. It doesn't suit her at all!"

(have a) one-track mind
If you have a one-track mind, you have a tendency to think about only one subject.
"The boy has a one-track mind; all he thinks about is football!"

speak your mind
If you speak your mind you express your opinion very frankly.
"Harry always speaks his mind but he's not always very diplomatic!"

in mint condition
Something that is in mint condition is in such perfect condition that it looks new or as good as new.
"The car is 10 years old but according to Tom it's in mint condition."

miss the boat
If you miss the boat, you fail to take advantage of an opportunity because you don't act quickly enough.
"I managed to get my order through before the end of the special offer - but I nearly missed the boat!"

miss the point
If you miss the point you fail to understand the essential part of what has been said.
"Sam missed the point. It's not the job that's the problem, it's the amount of work it involves for one person."

(not) miss a trick
If a person nevermisses a trick, they are very alert and aware of everything that is happening around them.
"The old lady next door will know if Bill is there or not - she never misses a trick!"

mix business with pleasure
When people mix business with pleasure, they combine work and leisure or social activities.
"Seminars or training sessions that include leisure activities are a good way of mixing business and pleasure."

mixed blessing
Something pleasant which also has disadvantages is called a mixed blessing.
"He inherited an 18th century mansion but the maintenance costs make it a mixed blessing."

mixed feelings
When you have mixed feelings about something, you react to it with conflicting emotions; you are happy and unhappy at the same time.
"I had mixed feelings about leaving the company. I was excited about my new job but sad to be leaving my colleagues."

moment of truth
A critical or decisive time when you face the reality of a situation, and find out if your efforts have succeeded, is called the moment of truth.
"The moment of truth has arrived - I'm going to serve my first soufflÃ©!"

money burns a hole in your pocket
To say that money burns a hole in somebody's pocket means that they are eager to spend it quickly or extravagantly.
"As soon as Wendy is paid she goes shopping. Money burns a hole in her pocket!"

money to burn
People who have money to burn have so much money that they can spend it on anything they want.
"A leather jacket is no problem for Sarah. She's got money to burn!"

money for jam
A very easy way of earning money is called money for jam.
"All you've got to do is hand out brochures. It's money for jam!"

money for old rope
Money earned from a task that requires very little effort is called money for old rope.
"Getting paid for watering the garden is money for old rope!"

money doesn't grow on trees
To say that money doesn't grow on trees means that it is not plentiful or easily obtained.
"Watch how you spend your pocket money Charlie. Money doesn't grow on trees you know!"

money laundering
When people launder money, they manage to conceal the source of illegally-obtained money so that it is believed to be legitimate.
"Certain countries have been accused of facilitating money laundering."

more money than sense
If you have more money than sense, you have a lot of money which you waste by spending it in a foolish manner.
"He celebrated the birth of the baby by buying a sports car. He's got more money than sense!"

put money where your mouth is
If you put your money where your mouth is, not only do you express your interest, you give financial support to causes that you believe in.
"If people are really interested in helping the underprivileged, they should put their money where their mouth is."

rake in the money
If you rake in the money, you make money in large quantities.
"Bob's business is so successful, he's raking in the money."

see the colour of somebody's money
If you want to see the colour of somebody's money, you want to be sure that the person in question has enough money to pay you before you accept to do something.
"We want to see the colour of his money before shipping the goods."

money spinner
If an activity is amoney spinner, it is a very successful way of making money.
"Washing cars was quite a money spinner when I was a student."

money talks
The expression money talks means that people with a lot of money have power and influence.
"The owner is a millionaire and he's influential - money talks!"

throw money at something
If you throw money at something, you try to solve a problem by spending money on it, without using any other methods.
"The refugee problem cannot be solved just by throwing money at it."

throw good money after bad
Someone who spends additional money on something that was already considered a bad investment is said to throw good money after bad.
"Buying a second-hand computer and then spending money to have it repaired is throwing good money after bad!"

get your money's worth
If you get your money's worth, you receive good value for the amount of money you spend.
"We bought a travel pass to use the public transport system and we really got our money's worth."

monkey business
An activity which is organised in a deceitful or dishonest way is called monkey business.
"The results announced seem suspicious - I think there's some monkey business going on."

(a) month of Sundays
This expression is an amusing way of referring to a very long period of time.
"I haven't been to the theatre in a month of Sundays."

over the moon
If you are over the moon about something, you are very happy about it.
"When she heard the results of the exam, Caroline was over the moon!"

once in a blue moon
Something that happens once in a blue moon happens rarely or hardly ever.
"She doesn't contact us very often. We hear from her once in a blue moon!"

reach for the moon
If you reach for the moon, you are very ambitious and try to achieve something even it it is difficult.
"Jenny is talented and ambitious; she always tends to reach for the moon."

moonlight flit
Someone who does a moonlight flit leaves a place quickly and in secret, usually to avoid paying debts.
"Just before the rent was due he did a moonlight flit."

moot point
A subject which gives rise to argument or debate is called a moot point.
"Whether Bach composed it himself or not is a moot point among musicians."

more by accident than (by) design
Something which happens more by accident than (by) design is done without deliberate intention.
"I became an interpreter more by accident than design; nobody else could speak the language of the refugees."

more fun than a barrel of monkeys
If something is very amusing or enjoyable, you can say that it is more fun than a barrel of monkeys.
"The TV quiz was more fun than a barrel of monkeys!"

more heat than light
If a discussion or debate generates , it causes anger or intense reaction but doesn't clarify anything.
"The meeting that was held to discuss the problem generated more heat than light!"

more than meets the eye
When something is more complicated, difficult or interesting thanit appears, it is said that there is more (to it) than meets the eye.
"He said that he had simply sold his shares, but I think there's more to it than meets the eye."

more power to your elbow
This is said to express praise or encouragement to someone for doing something brave.
"I've left my job and I'm going to work free-lance from now on."
Well, more power to your elbow!"

mouse potato
The term mouse potato refers to a person who spends a lot of time in front of the computer.
"My son and his friends are all mouse potatoes - constantly glued to the computer!"

All mouth and no trousers
This is said of someone who talks a lot about doing something but never actually does it.
"Ben keeps saying he's going to resign and travel around the world, but he's all mouth and no trousers."

butter wouldn't melt in (someone's) mouth
If you say that someone looks as if butter wouldn't melt in their mouth, you mean that they look completely innocent, but that they are capable of doing unpleasant things.
"The boy who stole the purse looked as if butter wouldn't melt in his mouth."

say a mouthful
If you make an important or lengthy remark, you say a mouthful.
"The customer said a mouthful when he gave the reason for his dissatisfaction."

move the goalposts
During a course of action, if someone moves the goalposts they change the rules or conditions.
"Our objectives have been set for next year. Let's hope the boss doesn't move the goalposts halfway through."

move heaven and earth
To say that you will move heaven and earth means that you are prepared to do everything that is possible to achieve something.
"I promise I will move heaven and earth to get a work permit for you."

move in the same circles
When people move in the same circles, they socialise with other people who have a similar background, interests or lifestyle.
"I've never met the Duchess personally. We don't move in the same circles!"

move up in the world
A person who moves up in the world becomes more important in society or successful in their career.
"Rachel Jones has moved up in the world since we were kids."

movers and shakers
The term movers and shakers refers to people in power who take an active part in making things happen.
"Mover and shakers are assembling in Brussels for the summit."

much of a muchness
The expression much of a muchness means 'very similar' or 'almost alike'.
"It's hard to choose between the two - they're much of a muchness really."

much ado about nothing
If people make much ado about nothing, they make a lot of fuss about something which is not important.
"A discussion took place about the colour of the receptionist's shoes - much ado about nothing!"

much obliged
Some people use the expression much obliged to say that they are very grateful.
"It's raining Mr. Brown - take my umbrella." "Much obliged."

as much use as a handbrake on a canoe
This expression refers to something which is completely useless or serves no purpose.
"With no electricity, a refrigerator would be as much use as a handbrake on a canoe!"

muddy the waters
If you muddy the waters, you make something less clear by giving confusing information.
"I had difficulty understanding, and Alan's explanation just muddied the waters!"

mug's game
An unprofitable or ill-advised activity that only a fool (mug) would do is called a mug's game.
"Spending hours making home-made cakes for a few customers is a mug's game."

mum's the word
To say 'mum's the word' means that the subject or plan is a secret and must not be revealed.
"We're planning a surprise birthday party, so mum's the word - OK?"

murder something
If you say that you could murder something, such as food or drink, you mean that you want it very much.
"I'm so hot and thirsty I could murder a cool drink!"

be murder
If something is murder, it is very difficult or uncomfortable.
"The journey home through the storm was absolute murder!"

get away with murder
Someone who gets away with murder can do something unacceptable without being punished or reprimanded.
"Some parents let their kids get away with murder."

Murphy's law
Referring to Murphy's law expresses a sentiment of bad luck and the idea that if anything can go wrong, it will.
"We've tried to prepare for every possible incident, but remember Murphy's law ...!"

face the music
If you have to face the music, you have to accept the unpleasant consequences of your actions.
"The boy was caught stealing. Now he has to face the music!"

music to your ears
If something is music to your ears, the information that you receive makes you feel very happy.
"His compliments were music to my ears."

mutton dressed as lamb
This expression refers to a middle-aged woman who tries to look younger by dressing in clothes designed for younger people.
"The style doesn't suit Betty - it has a mutton-dressed-as-lamb effect on her!"

my way or the highway
If you say to someone 'it's my way or the highway', you are telling them that either they accept to do as you say or they leave the project.
"You don't have much choice when someone says: 'it's my way or the highway.'!"

nailing jelly to the wall
To say that something is like nailing jelly to the wall means that it is extremely difficult to do, if not impossible.
"Alex travels so much that keeping track of him is like nailing jelly to the wall."

name is mud
To say that a person's name is mud means that they have acquired a bad reputation because of something they have done or said.
"The mayor's name is mud now after the revelations in the newspaper."

name (written) on it
If something has someone's name (written) on it, it is intended for that person or it is ideally suited to them.
"That dress would be perfect for you - it's got your name on it!"

necessary evil
If you say that something is a necessary evil, you don't like it but you understand that it has to exist and be accepted.
"Vaccinations are a necessary evil if you want to travel."

neck and neck
In a contest or competition, when two competitors reach the same level, they are neck and neck, so it is impossible to say who will win.
"At the moment the two teams are neck and neck for the Word Cup."

pain in the neck
If you refer to someone as a pain in the neck, you think they are very irritating or annoying.
"Emily is a pain in the neck the way she keeps complaining!"

stick one's neck out
If a person sticks their neck out, they draw attention to themselves by saying or doing something that others are afraid to do.
"Julie stuck her neck out and said that the sales target would be impossible to reach without extra staff."

needs must (when the devil drives)
The expression 'needs must (when the devil drives)' means that you are sometimes forced by circumstances to do something that you do not want to do.
"I'd rather stay with you than attend the conference, but needs must ...!"

needle in haystack
To refer to something as a needle in a haystack means that it is very difficult or impossible to find.
"Finding a pub in Dublin without knowing its name is like looking for a needle in a haystack."

neither fish nor fowl
People or things that are difficult to classify because they are neither one thing nor another are 'neither fish nor fowl'.
"Interns are neither fish nor fowl. They are neither students nor fully qualified practitioners."

neither here nor there
Something which is neither here nor there is unimportant or irrelevant."
"Why the problem wasn't discovered earlier is neither here nor there. What's important now is to find a solution."

nerves of steel
Someone who has nerves of steel is not afraid in difficult or dangerous situations.
"Fire-fighters need to have nerves of steel."

get on one's nerves
If you get on someone's nerves, you annoy or irritate them a great deal.
"The children next door are so noisy they're getting on my nerves."

nest egg
If you have a nest egg, you have a reserve of money which you put aside for future needs.
"Our parents consider the money from the sale of their house as a nest egg for their old age."

never a dull moment
When there is never a dull moment, something is always changing or happening.
"With four teenagers at home, there's never a dull moment!"

never looked back
If you say that younever looked back, you mean that after an event which changed your life for the better, you continue to be happy with the situation.
"Since the day she decided to work from home, she has never looked back."

never in a million years
This expression means 'absolutely never' or 'at no time in my life'.
"I will never in a million years understand why Anne married Bob."

never mind
When you say 'never mind' to someone, you are telling them not to worry, that it is not important.
"When the child broke the cup Susan said 'never mind - it was an old cup'."

it never rains but it pours
This expression is used to comment on the fact that when something bad happens, other bad things often happen too, and make the situation even worse.
"First he forgot his briefcase, then he lost his wallet, and when he reached the car park, his car had been stolen - it never rains but it pours!"

never say die
You can say 'never say die' to encourage someone to persevere in their efforts and not give up or abandon their project.
"Keep going - it's too soon to give up. Never say die!"

new blood
If something such as an organisation or a sports team needs â€˜new bloodâ€™, it needs to recruit people who come with new ideas, energy and enthusiasm in order to improve or invigorate it.
"Because of the poor results, the coach decided that the team needed some new blood."

new kid on the block
The new kid on the block is someone (not just a child) who is a newcomer to an area, or a new member of a group.
"Even after several years in the company Charlie is still regarded by some as 'the new kid on the block'."

new to this game
To say that you are new to this game means that you have never been involved in this sort of activity before.
"I want to join Facebook but I don't know how to start. I'm new to this game."

new lease of life
A person who has a new lease of life has a chance to live longer or with greater enjoyment or satisfaction.
"Moving closer to his children has given the old man a new lease of life."

can't put new wine in old bottles
This expression means that you should not try to combine new concepts or innovations with an old or long-established framework or system.
"You'll never get that program to work on your father's old computer. You can't put new wine in old bottles!"

next best thing
If you can't have exactly what you want, the next best thing is the best alternative possible.
"The camera I wanted was far too expensive so I opted for a cheaper one that was the next best thing."

next to nothing
The term next to nothing means a very small amount or almost nothing.
"My boots didn't cost much. I bought them for next to nothing in the sales."

(as) nice as pie
If a person is as nice as pie, they are surprisingly kind and friendly.
"After our argument, my colleague was as nice as pie!"

in the nick of time
If something happens in the nick of time, it happens at the last minute, when it is nearly too late.
"The child was standing in front of the open window. His mother caught him in the nick of time."

night owl
Someone who is lively and active at night and goes to bed very late is called night owl.
"I work better in the evenings than in the morning. My friends say I'm a night owl."

nine-day wonder
An event which isa nine-day wonder causes interest, surprise or excitement for a short time, but it doesn't last.
"His sudden departure was a nine-day wonder but he was soon forgotten."

nine times out of ten
When something happens nine times out of ten, it is what usually happens.
"The public transport system is very bad. Trains arrive late nine times out of ten."

on cloud nine
A person who is on cloud nine is very happy because something wonderful has happened.
"When the boss announced my promotion, I was on cloud nine!"

dressed up to the nines
To describe someone as dressed up to the nines means that they are wearing very smart or glamorous clothes.
"Caroline must be going to a party - she's dressed up to the nines."

talk nineteen to the dozen
Someone who talks nineteen to the dozen speaks very quickly.
"He was talking nineteen to the dozen so I didn't catch the whole story."

nitty-gritty
When people get down to the nitty-gritty, they begin to discuss the most important points or the practical details.
"I was interested in the project, but we didn't get down to the nitty-gritty until his partner arrived."

no accounting for taste
This expression is used to indicate surprise at another person's likes or dislikes.
"She fell in love with a guy who's short, fat, bald and poor ... there's no accounting for taste!"

no-brainer
A decision or choice that requires little or no thought, because the best option is so obvious, is called a no-brainer.
"The choice was between a cash refund or having the amount credited to my account - it was a no-brainer! I took the cash!"

no dice
If someone asks you for something and you reply 'no dice!', you mean that it is impossible or it can't be done.
"Can you lend me your car?"  "Sorry, no dice!"

no end
This expression is another way of saying 'very much'.
"Aunt Bessie was pleased no end to be invited to your wedding."

no fixed abode
A person of no fixed abode has nowhere permanent to live.
"A 30-year-old man of no fixed abode was charged with the burglary."

no-go area
A  no-go area is an area, particularly in a city, where it is dangerous to go.
"Tourists have been advised to avoid parts of the city which have become no-go areas."

no great shakes
To say that someone or something is no great shakes means that they are useless, ineffective or not very good.
"He's a good actor but his last film was no great shakes."

no hard feelings
If you have no hard feelings, you feel no resentment or bitterness about something.
"When Alan was promoted instead of Steve, he said to Steve : 'No hard feelings I hope'."

no holds barred
This expression, which derives from wrestling, is used to describe something done with no restraints, limits or rules of conduct.
"It's a live talk show with no holds barred, which is not to everyone's taste."

no picnic
An activity or task that is no picnic is unpleasant or difficult.
"Tom is a bit depressed these days, but then job-hunting is no picnic."

no smoke without fire
If many people say that something bad is happening, there is possibly some truth in it.
"Although no proof was ever found, people continue to say: 'There's no smoke without fire'."

no two ways about it
To say that there are no two ways about something means that there is only one suitable ay of dealing with something.
"There are no two ways about it. You can't accept the money, so you must give it back."

no use crying over spilt milk
This expression means that it is useless to complain or have regrets about something that is done and cannot be changed.
"Sometimes I regret not accepting the offer, but it's no use crying over spilt milk."

on nodding terms
If you are on nodding terms with someone, you don't know them very well, just well enough to say 'hello' when you meet them.
"We haven't made any friends yet but we're on nodding terms with our neighbours."

non sequitur
This Latin term refers to a statement which does not seem to be a logical follow-up to the previous statement or argument.
"After announcing the merger, the chairman began talking about global warming which seemed a complete non sequitur."

none the wiser
If you do not know more about something after obtaining an explanation, or if you fail to find information on the subject, you are none the wiser.
"I tried to understand the voting system but I was none the wiser after Joe's explanation."

use your noodle
If you use your noodle, you use your brain or your common sense.
"How did I figure that out? I just used my noodle!"

nose out of joint
If something putsyour nose out of joint, it offends or annoys you.
"When he discovered he wasn't on the invitation list, that really put his nose out of joint!"

not all there
Someone who is not all there behaves strangely at times, or seems a bit odd.
"Our new neighbour wears a hat and coat even in summer; he's not all there!"

(not) for all the tea in China
To say that you would not do something for all the tea in China means that you would not do it under any conditions.
"I wouldn't live there for all the tea in China."

not for love or money
If you say that you cannot or will not do something for love or money, you mean that you will not do it under any circumstances.
"I would not try bungee jumping for love or money!"

not getting anywhere
If you are not getting anywhere, you are making no progress at all.
"I've spent the whole day looking for a solution but I'm not getting anywhere."

not give a hoot
To say that you don't or couldn't give a hoot means that you don't care at all about something.
"She wears eccentric clothes and she couldn't give a hoot about what others think."

not give the time of day
If you dislike someone so strongly that you ignore them and refuse to speak to them, you do not give them the time of day.
"Sarah's parents dislike her boyfriend so much they won't even give him the time of day!"

not in the same league
If something is not in the same league, it is of much lower standard than something else.
"He had a good voice but he wasn't in the same league as Pavarotti."

not in one's right mind
Someone who is not in their right mind is not behaving in a logical or sensible way.
"Julie wasn't in her right mind the day she bought that outfit. It doesn't suit her at all!"

not let grass grow under your feet
If someone does not let the grass grow under their feet, they do not delay in getting something done.
"As soon as he received the permit, he started to build. He doesn't let the grass grow under his feet!"

not a patch on
If something or someone is not a patch on an other, they are not nearly as good.
"His second conference wasn't a patch on the first one."

not have a stitch on
Someone who doesnot have a stitch on is wearing no clothes and is therefore completely naked.
"When the doorbell rang, he didn't have a stitch on!"

not the only pebble on the beach
To say that someone is not the only pebble on the beach means that they are not the only person worth considering.
"He thinks his refusal to join the team will cause problems, but there are other alternatives ...he's not the only pebble on the beach!"

not the brightest bulb in the box / the sharpest knife in the drawer / the sharpest tool in the shed
These are a few of the expressions used to say that someone is not very intelligent. There are many others.
"Max has failed the exam for the third time! He's obviously not the brightest bulb in the box!"
"Nobody was surprised when Johnny misunderstood the message. We all know heâ€™s not the sharpest knife in the drawer!"

not up to scratch
Something which isnot up to scratch fails to reach the expected standard.
"The quality of the material is not up to scratch. We'll have to change our suppliers."

a notch above
Something that is a notch above something else is a little better in every way.
"His rendering of the song was a notch above the others."

strike the right note
If you strike (or hit) the right note, you say or do something suitable or appropriate
"He struck the right note with his future mother-in-law when he brought her a book on gardening - her favourite hobby!"

nothing doing
This term means that there is no way you would accept to do what is proposed.
"Work on Sunday? Nothing doing!"

nothing succeeds like success
This expression means that success often leads to further successes.
"The success of my first book encouraged to continue writing.  Nothing succeeds like success!"

nothing to write home about
To say that something is nothing to write home about means that it is not of great interest or importance.
"Okay, she's written a couple of books, but nothing to write home about."

nothing ventured, nothing gained
You cannot expect to achieve anything if you risk nothing.
"He's going to ask his boss for a promotion even though he has little chance of obtaining satisfaction. Nothing ventured, nothing gained!"

now you're talking!
This expression is used to show encouragement or agreement with something that has just been said, for example a good idea.
"If we take the underground we'll avoid the traffic" "Now you're talking!"

nowhere to be found
If something is nowhere to be found, even after a thorough search, it is impossible to find it.
"We looked everywhere for the cat but it was nowhere to be found."
null and void
Something which isnull and void has no legal force or is invalid.
"The contract was declared null and void."

number cruncher
This is a humorous way of referring to someone who is an accountant or who is very good at working with numbers and calculations.
"She's a number cruncher who perfectly understands the organisation's financial situation."

go nuts
To say that a person has gone nuts means that they have become completely foolish, eccentric or mad.
"I think the old lady has gone nuts! It's very hot today and she's wearing a fur coat!"

nuts and bolts
The nuts and bolts of something are the detailed facts and the practical aspects.
"We need to discuss the nuts and bolts of the proposal before going any further."

(as) nutty as a fruitcake
Someone who is (as) nutty as a fruitcake is insane or crazy.
"Don't pay attention to what the old man says; he's as nutty as a fruitcake!"

odds and ends
Odds and ends are small articles, or bits and pieces of all sorts, usually of little value.
"You'll probably find it in the top drawer. That's where I keep my odds and ends".

at odds
If one person is at odds with another, they disagree with each other.
"Sam is at odds with his father over the purchase of a new tractor."

off colour
If you are off colour, you look or feel ill.
"What's the matter with you Tom? You look a bit off colour today."

off the cuff
If you speak off the cuff, you say something without any previous thought or preparation.
"Our new mayor handles off-the-cuff interviews very well."

on the off-chance
If you do something on the off chance, you think there might be a slight possibility of success.
"I went into the supermarket on the off chance that I would find a map."

off the peg
Clothes that are bought off the peg are purchased in a standard size in a shop and are not made specially for you.
"He can't afford to have his suits made to measure so he buys them off the peg."

off the record
If you say something off the record, you do not want anyone to repeat it publicly.
"His comment was made off the record, and shouldn't have been published."

off your rocker
If you tell someone that they are off their rocker, you think they are completely crazy.
"You're going to give all your money away? You're off your rocker!"

off the top of your head
To say something off the top of your head means that you are giving an immediate reaction, and not a carefully considered opinion, so it might not be correct.
"How much do you think it will cost?" "Off the top of my head I'd say around $1000."

in the offing
Something that is in the offing is likely to appear or happen soon.
"Apparently a new law on minimum wages is in the offing."

pour oil on troubled waters
If a person pours oil on troubled waters, they do or say something to calm a tense situation or make people stop arguing.
"James is a good negotiator, and is always able to pour oil on troubled waters."

old dog for hard road
This expression means that experience is invaluable when one is faced with a difficult task.
"The case calls for an experienced lawyer, an old dog for a hard road."

old wives' tale
A traditional belief or idea which has been proved wrong by science is called an old wives' tale.
"The belief that chocolate causes acne is an old wives' tale."

oldest trick in the book
A well-known and much-used trick, which is still effective today, is called the oldest trick in the book.
"He made a noise to attract my attention while his accomplice stole my wallet - the oldest trick in the book!"

(hold out an) olive branch
If a person or organisation holds out an olive branch to another, they show that they want to end a disagreement and make peace.
"The protesters finally accepted the olive branch extended to them."

can't make omelette without breaking eggs
This expression means that it is impossible to make important changes without causing some unpleasant effects.
"Some people will lose their jobs after the merger but you can't make an omelette without breaking eggs."

on the cards (US: in the cards)
Something which is on the cards is planned and likely to happen.
"A coalition between the two parties is still on the cards."

on the fly
If you do somethingon the fly, you do it quickly, without thinking much about it, while doing something else.
"I'm so busy I usually have lunch on the fly."

on ice
If a project or plan is put on ice, all further action has been suspended or postponed for an indefinite period of time.
"Plans for the nuclear power station have been put on ice."

on one's last legs
If you are on your last legs, you are in a very weak condition or about to die.
"I was so sick that I felt as though I was on my last legs!"

on the level
If you say that someone is on the level, you are referring to an honest and truthful person.
"Tell me straight - is he on the level or not?"

on the lookout
If you are on the lookout for something, you are constantly watchful and attentive so as not to miss it.
"Being a collector, he's always on the lookout for interesting items."

on the map
If a place becomes well-known, it is put on the map.
"The president's visit really put the restaurant on the map."

on the mend
If someone or something is on the mend, they are improving after an illness or a difficult period.
"My mother caught the 'flu but she's on the mend now."

on the QT
Something that is done on the QT is done quietly or discreetly.
"They got married on the QT last summer and told nobody."

on the safe side
If you do something to be on the safe side, you do it as a precaution, to avoid any risks.
"I think I locked the door but I'll check again to be on the safe side."

on the up and up
A person who is on the up and up is becoming increasingly successful.
"The architect has been on the up and up since he designed a building in Dubai."

on one's uppers
Someone who is on their uppers has very little money or not enough to cover their needs.
"Because he was clearly on his uppers when he was hired, he was given an advance in salary."

on the sly
If you do something on the sly, you do it secretly or furtively.
"He made such quick progress that the others suspected him of having private lessons on the sly."

once in a blue moon
If something occursonce in a blue moon, it happens very rarely.
"Bill has very little contact with his brother. They see each other once in a blue moon."

one in the eye
If an event or development is an unexpected defeat or disappointment for someone, it is one in the eye for that person.
"My promotion was one in the eye for my ambitious colleague."

one fell swoop
If something is accomplished at (or in) one fell swoop, it is done in a single action, usually rapidly and ruthlessly.
"The three houses were demolished at one fell swoop."

one good turn deserves another
If someone helps you, it is natural and right to help them in return.
"We helped Alex and Sara when they moved into their new house, just as they helped us last year; one good turn deserves another."

one hand washes the other (and together they wash the face)
This expression means that when people cooperate and work well together, there is a better chance of a achieving results.

one horse town
A place referred to as a one horse town is a small, boring town where nothing much ever happens.
"I wish my grandparents didn't live in that one-horse town. It's such a boring place!"

one over the eight
If a person has had one over the eight, they are slightly drunk.
"Don't listen to him! You can see he's had one over the eight!"

one step ahead
When you are one step ahead of someone else, you achieve something faster than they do, or you have a slight advantage over them.
"The company is successful because they're always one step ahead of their competitors."

one track mind
If you have a one-track mind, you have a tendency to think about only one subject.
"The boy has a one-track mind; all he thinks about is football!"

one too many
Someone who has hadone too many has drunk too much alcohol.
"I think Tony's had one too many - he's talking rubbish."

one's number is up
To say that one's number is up means that either a person is in serious difficulty and something bad is going to happen, or the time has come when they will die.
"The police have located the escaped prisoner so it looks as if his number is up!"

one's own undoing
If you do something that is the cause of your own failure, loss or downfall, it is your own undoing. You can blame nobody but yourself.
"If he continues to gamble like that, it will be his own undoing."

one upmanship
The term one-upmanship refers to the art of gaining and keeping an advantage over other people.
"He's a successful man, but his one-upmanship has left him with few friends."

only to be expected
If an event or outcome is only to be expected, it is most likely to happen.
"The teacher was angry because you cheated at the exam? That was only to be expected!"

open doors to/for
If something opens doors, it provides opportunities or possibilities for the future.
"A degree from a top university generally opens doors to major companies."

open the floodgates
If someone or something opens the floodgates, they release something that had previously been held under control.
"It is feared that easing price controls will open the floodgates to inflation."

open the kimono
If a person or organisation opens the kimono, they reveal something previously hidden.
"It's time to open the kimono and explain that we cannot meet the deadline."

open (or reopen) old wounds
If you open or reopen old wounds you revive memories of an unpleasant event, situation or dispute that took place in the past.
"He carefully avoided the subject so as not to open old wounds."

open secret
A fact that is supposed to be a secret but is actually widely known is called an open secret.
"It's an open secret that Paul and Emily are living together."

open and shut case
An open-and-shut case is one where the facts are so clear that the matter can be dealt with or solved easily.
"He was caught driving the stolen car. It's an open-and-shut case."

opposite number
A person who holds the same position as oneself in another company or organisation is called one's opposite number.
"I spoke to my opposite number in several local companies and we all agreed to join the anti-pollution campaign."

ostrich strategy (or policy)
Someone who adopts an ostrich strategy or policy chooses to ignore or evade an obvious problem in the hope that it will resolve itself or disappear.
"Adopting an ostrich strategy will only make matters worse - we've got to find a solution."

other side of the coin
When you want to mention a different or contradictory aspect of a situation, you refer to the other side of the coin.
"The house is lovely and spacious, but the other side of the coin is that it is far from shops and schools."

other things being equal
This expression refers to a probable situation if the conditions elsewhere remain unchanged or equal.
"Other things being equal, a reduction in the cost of transport should enable us to lower our prices."

out of the blue
If something happens out of the blue, it happens unexpectedly.
"I had nearly given up hope when out of the blue I was offered a job."

out of character
If you do something that is out of character, it is unlike your usual behaviour or not what is expected from you.
"The way she panicked was out of character for such a normally calm person."

out of circulation
Someone who is out of circulation is unavailable or not joining in activities with others.
"I'm going to do a summer course in New York, so I'll be out of circulation for a while."

out of your depth
If you are out of your depth, you are unable to understand a subject or deal with a situation because it is too difficult for you.
"The level of the class was too high for me, so very quickly I felt out of my depth."

out of earshot
When someone is out of earshot, they are too far away to hear or to be heard.
"They waited until Tess was out of earshot before discussing her surprise birthday party."

out of harm's way
If you put something out of harm's way, you put it in a safe place where it won't be damaged.
"I'm going to put this glass bowl out of harm's way so that it doesn't get broken."

out like a light
If a person is out like a light, they are so tired that they fall asleep very quickly.
"As soon as his head touched the pillow, he was out like a light."

out on a limb
If you go out on a limb, you do something risky or unsupported by others, which leaves you in a difficult position.
"Jack was out on a limb with his proposal - nobody supported his idea."

out to lunch
To say that someone is out to lunch means that they seem to be either unaware of what's going on around them or unable to understand what is happening.
"He's hopeless as a leader - considered as 'out to lunch' by the group."

out of the picture
To say that a person or group is out of the picture means that they have been eliminated in a contest or tournament.
"We were beaten in the semi-finals, so that's us out of the picture!"

out of your own pocket
If you pay for something out of your own pocket, you cover the cost with your own money.
"Breakfast is included but you must pay for lunch out of your own pocket."

out of the question
Something which is out of the question is impossible and is therefore not worth discussing.
"Buying a new car is out of the question - we simply can't afford it."

out of sorts
If someone is out of sorts, they are upset and irritable or not feeling well.
"The baby is out of sorts today. Perhaps he's cutting a tooth."

out of sync
If two movements or actions are out of sync, they are not coordinated and are not taking place at the same time or at the same speed.
"The traffic lights are out of sync and causing a lot of confusion."

out of touch
If you areout of touch, you no longer communicate with someone, or you are unaware of recent developments.
"I've been out of touch with Jenny since we left college."

out of whack
If something is out of whack, it is not working properly or is not in good order.
"The dishwasher is making a funny noise. Something must be out of whack."

out of this world
To refer to something as out of this world means that you think it is extremely good or impressive.
"The hotel was very comfortable and the food was out of this world."

at the outside
When talking about the length of time or the amount of money necessary to do something, at the outside indicates the highest estimate or the largest amount.
"How long will it take to get there?" "I'd say two hours at the outside."

go overboard
If you go overboard, you are over-enthusiastic about something and do too much or behave in an excessive way.
"We need to prepare the dining room for Christmas, but don't go overboard with the decorations!"

over-egg the pudding
If you try to improve something excessively by adding unnecessary details, you over-egg the pudding.
"Keep your report simple. Don't over-egg the pudding."

over my dead body!
This expression is used by someone who absolutely refuses to allow someone to do something.
"Mum, can I get by nose pierced?"  "Over my dead body!"

over and done with
If something difficult or unpleasant is over and done with, it has now been successfully accomplished, so you don't have to worry about it any longer.
"It wasn't easy, but I had to announce the bad news, so now that's over and done with."

over the hill
If a person is over the hill, they have reached an age when they can no longer perform as well as before.
"Gran! You say you're over the hill, but you're still a super cook!"

over the moon
If you are over the moon, you are absolutely delighted.
"We were all over the moon when we heard the good news."

over the top (OTT)
Something which is over the top is totally excessive or not suitable for the occasion.
"Her dramatic speech was way over the top."

overplay your hand
If you overplay your hand, you are overconfident and spoil your chances of success by trying to obtain too much.
"Sam is hoping for a bonus for his good results, but he may be overplaying his hand if he asks for a promotion."

overshoot the mark
If you make a mistake as a result of misjudging something (situation, distance, amount, etc.), you overshoot the mark.
"He overshot the mark by about 20%."

overstep the mark
If you overstep the mark, you go too far and upset someone by saying something or behaving in a way that is unacceptable.
"Jenny is angry with her son. He overstepped the mark when he called his grandfather an 'old fool'."

(as) close as an oyster
Someone who is as close as an oyster will never reveal something told in confidence or betray a secret.
"Sophie will never repeat what you tell her. She's as close as an oyster."

the world is your oyster
This expression means that you are free and able to enjoy the pleasures and opportunities that life has to offer.
"She left college feeling that the world was her oyster."

put through their paces 
If you put someone or something through their paces, you test their ability to do something by making them perform certain actions.
"During the presentation, the machine was put through its paces."

pack of lies 
A large number of untruthful statements is referred to as a pack of lies.
"The story about her unhappy childhood turned out to be a pack of lies."

ahead of the pack 
If a person or organisation is ahead of the pack, they are better or more successful than their rivals.
"Our products will have to be more innovative if we are to stay ahead of the pack."

pack (something) in 
If you pack something in, you abandon it or give it up.
"Emily found city life so stressful, she decided to pack it in and move to the country."

packed like sardines 
If a group of people are packed like sardines, they are pressed together tightly and uncomfortably because there is not enough space.
"The bus was very crowded - we were packed like sardines!"

pad the bill 
If someone pads the bill, they add false items to a bill or invoice in order to increase the total amount.
"Check the invoice carefully before paying - he tends to pad the bill!"

paddle your own canoe 
If you paddle your own canoe, you do what you want to do without help or interference from anyone.
"Steve decided to paddle his own canoe and set up his own business."

paid peanuts 
If you are paid peanuts, you have a very low salary.
"Jenny has a very interesting job, but she's paid peanuts. "

paint the town red 
If you paint the town red, you go out and enjoy a lively evening in bars, night-clubs, etc.
"To celebrate the victory, the team's supporters painted the town red."

paint into a corner 
If you paint yourself into a corner, you put yourself into a situation that restricts what you can do or say.
Carole told her boss she was busy on Friday evening. She saw that she had painted herself into a corner when he said : 'Too bad! I was going to give you two tickets for the opera."

pale as a ghost 
Someone who is as pale as a ghost is extremely pale.
"The man who witnessed the scene was as pale as a ghost when the police arrived."

(press) panic button 
If you hit or press the panic button, you raise the alarm too quickly or react too hastily in a difficult or stressful situation.
"Calm down! There's no need to press the panic button yet!"

(caught with) pants down 
If you are caught with your pants down, you are caught doing something bad or forbidden.
"Our neighbours were caught fiddling with the electricity meter - caught with their pants down!"

paper over cracks 
To say that someone is papering over the cracks means that they are concealing a problem rather than dealing with it effectively.
"The measures taken to reduce unemployment are just paper over the cracks."

paper tiger
This term refers to a person, organisation or country that is less powerful or threatening than they appear to be.
"He threatens to take strong action but he's just another paper tiger."

paper trail
If a person or organisation leaves a paper trail, they leave evidence in writing or in document form that will serve as proof of their actions.
"The police found a paper trail which lead to the author of the hoax."

on paper
To say that an idea, plan or scheme seems good on paper means that it looks good in theory or in writing but may not work when put into practice.
"His plan looks good on paper but I'm not convinced it will work."

par for the course
If something is par for the course, it is typical of what to expect in that particular situation.
"I spent the week-end working on the project but nobody showed any appreciation. That's par for the course in this firm."

part and parcel
Something that is part and parcel of an activity or role is a key component or an essential element that cannot be avoided.
"I'm an events manager. Travelling is part and parcel of my job."

parting shot
A parting shot is a final remark, often incisive or disparaging, made just as one is leaving.
"He has a way of making parting shots that can be very discouraging."

partner in crime
A person who helps you to plan something dishonest or unlawful is called your partner in crime.
(This expression can be used jokingly as in the example below.)
"Sam was my partner in crime. He hid my son's bicycle until his birthday."

(the) party is over
To say that the party is over means that a period of happiness, freedom, enjoyment etc. has come to an end, and life is going to return to normal.
"I had a wonderful time here but the party's over and I must get back to work."

pass the buck
If you say that someone is passing the buck, you are accusing them of not taking responsibility for a problem and letting others deal with it instead.
"Whenever a customer comes to complain, she always finds a way of looking busy - a great way of passing the buck!"

pass muster
If someone or something passes muster, they are considered to be satisfactory or acceptable.
"The interview went well. I hope I'll pass muster."

passing fancy
If you have a passing fancy for something, you become fond of it for a short time.
"My father started collecting stamps a few years ago, but it was just a passing fancy."

(a) pat answer
A simplified response that is memorized or prepared in advance is called a .
"Many journalists at the press conference found his pat answers totally frustrating."

have (something) down pat
If you memorize or practice something until you know it perfectly or have it exactly right, you have it down pat.
"I rehearsed my presentation until I had it down pat."

not a patch on
If something or someone is not a patch on an other, they are not nearly as good.
"His second conference wasn't a patch on the first one."

pay dearly
If you pay dearly for something that you do or say, you suffer a lot as a result of it.
"If you leave your job now, you may have to pay dearly for it."

pay dividends
If something you do pays dividends, it brings advantages or rewards at a later date.
"The time he spent learning English paid dividends when he started looking for a job."

pay over the odds
If you pay over the odds, you pay too much or you pay more for something than it is really worth.
"She's willing to pay over the odds for an original Kelly handbag to add to her collection."

go pear-shaped
If a plan or project goes pear-shaped, it either goes wrong or it produces an undesirable result.
"Jane organised a treasure hunt in the park for the kids but it all went pear-shaped because of the rain."

throw pearls to pigs
This expression means that it is wasteful to offer something valuable or useful to someone who does not understand or appreciate it.
"She had a beautifully trained voice but the audience didn't listen - talk about throwing pearls to pigs!"

like two peas in a pod
To say that two people are like two peas in a pod means that they are very similar in appearance.
"It wasn't difficult to identify the brothers - they were like two peas in a pod."

not the only pebble on the beach
To say that someone is not the only pebble on the beach means that they are not the only person worth considering.
"He thinks his refusal to join the team will cause problems, but there are other alternatives ...he's not the only pebble on the beach!"

put the pedal to the metal
When you put the pedal to the metal, you accelerate or make something go faster.
"If we put the pedal to the metal we could get this finished in time."

a square peg in a round hole
To say that a person is a square peg in a round hole means that they are not suitable for the job they are doing or the situation they are in.
"The new employee was a bad choice for the job - a square peg in a round hole."

take someone down a peg
If you take someone down a peg, you make that person understand that they are not as important as they think they are.
"He is too proud. Somebody has to take him down a peg."

pen pusher
A person who does work that requires little action, just office work, and who lacks operating experience, is called a pen pusher.
"Those pen pushers have no idea what it's like on a building site"

the pen is mightier than the sword
This expression means that words and communication have greater effect than war and fighting.
"The treaty put an end to the hostilities - the pen is mightier than the sword."

(the) penny drops
When a person has difficulty understanding or realizing something, and then the penny drops, they finally understand.
"The teasing continued for some time until the penny dropped and the boy understood that it was a joke!"

in for a penny, in for a pound
This expression means that once you start doing something, you might just as well do it wholeheartedly and not stop at half-measures.
"Joe finally accepted to be on the committee, then he accepted to be the chairman. "In for a penny, in for a pound'." he said!"

penny for your thoughts
This phrase is used to ask someone what they are thinking about
"You look pensive. A penny for your thoughts!"

turn up like a bad penny
If someone turns up like a bad penny, they appear at a place or event where they are not welcome or not wanted.
"I try to avoid Jane, but wherever I go she turns up like a bad penny!"

perish the thought
This expression is used when the speaker really hopes that something will not happen.
"If I lost my job, perish the thought, I don't know how we'd survive."

in the right perspective
When people see or put things in their right perspective, they keep in proportion all the elements of a situation, without exaggerating the importance of any aspect.
"If Tom could see things in their right perspective, the situation would be less stressful for him."

pervert the course of justice
If a person perverts the course of justice, they tell a lie or prevent the police from finding out the truth about something.
"The suspect was accused of trying to pervert the course of justice."

pester power
The term pester power refers to the power children exert over their parents by continually nagging or pestering them until they accept to buy advertised toys or fashionable products
"Pester power leads busy parents to buy more and more for their children."

pick someone's brains
If you pick someone's brains, you ask questions about a particular subject in order to obtain advice or information.
"Could we have lunch together? I'd like to pick your brains about something."

pick a fight
Someone who picks a fight deliberately looks for an opportunity to start a quarrel or begin an argument.
"Our new neighbour seizes every occasion to pick a fight."

pick holes
If someone picks holes in something such as a plan, an idea or a proposal, they criticize it or try to find fault with it.
"Why don't you make a suggestion instead of picking holes in all my ideas!"

pick up the pieces
After a disastrous event, if you pick up the pieces you do what you can to get the situation back to normal again.
"After fire destroyed their house, it took them a long time to pick up the pieces."

pick up steam
If a project or process picks up steam, it starts to develop or become more active.
"The campaign started slowly but picked up steam after Christmas."

pick up the tab
If you pick up the tab, you pay the bill or pay the cost of something.
"There was a celebration lunch for the team and Bill picked up the tab."

in a pickle
If you are in a pickle, you are in a difficult situation and need help.
"My car won't start and the trains are on strike today, so I'm in a real pickle!"

no picnic
A situation or activity that is no picnic is difficult or problematic.
"Raising teenagers nowadays is no picnic believe me!"

picture of health
Someone who looks the picture of health looks extremely healthy.
"Nice to see you again Mr. Brown. I must say you look the picture of health!"

a picture is worth a thousand words
This expression means that a picture can give just as much information as a large amount of descriptive text.
"Look at the picture of the crash! A picture is worth a thousand words isn't it?"

get the picture
A person who gets the picture understands what is being explained or described.
"The alarm went off and people started running everywhere - you get the picture I'm sure!"

pie in the sky
If an idea or project is pie in the sky, it is completely unrealistic or unlikely to be achieved.
"The promise of low-cost housing for everyone turned out to be pie in the sky."

(as) easy as pie
If something is easy as pie, it is very easy to do.
"How did the English test go?" "No problem - it was as easy as pie."

eat humble pie
If you eat humble pie, you are forced to admit that you were wrong and apologize.
"After openly criticizing Bill's work, Fred had to eat humble pie when Bill was elected 'salesman of the year'."

pie-eyed
Someone who is pie-eyed is completely drunk.
"He had never taken an alcoholic drink so after one beer the boy was pie-eyed."

piece of the action
When someone wants a piece of the action, they want to participate in what other people are doing and benefit from it.
"The songwriter thought the show would be a success so he wanted a piece of the action."

piece of cake
To refer to something as a piece of cake means that you consider it to be very easy.
"The English test was a piece of cake!"

go to pieces
If you go to pieces, for example after a terrible shock, you are so upset or distressed that you cannot lead a normal life.
"Jack nearly went to pieces when his son died in a car crash."

make a pig of yourself
If you make a pig of yourself, you eat and drink too much.
"Watch what you eat. Don't make a pig of yourself!"

on the pig's back
A person who is on the pig's back is in a state of luck and everything is going well for them.
"Before the recession, the country was on the pig's back, but the situation has changed greatly."

put lipstick on a pig
This expression means that to 'dress up' something unappealing or ugly, in a vain attempt to make it look better, is like putting lipstick on a pig.
"Flowers on that ugly old bridge would be (like) putting lipstick on a pig!"

pigs get fat, hogs get slaughtered
You should be satisfied when you have enough; if you are too greedy, like a hog, you risk losing everything.

pigs might fly
The expression pigs might fly expresses disbelief, or the idea that miracles might happen but are extremely unlikely.
"My grandmother buying a computer? ... Yeah! ... and pigs might fly!"

bitter pill to swallow
A bitter pill to swallow is something very difficult or unpleasant to accept.
"Losing his job after taking charge of the merger was a bitter pill to swallow."

from pillar to post
If a person, usually someone in difficulty, goes from pillar to post, they move constantly from place to place.
"When the factory closed down, Benny moved from pillar to post in search of a new job."

at a pinch
To say that something could be done at a pinch means that it would be possible to do it if absolutely necessary.
"The hall can seat 50 people comfortably, and a few more at a pinch."

pink elephants
This term refers to hallucinations or strange imaginary things seen by people as a result of heavy drinking or the use of narcotics.
"No more drinks for me please, otherwise I'll be seeing pink elephants!"

in the pink of health
If you are in the pink of health, you are in excellent physical condition.
"Sarah looks in the pink of health after her holiday."

tickled pink
If you are tickled pink, you are very pleased about something.
"My dad was tickled pink when he was asked to announce the winner."

(have) pins and needles
To have is to have a tingling sensation in a part of the body, for example an arm or a leg, when it has been in the same position for a long time.
"I lay curled up for so long that I had pins and needles in my legs."

(on) pins and needles
If you are on pins and needles, you are very anxious or nervous about what is going to happen.
"Scott was on pins and needles while he waited for the result of the exam."

in the pipeline
If something is in the pipeline, it is currently in progress or being organised.
"A new talk show is in the pipeline at the moment."

the pits
If something is referred to as the pits, it is considered to be absolutely the worst.
"That magazine is the pits!"

a place in the sun
If you find a place in the sun, you reach a position which provides you with wealth and happiness, or whatever you have been hoping to obtain in life.
"The author finally found a place in the sun with the triumph of her latest book."

plain sailing
An activity or task that is plain sailing is without difficulty or free from trouble.
"Once the plans were accepted, it was plain sailing all the way."

plan B
Plan B is an alternative solution to be adopted if one's original plan does not succeed.
"The idea is to get a caterer to provide the food. If that's too expensive, plan B is to organise a buffet with the help of friends."

plastic smile
A person with a plastic smile is wearing a forced smile which makes them appear happier that they really are.
"A receptionist greeted customers with a plastic smile."

a lot on your plate
If someone has a lot on their plate, they are extremely busy or have several problems to handle at the same time.
"It's not a good time to discuss the problem with David. He's got a lot on his plate at the moment."

play your cards right
If you play your cards right, you do all that is necessary to succeed or to obtain what you want.
"If we play our cards right, we'll get the contract."

play cat and mouse
To play cat and mouse with someone means to treat them alternately cruelly and kindly, so that they do not know what to expect.
"He is difficult to work for, always playing cat and mouse with the employees."

play by ear
To play by ear means to improvise or act without preparation, according to the demands of the situation.
(Music : to play by remembering the tune, without printed music.)
"It's hard to know how the situation will develop. Let's just play it by ear."

play with fire
People who take unnecessary risks or behave in a dangerous way are playing with fire.
"Driving alone on isolated roads in this weather is playing with fire."

play footsie
If you play footsie with someone, you touch their feet lightly, especially under the table, to show your interest.
"Pete says they were playing footsie at the office Christmas lunch."

play to the gallery
A person who plays to the gallery tries to gain popularity by behaving in a way that will appeal to the majority.
"It's no secret that he got elected by playing to the gallery."

play the game
If you play the game, you accept to do things according to generally-accepted customs or code of behaviour.
"Not all website owners play the game. Some download content from other sites without permission."

play games with someone
If you are not completely honest, or behave in a way that is insincere, evasive or intentionally misleading, you are playing games with someone.
"Look, stop playing games with us. Just tell us if you're interested in the project or not."

play havoc
If someone or something plays havoc, they cause disorder and confusion.
"The floods played havoc with the construction work."

play the market
If you play the market, you buy stocks and shares in the hope of making a profit when you sell them.
"It's always tempting to play the market, but it's more risky at the present time."

play by the rules
If you play by the rules, you behave in a fair and honest way with people.
"You can trust him, don't worry. He always plays by the rules."

play into someone's hands
If you play into someone's hands, you do exactly what your opponent or enemy wants you to do, so that they gain an advantage over you.
"When the leaders of the protest movement became violent, they played right into the hands of the police."

play possum
When someone plays possum, they pretend to be dead or asleep in order to avoid something they don't want to do.
"Sarah's not asleep. She's just playing possum because she doesn't want to come swimming."

play second fiddle
If you play second fiddle to another person, you accept to be second in importance to that person, or have a lower position.
"John resented having to play second fiddle to the sales manager when the company was restructured."

play for time
If you play for time, you try to delay or prevent something from happening in order to gain an advantage.
"He decided to play for time in the hope that the price would decrease."

play truant
A young person who plays truant stays away from school without permission or excuse.
"Ben has no reason to be absent from school - he's playing truant again!"

play a waiting game
If you play a waiting game, you deliberately delay taking action in order to be able to act more effectively later.
"The cat keeps its eye on the bird, carefully playing a waiting game."

(not) play with a full deck (of cards)
Someone who is not playing with a full deck (of cards) lacks intelligence or does not have full mental abilities.
"Old Mrs.Whitehead was not playing with a full deck when she bought that fancy lawnmower!"

(as) pleased/proud as punch
Someone who is aspleased or as proud as punch is delighted or feels very satisfied about something.
"Danny was as proud as punch when he won the tennis match."

guilty pleasure
Enjoying something which is not generally held in high regard, while at the same time feeling a bit guilty about it, is called a guilty pleasure.
"Reading gossip magazines is a guilty pleasure for many women â€¦ and some men too!"

pluck (something) out of the air
To pluck something out of the air means to say a name, date, number, etc. spontaneously, without thinking about it.
"What are we going to call the cat?"
I just plucked a name out of the air and said: " How about Daisy?"

plug something
If you promote something by talking about it favourably, for example during a radio or TV interview, you plug it.
"He has accepted to appear on the show if he can plug his new book."

a plum job
A desirable position which is well-paid and considered relatively easy is called a plum job.
"Ideally he'd like to find himself a plum job in New York."

a plum in your mouth
Someone who speaks with an upper-class accent is said to have a plum in their mouth.
"He speaks just like an aristocrat - with a plum in his mouth!"

a pocket of resistance
A small group of people you resist change or disagree with a proposal form a pocket of resistance.
"The new boss wants to introduce job-sharing, but there's a pocket of resistance in the sales department."

deep pockets
A person or organisation who has a lot of money has deep pockets.
"Andy's business is not doing well at the moment. He says he needs a friend with deep pockets!"

have someone in your pocket
If you have influence or power over someone, you have them in your pocket.
"He was declared 'not guilty', but everyone knew that he had the jury in his pocket."

poetic justice
Poetic justice is an ideal form of justice in which virtue is rewarded and evil punished, often in a particularly appropriate manner, by an ironic twist of fate.
"It is poetic justice that the country responsible for the ecological disaster should suffer most from its effects."

point of no return
When you reach the point of no return, you must continue what you have started, because you have gone so far that it is impossible to go back.
"I've resigned from teaching and decided to become a writer. Now I've reached the point of no return and must work on the book I am writing."

beside the point
If something is beside the point, it does not relate to the topic or is irrelevant.
"We need to know if he's qualified for the job. The fact that he plays golf is beside the point!"

come/get to the point
If you come or get the point, you reach or concentrate on the essential part or the heart of the matter.
"We don't need a long explanation Barry. Just get to the point!"

sore point
A sore point is a subject to be avoided because it causes anger or embarrassment.
"Don't talk to Mary about weight - that's a sore point!"

poker face
Someone who has a poker face has an expressionless face that shows no emotion or reaction at all.
"He sat with a poker face all through the show, revealing nothing of his thoughts."

polish off
If you polish something off, you finish it quickly or easily.
"Susan thought there was too much food but the boys polished it off in no time."

politically correct
When people are politically correct, they carefully choose the language they use in order to avoid offending particular groups of people.
"Most people today make a conscious effort to be politically correct."

pop one's clogs
This is a euphemistic way of saying that a person is dead.
"Nobody lives in that house since old Roger popped his clogs."

pop the question
When you ask someone to marry you, you pop the question.
"It was during a trip to Venice that Sam popped the question."

is the Pope Catholic?
This is a sarcastic way of answering a question in the affirmative when the answer is obviously 'yes'.
"Do birds fly?"  "Of course they do. Is the Pope Catholic?"

any port in a storm
When you are in difficulty, any port in a storm refers to a solution you accept which in normal circumstances you would find unacceptable.
"The hotel was substandard, but it was a case of any port in a storm; all the others were full."

go postal
If someone goes postal, they lost their temper and express their anger in a violent way.
"My parents will go postal when they see the state of the house!"

pot luck
If you take pot luck, you accept whatever is available without knowing what it will be like.
"We were so hungry we decided to take pot luck and stopped at the first restaurant we saw."

pot calling the kettle black
This expression is used in a situation where a person with a fault denounces someone else for having the same fault.
"After being disqualified for not obeying the rules, the player accused another competitor of cheating; it was the pot calling the kettle black!"

hot potato
A hot potato is a very sensitive and controversial matter which is difficult to deal with.
"The new Prime Minister hasn't been confronted with any hot potatoes yet."

drop like a hot potato
If you drop someone or something like a hot potato, you leave them or immediately stop associating with them.
"As soon as the unflattering article was published, she dropped him like a hot potato."

small potatoes
Something that is small potatoes is considered to be unimportant or insignificant.
"Her first publication was considered small potatoes but her new book has lead to a change of opinion."

pound the pavement
Someone who pounds the pavement walks the streets or goes from company to company, usually in search of employment.
(You can also pound the pavement in an effort to raise funds or gain support for a cause.)
"Charlie is out there pounding the pavement since he lost his job."

pour cold water (on something)
If you pour cold water on someone's plans, opinions or ideas, you discourage them by showing little enthusiasm or expression your misgivings.
"The committee poured cold water on the idea of accepting new members."

pour your heart out
If you pour your heart out to someone, you express your feelings freely.
"When she needs to pour her heart out to someone, Elsa goes to visit her grandmother."

pour water into a sieve
If someone spends time or energy trying to do something that is inefficient or useless, it is like pouring water into a sieve.
"Danny's mother used to say that teaching him good behaviour was like pouring water into a sieve."

power behind the throne
Someone with no apparent authority who has great influence over the person officially in charge is said to be the power behind the throne.
"It's essential to be on good terms with his wife. Apparently she's the power behind the throne."

preaching to the converted
A person who preaches to the converted is encouraging people to support an idea that they already agree with.
"Talking to athletes about the virtues of sport is preaching to the converted."

pregnant pause
A pregnant pause is a moment of silence full of unexpressed meaning.
"There was a pregnant pause before the president answered the journalist's question."

prepare the ground
When you prepare the ground, you try to make it easier for a future event or action to happen or be accepted.
"The two foreign ministers prepared the ground for negotiations."

press home
If you press something home, you insist on a point in a discussion or argument.
"Her lawyer kept pressing home the fact that she was a single mother."

pressed for time
If you are pressed for time, you have hardly enough time to do something, so you must hurry.
"Sorry, I can't talk to you now. I'm a bit pressed for time."

(as) pretty as a picture
Someone who is (as) â€œpretty as a pictureâ€™ is very attractive or appealing in appearance.
"The young bride looked (as) pretty as a picture in her beautiful dress."

cost a pretty penny
If something costs a pretty penny, it costs a lot of money.
"Steve's new car must have cost a pretty penny!"

prey on your mind
If something preys on your mind, it troubles you so much that you keep thinking about it.
"The vision of the house on fire kept preying on her mind."

price yourself out of the market
If you price yourself out of the market, you charge such a high price for your goods or services that nobody wants to buy them.
"He was so eager to make money that he priced himself out of the market."

price you have to pay
The price you have to pay is what you have to endure in return for something you gain or achieve.
"Lack of privacy is the price you have to pay for being a celebrity."

prick up your ears
If you prick up your ears, you suddenly pay attention to what is being said.
"The children prick up their ears when they hear the word 'ice-cream'."

the prime of one's life
Theprime of one's life is the time in a person's life when they are the most successful, or in their best physical condition.
"At the age of 75, the singer is not exactly in the prime of his life!"

get your priorities right
If you put things in the right order of importance, you get your priorities right.
"Dad! Your health is more important than the state of the garden. You must get your priorities right!"

prod into (doing something)
If you prod someone into doing something, you make a hesitant person do something that they are reluctant to do.
"Elsa was ideal for the job, but I had to prod her into applying for the position."

(a low) profile
A person who keeps a low profile tries not to attract public attention.
"The investor is a discreet man who keeps a low profile."

prolong the agony
If someone prolongs the agony, they make an unpleasant or tense situation last longer than necessary.
"Please don't prolong the agony. Just tell me whether I've been accepted or not."

proof of the pudding (is in the eating)
This expression means that something new can only be judged after it has been tested.
"I'm going to try out my new DVD player. The proof of the pudding is in the eating, as we all know!"

proper 'do'
This expression refers to a social event with formal clothes and top-class catering, organised to celebrate something.
"Bob says he'd be happy with a civil wedding and a drink afterwards, but Maggie wants a proper do."

proud as a peacock
A person who is asproud as a peacock is extremely proud.
"When his son won first prize, Bill was as proud as a peacock."

pull a fast one
To pull a fast one means to gain an advantage over someone by deceiving them.
"The street vendor pulled a fast one on Tom. He sold him a big bunch of roses but wrapped a smaller bunch while Tom was taking out his wallet."

pull (someone's) leg
If you pull somebody's leg, you tease them by telling them something that is not true.
"Of course I'm not going to buy a sports car. I was just pulling your leg!"

pull no punches
If someone pulls no punches, they speak openly and honestly, holding nothing back.
"The doctor pulled no punches. He explained in detail the risks of the operation."

pull out all the stops
If you pull out all the stops, you do everything you can to make something successful.
"We'll have to pull out all the stops to get the store ready for the opening day."

pull the other one (it's got bells on)
After hearing an unlikely story, this is a way of telling the speaker that you neither believe what they say nor whatever they may say next.
"You have a date with George Clooney? Yeah - now pull the other one!"

pull strings
If someone pulls strings, they use influential friends in order to obtain an advantage.
"David found a job easily - his father just pulled a few strings."

pull through
If you pull through, you recover from a serious illness.
"Doris had to undergo heart surgery but she pulled through."

pull the rug (from under someone's feet)
If you pull the rug from under someone's feet, you suddenly and unexpectedly remove all help or support.
"When Andy's mother stopped sending him money, she pulled the rug from under his feet and forced him to find a job."

pull your weight
To say that somebody pulls their weight means that they do their fair share of the work.
"It's great working with Sandra. She always pulls her weight."

(like) pulling teeth
Something that islike pulling teeth is extremely difficult to obtain, especially if trying to extract information from someone.
"Getting him to talk about his job was like pulling teeth!"

punch above your weight
If you punch above your weight, you try to perform at a level that is beyond your ability.
"Emily submitted her idea for the 'invention of the year' award, knowing that she was punching above her weight."

punch line
The punch line is the funny sentence that ends a joke or an amusing story.
"When my dad tells jokes, he never gets the punch line right!"

push the envelope
When you push the envelope, you do something in an extreme way or exceed the limits of what is considered acceptable.
"Some TV producers really push the envelope when they expose people's private lives."

push your luck
If you , you try to get more than what you have already obtained and risk spoiling the situation.
"You've got your father's permission to go to the concert. Don't push your luck by trying to borrow his car!"

if push comes to shove
The expression 'if push comes to shove' refers to what you will do if the situation becomes critical and you have to take action.
"There should be enough room for everyone, but if push comes to shove we can go to the hotel."

pushing up the daisies
To say that someone is pushing up the daisies means that they are dead.
"Old Johnny Barnes? He's been pushing up the daisies for over 10 years!"

put/lay one's cards on the table
If you put your cards on the table, you speak honestly and openly about your feelings and intentions.
"Let's clean the air and put our cards on the table."

put a damper on (something)
If someone or something puts a damper on a situation or event, they do something to make it less successful or enjoyable.
"The party was going great until the neighbours' complaints put a damper on it."

put a spanner in the works
To put a spanner in the works (or throw a (monkey) wrench) means to cause problems and prevent something from happening as planned.
"A new motorway was planned but a group of ecologists managed to put a spanner in the works."

put it mildly
If you put it mildly, you express your opinion or reaction in a controlled way, without exaggeration.
"She's 3 years old and already able to read. That's promising, to put it mildly!"

put on a brave face
When confronted with difficulties, if you put on a brave face, you try to look cheerful and pretend that the situation is not as bad as it is.
"Even in the worst of times she put on a brave face."

put on ice
If a project or plan is put on ice, all further action has been suspended or postponed for an indefinite period of time.
"Plans for the nuclear power station have been put on ice."

put your best foot forward
If someone puts their best foot forward, they do something as fast as they can.
"It's a long way to the station, but if I put my best foot forward I should catch the next train"

put one's feet up
When you put your feet up, you sit down and relax.
"You must be tired. Come in and put your feet up."

put one's foot down
To put one's foot down means to exert authority to prevent something from happening.
"The child wanted to sleep on the sofa but his father put his foot down and sent him to bed."

put your foot in your mouth
If you put your foot in your mouth, you say something that offends, upsets or embarrasses someone.
"Lisa really put her foot in her mouth when she mentioned the housewarming party - Andy hadn't been invited."

put your head on the block
If you put yourself in a dangerous situation where you risk losing your job or your reputation if things go wrong, you put your head on the block.
"Jenny asked me to recommend her son for the job, but I'm not putting my head on the block for someone I hardly know."

put your heart into (something)
If you put your heart (and soul) into something, you are very enthusiastic and invest a lot of energy and hard work in it.
"Paul was determined to make a success of the project. He put his heart and soul into it."

put your house in order
If you tell someone to put their house in order, you are saying that they should organise their own affairs or take care of their own problems before giving advice to other people.
"You should put your house in order before telling me what to do!"

put someone in their place
If someone causes offence or irritation by speaking or behaving in an inappropriate manner, you put them in their place by letting them know that they are not as important as they seem to believe.
"The new trainee is not in a position to comment on our methods. He needs to be put in his place!"

put in a good word
If you put in a good word for someone, you say positive things in support of that person in order to help them.
"If you apply for the job, I'll put in a good word for you."

put (someone) in the picture
If you give somebody all the information necessary to enable them to fully understand a situation, you put them in the picture.
"Some changes were made during your absence. Let me put you in the picture."

put (something) on the long finger
If you put something on the long finger,you postpone it indefinitely.
"My sister intends to go back to college, but she keeps putting it on the long finger."

put (someone) on the spot
If you put someone on the spot, you put them in an uncomfortable position, for example by asking difficult questions which they cannot avoid.
"The reporter was put on the spot when he was asked to reveal his source."

put on your thinking cap
If you tell someone to put their thinking cap on, you ask them to find an idea or solve a problem by thinking about it.
"Now here's this week's quiz; it's time to put on your thinking caps!"

put out feelers
Before doing something, if you try to discover what other people thnk about it by making discreet enquiries, you put out feelers.
"The politician put out feelers to test public reaction to his proposals."

put out to pasture
To say that someone has been put out to pasture means that they have been forced to retire or give up their responsibilities.
"My father is in good health and he feels it's too early to be put out to pasture."

put pants on one leg at a time
To say that someoneputs their pants on one leg at a time means that the person is a human being no different from enyone else.
"Don't be scared to speak to him. He puts his pants on one leg at a time just like the rest of us!"

put your shoulder to the wheel
If you put your shoulder to the wheel, you start putting a lot of effort into a difficult task.
"We'll have to put our shoulders to the wheel to deliver the goods on time."

put that in your pipe and smoke it
This expression means that you have to accept what the speaker says, whether you like it or not.
"I'm not going to buy you a scooter, so put that in your pipe and smoke it!"

put the kibosh on
If you do something to prevent a plan or activity from happening or developing, you put the kibosh on it.
"The bank's refusal to grant him a loan put the kibosh on Jack's project."

put the squeeze on
If you put the squeeze on someone, you put pressure on them to force them to do something.
"Bob was reluctant to work with Ben until the boss put the squeeze on him."

put through one's paces
If you put someone or something through their paces, you test their ability to do something by making them perform certain actions.
"During the presentation, the new machine was put through its paces."

put two and two together
A person who canput two and two together is capable of reaching the right conclusion based on the information they have.
"Forget your explanation. She won't believe you. She can put two and two together!"

put words in someone's mouth
If you claim that someone has said something, or suggest what they should say, you are putting words in their mouth.
"You're putting words in my mouth. I did not say I saw Mr. Brown. I said I saw his car!"

Pyrrhic victory
A victory that is obtained at a tremendous cost, or causes such a great loss that it is not worth winning, is called a Pyrrhic victory.
"It was a Pyrrhic victory. The shop owner won the lawsuit but went bankrupt because of the legal expenses involved."

quaking in one's boots 
When someone is extremely scared, it is said that they are quaking in their boots.
"When Mike saw the crocodiles in the water, he started quaking in his boots."

in a quandary 
If you are in a quandary, you find it difficult to decide what to do.
"The job offered is less interesting but better paid. I'm in a quandary about what to do."

(put a) quart into a pint pot 
To say that you can't put a quart into a pint pot means that you cannot fit something too big into a small space, or that you are trying to do something impossible.
"You'll never get that into the suitcase. You can't put a quart into a pint pot!"

quick temper 
Someone who has a quick temper gets angry very easily.
"The manager makes me nervous - he's got such a quick temper."

on the QT  (the first and last letters of 'quiet')
If something is done on the QT, it is done quietly or in a secretive manner.
"They got married on the QT last summer and told nobody."

quick and dirty 
A hasty method or solution, usually cheap and temporary, that is not without flaws.
"Tom refused the quick-and-dirty repair job proposed by the builder. He wanted the roof to comply with the specifications in the contract."

quick as a dog can lick a dish 
If you do something surprisingly fast, you do it as quick as a dog can lick a dish.
"He packed his bag as quick as a dog can lick a dish."

quick as a flash
If you do something quick as a flash, you do it very quickly.
"Quick as a flash, the boy snatched the manâ€™s wallet and jumped off the bus."

(no) quick fix 
To say that there is no quick fix to a problem means that there is no simple solution.
"There is no quick fix for unemployment; major reforms are necessary."

quick off the mark 
If someone is quick off the mark, they are quick to react to an event or take advantage of an opportunity.
"You've got to be quick off the mark when stores announce special offers."

quick/slow on the uptake 
Someone who is quick or slow on the uptake is quick or slow to understand what is meant.
"Please explain the problem in simple words - I'm a bit slow on the uptake!"

quiet as a mouse 
When someone is as quiet as a mouse, they make no noise at all.
"The burglar was as quiet as a mouse as he moved around the house."

call it quits 
When people temporarily stop doing something or put an end to an activity, they call it quits.
"OK, we're all exhausted, so let's call it quits for today."

race against time 
When someone is in a race against time, they have to work very quickly in order to do or finish something before a certain time.
"It was a race against time to get everything ready for the inauguration."

rack one's brains 
If you rack your brains, you try very hard to think of something or to remember something.
"Christmas is always a hassle for me. I have to rack my brains every year to find ideas for presents."

(go to) rack and ruin  
If something goes to rack and ruin, it deteriorates or falls into serious decline until it reaches a state of complete destruction.
"When the factory closed down, the building was to left to go to rack and ruin."

on the rack 
If you are in a stressful situation, having to answer a lot of questions or wait for a decision, you are on the rack.
"The suspect was put on the rack by the police but he did not confess to anything."

racked with pain 
When someone is suffering from severe pain, they are racked with pain.
"The soldier was so badly injured that he was racked with pain."

(from) rags to riches 
If a person goes from rags to riches, they start off being very poor and become very rich and successful.
"By renovating old houses in the right places, he went from rags to riches."

(take a) rain check  
To say that you take a rain check means that you cannot accept an invitation or offer now, but you will be happy to accept it later.
"Do you mind if I take a rain check on that lunch invitation? I'm going to be away all week."

it never rains but it pours 
This expression is used to comment on the fact that when something bad happens, other bad things often happen too, and make the situation even worse.
"First he forgot his briefcase, then he lost his wallet, and when he reached the car park, his car had been stolen - it never rains but it pours!"

raining cats and dogs  
If it's raining cats and dogs, it is raining very heavily.
"We'll have to cancel the picnic I'm afraid - it's raining cats and dogs."

raise eyebrows 
Someone who raises their eyebrows at something shows surprise or disapproval by the expression on their face.
"When the boss arrived in jeans, there were a lot of raised eyebrows."

raise the roof  
When people raise the roof, they make a lot of noise by cheering, shouting, whistling or clapping their hands.
"The concert was such a success, the audience raised the roof."

raise/lower one's sights 
If you raise/lower your sights, your raise or lower your expectations, or you are more or less ambitious.
"He had to lower his sights and accept a less well-paid job than what he hoped for."

rake over the ashes  
When people rake over the ashes, they discuss an unpleasant event which took place in the past.
"My grandfather's business went bankrupt years go, but he still rakes over the ashes from time to time."

rake in the money 
If you rake in the money, you make money in large quantities.
"Bob's business is so successful, he's raking in the money."

ram something down someone's throat
If you ram something down someone's throat, you force them to accept something against their will.
"I encourage him to learn English but I can't ram it down his throat."

rant and rave
If you rant and rave about something, you protest noisily and forcefully.
"The old man ranted and raved about the new waste collection system, but he had to accept it."

rap on/across the knuckles
If someone gets a rap on/across the knuckles, they are punished or reprimanded, but not very severely, as a reminder not to do something again.
"Andy got a rap on the knuckles for coming home late."

take the rap
If you take the rap for something, you accept blame or punishment for it, even if you have not done it.
"The whole class had to take the rap for the disorder."

in raptures
If you are in raptures about something, you are delighted or very enthusiastic.
"Caroline is in raptures about her new apartment."

raring to go
If someone is raring to go, they are very eager and enthusiastic about the idea of doing something.
"The kids can't wait to go camping. They're raring to go!"

smell a rat
To say 'I smell a rat' means that you suspect that something is wrong, or that someone is doing something dishonest or incorrect.
"The profits announced are abnormally low. I smell a rat."

rats in the attic
If you say that someone has rats in the attic, you mean that they are a bit mad or that their behaviour is eccentric.
"She keeps repeating the same question. I think she's got rats in the attic."

rather you than me
This expression is used to express sympathy with someone who has to do something unpleasant or difficult, and you would not like to be in their situation.
"I have to announce the bad new to the child's parents."
"Oh dear, rather you than me."

reach for the moon
If you reach for the moon, you are very ambitious and try to achieve something even if it is difficult.
"His parents were hardworking people who encouraged their children to reach for the moon."

reach saturation point
When something reaches saturation point, it is so full that nothing more can be added.
"That's enough information for today. My brain has reached saturation point!"

read the riot act
If you declare with force and authority that something must stop, and announce the consequences if it happens again, you read the riot act.
"Dad read us the riot act when we messed up his tool-shed."

ready and waiting
Something or someone that is ready and waiting is prepared and available for a particular task or occasion.
"There was a vast amount of food ready and waiting for the guests."

ready to drop
Someone who is ready to drop is nearly too exhausted to stay standing.
"I've been shopping all day with Judy. I'm ready to drop!"

reap the harvest
If you reap the harvest, you benefit or suffer as a direct result of past actions.
"When Jimmy won his first match, he began to reap the harvest of all the hard training."

rear its ugly head
If something unpleasant reappears after lying dormant for some time, it rears its ugly head.
"It is feared that fascism is rearing its ugly head again in some countries."

recharge one's batteries
When you recharge your batteries, you take a break from a tiring or stressful activity in order to relax and recover your energy.
"Sam is completely overworked. He needs a holiday to recharge his batteries."

recipe for disaster
If you refer to a plan or idea as a recipe for disaster, you think it is likely to produce bad results.
"Our two families together for Christmas? Sounds like a recipe for disaster!"

put the records straight
If you put or set the records straight, you provide facts or an explanation to correct a mistake or misunderstanding.
"An interview on television enabled the actress to set the records straight about her health."

red carpet
To roll out the red carpet means to give special treatment to an important or honoured visitor.
"The management is going to roll out the red carpet for the visit of the Nobel prize winner."

red flag to a bull
To say that a statement or action is like a red flag to a bull means that it is sure to make someone very angry or upset.
"Don't mention Tom's promotion to Mike. That would be like a red flag to a bull!"

red herring
A red herringis a fact or argument introduced into a discussion which draws attention away from the main point.
"Look, bureaucracy is a red herring. How to deal with the crisis is the important issue today."

red light district
An area of a town or city where there is a concentration of sex shops, prostitution, strip clubs, etc. is known as the red light district.
"A photograph of the politician taken in a red-light district caused a scandal."

red tape
The term red tape refers to official rules and bureaucratic paperwork that prevent things from being done quickly.
"If there wasn't so much red tape, the company would be up and running already."

in the red
If a person or organisation is in the red, they owe money or have a negative account.
"I'm afraid I can't lend you any money. I'm in the red myself."

paint the town red
If you paint the town red, you go out and enjoy a lively evening in bars, night-clubs, etc.
"To celebrate the victory, the team's supporters painted the town red."

see red
If someone sees red, they suddenly become very angry or annoyed.
"Discrimination of any kind makes me see red."

caught red-handed
If a person is caught red-handed, they are caught while they are doing something wrong or illegal.
"The boy was caught red-handed stealing chocolate in the supermarket."

redress the balance
An effort to redress the balance is an attempt to make things equal.
"With too few girls entering university, the authorities declared that an effort would be made to redress the balance."

reduce to tears
If your behaviour or attitude makes someone cry, you reduce them to tears.
"The teacher's criticism of her presentation so harsh that she was reduced to tears."

refresh someone's memory
If you refresh someone's memory, you remind them of facts they seem to have forgotten.
"Let me refresh your memory - you've already missed three classes this term."

regain your composure
If you regain your composure, you calm down and control your emotions again after a stressful or upsetting event.
"It took her a while to regain her composure after hearing the insulting remarks."

regain your feet
If you regain your feet, you stand up again after stumbling or falling.
This expression can also mean that you are once again financially solvent after a difficult period.
"John helped his father to regain his feet when he tripped on the steps."

remains to be seen
If something is still unknown or a decision has not yet been taken, it remains to be seen.
"The construction of a new hospital has been voted, but the exact location remains to be seen."

the rest is history
This is a way of saying that there is need to finish a story because everyone knows what happened next.
"Facebook was launched in 2004 and was initially restricted to students from Harvard, and the rest is history ..."

ride someone's coattails
If you use your connections with someone successful in order to achieve fame or success for yourself, without any personal effort, you ride their coattails.
"He rode his uncle's coattails in the hope of being elected."

ride roughshod
If you ride roughshod over something, you behave in a harsh or thoughtless manner, or you treat a situation with contempt.
"The government rode roughshod over all opposition to the new measures."

ride it out / ride out the storm
If you manage to survive a dangerous or very unpleasant situation, like a ship sailing through a storm, you ride it out.
"His business was hit by the recession but he managed to ride it out."

let something ride
When you decide to do nothing about a particular situation and allow it to remain as it is, you let it ride.
"Bill didn't like the way his wife spoke to the operator, but he let it ride to avoid another quarrel"

take for a ride
To take someone for a ride means to cheat or deceive them.
"I discovered he had charged me double the normal fee. He really took me for a ride!"

riding high
Someone who is riding high is enjoying a period of success or popularity.
"He's been riding high since the success of his last film."

(as) right as rain
If someone is (as) right as rain, they are in excellent health or condition.
"I called to see my grandmother thinking she was ill, but she was as right as rain."

right up your alley
If something is right up your alley, it is the sort of thing you like or have knowledge about.
"You like cooking, do you? This book will be right up your alley."

ring a bell
If something rings a bell, it sounds familiar, but you don't remember the exact details.
"John Bentley? The name rings a bell but I don't remember him."

ring out the old year and ring in the new
This expression means to announce and celebrate the end of one year and the beginning of the next.

a rip-off
To say that something is a rip-off means that it costs much more than it should.
"$15 for an orange juice? That's a rip-off!"

a ripe old age
This expression means to live until you are very old.
"If you lead a healthy life you'll live to a ripe old age." said the doctor."

ripple effect
When an action has an effect on something, which in turn effects something else, it is said to have a ripple effect.
"An increase in the price of oil will have a ripple effect on the economy as a whole."

rise to the occasion
If you rise to the occasion, you manage to do something successfully in difficult circumstances.
"When her boss broke his leg, Julie had to represent the company at the congress, and she rose to the occasion extremely well"

risk life and limb
If you risk life and limb, you are in danger of death or serious injury.
"The roads are icy today; you'll risk life and limb if you go by car."

road rage
Aggressive driving habits sometimes resulting in violence against other drivers is called road rage.
"A number of accidents today are a direct result of road rage."

middle of the road (MOR)
This term refers to anything moderate, unadventurous or inoffensive that avoids extremes and appeals to the majority of people.
"He's a successful middle-of-the-road entertainer. My mother wouldn't miss a show!"

a roaring trade
If you do a roaring trade, your business is very successful.
"Cosmetic surgeons are doing a roaring trade these days."

rob the cradle
If you rob the cradle, you have a romantic relationship with someone who is much younger than yourself.
"My uncle Ted is dating a twenty-year-old girl. Now that's really robbing the cradle!"

rob Peter to pay Paul
If someone robs Peter to pay Paul, they pay one debt with money borrowed from someone else, thus creating another debt.
"David borrowed from a friend to pay his overdraft, a typical case of robbing Peter to pay Paul."

don't rock the boat
If you tell someonenot to rock the boat, you are asking them to do nothing that might cause trouble or upset a stable situation.
"After the recent riots, it was decided not to rock the boat by introducing strict measures."

rocket science / rocket scientist
If you say 'it's not rocket science' or 'no need to be a rocket scientist', you stress the fact that something presents no major difficulty.
"Bob will explain how it works. Don't worry - it's not rocket science!"

roll up your sleeves
When you roll up your sleeves, you get ready for hard work.
"The house was in a mess after the party so we had to roll up our sleeves and start cleaning."

roll with the punches
When someone has to roll with the punches, they have to deal with a difficult situation by being flexible.
"The atmosphere has become very aggressive. We'll just have to roll with the punches."

rolling in money
Someone who is very wealthy or has access to great amounts of money is rolling in money.
"Steve has no financial problems. His parents are rolling in money."

when in Rome, do as the Romans do
This expression means that you should adopt the customs of the people or country you are visiting, and behave in the same way.

go through the roof
If someone goes through the roof, they become very angry.
"His father nearly went through the roof when Paul damaged his new car."

root and branch
If an action is performed thoroughly or completely, it is done 'root and branch'.
"The causes of the disease must be eliminated root and branch."

rooted to the spot
If you are so shocked, surprised or scared that you are rooted to the spot, you reaction is so strong that you are unable to move.
"Joe stood rooted to the spot as the plane landed on the water."

rotten apple
This term refers to a person who is considered to be dishonest or immoral and has a bad influence on others in the group.
"It is said that in any profession there is always a rotten apple."

rough and ready
Something which is rough and ready is adequate but rather rudimentary or unrefined.
"The accommodation is rough and ready but the scenery is fantastic!"

rough diamond
A person who is good-natured but lacks polished manners and/or education is said to be a rough diamond.
"He's a great guy but a bit of a rough diamond!"

rough justice
Treatment or justice that does not seem fair, or is too severe, is called 'rough justice', especially if it is not legal.
"The way the player was treated by the media was very rough justice!"

take the rough with the smooth
If you take the rough with the smooth, you accept what is unpleasant or difficult as well as what is pleasant or easy.
"Life isn't always easy; you have to learn to take the rough with the smooth."

rub shoulders (with)
If you rub shoulders with someone, you have an opportunity to meet and talk to that person, especially someone wealthy, famous or distinguished.
"In her job in public relations, she sometimes rubs shoulders with famous people."

(when the) rubber hits the road
The moment when you put a theory into practice, or actually apply what you have learned, is when the rubber hits the road.
"The plan sounds good. I'd like to be there when the rubber hits the road."

rue the day
If you rue the day you did something, you bitterly regret what you did that day.
"Lea's father disapproved of Tony. He said she would rue the day she married him."

sweep (something) under rug
If you sweep something under the rug (or carpet), you try to hide it because it is embarrassing.
"The family tried unsuccessfully to sweep the scandal under the rug."

rule the roost
If you rule the roost, you are the most important and powerful person in a group or community.
"Officially David runs the company, but it's his father who rules the roost."

bend the rules
If a person bends the rules, they change the rules in order to help somebody.
"An hour is an hour" said the car park attendant who refused to bend the rules."

run down
A person who is run down is in poor physical condition.
"She's completely run down from lack of proper food.."

run the gamut of (something)
If you run the gamut of something, you cover the entire range of what is possible.
"My father enjoys reading. His taste runs the gamut from popular novels to poetry."

run with the hare and hunt with the hounds
If you run with the hare and hunt with the hounds, you want to stay on friendly terms with both sides in a quarrel.
"Bob always wants to keep everyone happy, but he can't run with the hare and hunt with the hounds this time - the issue is too important."

run riot
If people run riot, the behave in a wild, uncontrolled manner, running around in all directions.
"I dread the arrival of my sister with her kids - she always allows them to run riot."

run rings (or circles) around
If you show much more skill or ability than your opponent, you run rings (or circles) around them.
"In a quiz show on TV yesterday, a teenage girl ran rings around the other contestants."

run round in circles
People who run round in circles have difficulty in achieving something because of lack of organisation.
"Running round in circles will get us nowhere - we need to set up a plan."

runs in the family
This refers to a physical or moral characteristic that is common to many members of a family.
"Black hair and blue eyes - the combination runs in the family."

run a taut ship
When a group or organisation is run in a well-ordered and disciplined manner, the person in charge runs a taut (or tight) ship.
"The director of the scout camp runs a taut ship."

run a mile
Someone who is anxious to avoid something runs a mile.
"She said she'd run a mile if she saw reporters in the area."

run-of-the-mill
If something is described as run-of-the-mill, there is nothing special or outstanding about it; it is just ordinary or average.
"The story wasn't very interesting - just a run-of-the-mill romance with a happy ending."

run out of steam
If you say that a person, a process or an organised event is running out of steam, you mean that there is a loss of impetus, energy or enthusiasm.
"The anti-immigrant movement seems to be running out of steam."

(a) running battle
If two people or groups have a running battle with each other, they argue or disagree about something over a long period of time.
"There's been a running battle between the local authorities and the population over the school bus route."

in a rut
If you are in a rut, you have a monotonous and boring way of life.
"If you feel you're in a rut, why not look for a new job?"

get the sack / be sacked 
If someone gets the sack, they lose their job, usually because they have done something wrong.
"Charlie got the sack when his boss caught him stealing."

saddled with debt 
If you are saddled with debt, the amount of money that you owe is a financial burden.
"Be careful. If you buy a house that is too expensive, you could be saddled with debt for many years."

safe bet 
To say that something is a safe bet means that it is very likely to happen.
"It's a safe bet that you'll get a good job if you graduate from one of the top universities."

(in) safe hands 
If something is in safe hands, it is being looked after by a reliable person or organisation, and is therefore at no risk.
"I'll look after Jamie while you go shopping. Don' worry - he'll be in safe hands."

(on the) safe side 
If you do something to be on the safe side, you do it as a precaution, to avoid any risks.
"I think I locked the door but I'll check again to be on the safe side."

safety in numbers 
This expression means that being part of a group makes people feel more secure and more confident when taking action.
"Noone in the group went sightseeing alone, knowing there was safety in numbers."

sail close to the wind 
If you sail close to the wind, you do something dangerous or act just within the limits of what is legal or acceptable.
"Fred seems to invest his money well, although he often sails close to the wind."

sail through 
If you sail through something, for example a test or an exam, you succeed in doing it without difficulty.
"The English test was no problem for Pedro. He sailed through it."

take the wind out of oneâ€™s sails 
If someone or something takes the wind out of your sails, they make you feel less confident by doing or saying something that you do not expect.
"The manager's rejection of our marketing strategy really took the wind out of our sails."

rub salt into the wound 
If you are in a difficult or unpleasant situation, and somebody rubs salt into the wound, they do or say something to make things worse.
"The separation from Julie was already difficult for Alex. Mentioning her new boyfriend just rubbed salt into the wound."

salt of the earth 
To describe someone as the salt of the earth means that they are kind, honest and reliable.
"Mrs. Brown is the salt of the earth, always ready to give a helping hand."

take something with pinch of salt 
To say that a piece of information should be taken with a pinch (or grain) of salt means that the information may not be accurate or true.
"Tony tends to exaggerate. I take everything he says with a pinch of salt."

(in the) same boat 
If two or more people are in the same boat, they are in the same unpleasant or difficult situation.
"When the factory closed down, the workers all found themselves in the same boat."

same old story 
This expression refers to an unpleasant situation that frequently occurs in the same way as before.
"Why am I annoyed with my brother ? Itâ€™s the same old story: he borrows money from me and Â« forgets Â» to pay me back!"

(on the) same page/wavelength 
If you are on the same page or the same wavelength as someone else, you have the same understanding or think in a similar way.
"We rarely argue. We're generally on the same wavelength."

by the same token
If you apply the same rule to different situations, you judge them by the same token, or in a similar way.
"Teenagers should be less rebellious, but by the same token, parents should be more understanding."

sauce for the goose
The saying 'what's sauce for the goose is sauce for the gander' means that what is appropriate for one person should also be appropriate for the other person concerned
"Women should earn the same salary as men for the same job. What's sauce for the goose is sauce for the gander!"

save your bacon
If you save someone's bacon, you rescue them from a dangerous or difficult situation.
"When Paul was a student, finding a room in return for dog-sitting really saved his bacon!"

save your breath
If you tell someone to save their breath, you are telling them not to waste their time speaking because their words will have no effect.
"I've already given him the same advice and he won't listen, so you might as well save your breath."

save the day
If you find a solution to a serious problem, and ensure the success of something that was expected to fail, you save the day.
"The dog ate the apple pie I had made for my guests, but my sister saved the day by making one of her speedy desserts!"

save face
When someone saves face, they manage to avoid humiliation or embarrassment and preserve their dignity and the respect of others.
"They allowed him to save face by accepting his resignation."

save your skin (or neck)
If you manage to escape from serious danger or trouble, you save your skin (or neck).
"He saved his skin by reversing off the bridge just before it collapsed"

saved by the bell
If you are saved by the bell, something happens at the last minute to rescue you from a difficult situation.
"Saved by the bell! A friend arrived just when I noticed that I had no coins for the parking meter."

saving grace
A person who hasa saving grace has a quality that prevents them from being totally bad.
"She's a horrible person but she has one saving grace, her kindness to animals."

say a mouthful
If you make an important or lengthy remark, you say a mouthful.
"The customer said a mouthful when he gave the reason for his dissatisfaction."

scales fall from your eyes
When the scales fall from your eyes, you finally understand the truth about something.
"It was only when he was arrested for theft that the scales fell from my eyes and I understood where his money came from."

scarce as hen's teeth
To say that something is as scarce as hen's teeth stresses the fact that it is extremely rare, to the point of non-existence.
"Take enough supplies. Water is as scarce as hen's teeth where you're going!"

scare out of one's wits
If something scares you out of your wits, it makes you very frightened or worried.
"The feeling that a house is haunted can scare people out of their wits."

scare the daylights out of someone
If something scares the (living) daylights out of you, it terrifies you.
"The sudden screaming scared the daylights out of me."

scared stiff
Someone who is scared stiff is so frightened that they are unable to move.
"My mother is scared stiff of heights."

school of hard knocks
Someone who goes through the school of hard knocks learns through the positive and negative experiences of life rather than through a formal classroom education.
"He never went to college but the school of hard knocks made him a shrewd businessman."

get off scot-free
Someone who gets off scot-free escapes the punishment they deserve.
"We were all punished except James who managed to get off scot-free!"

scrape the bottom of the barrel
If you scrape the bottom of the barrel, you use the worst or the least satisfactory ideas, things or people because you have no choice.
"When they started to recruit, they had to scrape the bottom of the barrel because the best candidates had already found jobs elsewhere."

scratch the surface
When you only scratch the surface of a problem or subject, you deal with only a small part of it.
"Some countries are only scratching the surface of their environment problems."

not up to scratch
Something which is not up to scratch fails to reach the expected or required standard.
"The quality of the material is not up to scratch. We'll have to change our suppliers."

scream blue murder
People who scream blue murder shout or complain very loudly as if something very serious has happened.
"The crowd started screaming blue murder when the football match was interrupted."

screw loose
If someone has a screw loose, their behaviour is strange and they appear slightly mad.
"The old lady wears a fur coat in the summer - she must have a screw loose!"

scrimp and save
If you scrimp and save, you spend as little as possible over a certain period of time in order to save money.
"The parents scrimped and saved for years so that their children could have a college education."

under (close) scrutiny
Someone or something that is under (close) scrutiny is being watched or examined carefully.
"The police are keeping the suspect under close scrutiny."

sea legs
A person who has or finds their sea legs is used to walking on a moving ship, or has the ability to adjust to a new situation.
"It takes a while in a new job to find your sea legs."

seal of approval
If a project or contract receives a seal of approval, it receives formal support or approval from higher authorities.
"We can't conclude the deal without the director's seal of approval."

come apart at the seams
To say that someone is coming apart at the seams means that they are extremely upset or under severe mental stress.
"Bob has had so many problems lately, he's coming apart at the seams."

seamy side of life
This expression refers to the most unpleasant, disreputable or sordid aspects of life that we normally do not see (just as the stitched seams of clothes are generally not seen).
"Social workers really see the seamy side of life."

(play) second fiddle
If you play second fiddle to another person, you accept to be second in importance to that person, or have a lower position.
"John resented having to play second fiddle to the sales manager when the company was restructured."

second a motion
During a meeting, if you second a motion, you formally agree with a proposal.
"She seconded the motion to introduce flexible working hours."

second nature
If something you do is second nature to you, it is something that you do easily or automatically because you have done it so often or for so long.
"Skiing is second nature to Harry. He grew up in a ski resort."

second to none
Something that is second to none is excellent or much better than any other.
"The service was perfect and the food was second to none."

(on) second thoughts
'On second thoughts' means that after giving the matter more thought, you have changed your mind.
"My idea was to move to an apartment, but on second thoughts, I'd rather have a garden."

see the colour of somebody's money
If you want to see the colour of somebody's money, you want to be sure that the person in question has enough money to pay you before you accept to do something.
"We want to see the colour of his money before shipping the goods."

see the error of your ways
When someone sees the error of their ways, they understand that what they are doing is wrong and accept to change their behaviour.
"The young man talked to a counsellor who tried to make him see the error of his ways"

see eye to eye
If you see eye to eye with somebody, you agree with them.
"I'm glad we see eye to eye on the choice of colour scheme."

see light at the end of the tunnel
If you see light at the end of the tunnel, you see signs of hope for the future after a long period of difficulty.
"Sales dropped heavily last year but we're beginning to see light at the end of the tunnel."

see something in a new light
If you see something in a new light, you view it in a way that makes you change the opinion you had before.
"After listening to my colleague, I began to see things in a new light."

see red
If someone sees red, they suddenly become very angry or annoyed.
"Discrimination of any kind makes me see red."

seeing is believing
This expression means that when you see something you can be sure it exists, or that what you have been told is really true.
"Mark says bananas grow in his garden, but seeing is believing!"

seen better days
If something has seen better days, it has aged visibly in comparison with when it was new.
"My much-travelled suitcase has seen better days!"

sell down the river
If you sell someone down the river, you betray a person who trusts you.
"When the trade union signed the salary agreement, the workers felt they had been sold down the river."

sell ice to Eskimos
This expression is used to describe a person who has the ability
to persuade someone to accept something totally unnecessary or useless.
"It's not surprising Mark was named 'salesman of the year'. He could sell ice to Eskimos!"

sell your soul
This is a humorous way of saying that you would be willing to do something morally or legally wrong to obtain what you want.
"He'd sell his soul to get an interview."

send someone about their business
If you tell someone, in an irritated or unfriendly way, to go away, you send them about their business.
"An insurance company representative keeps calling on my mother, but I told her to send him about his business."

send someone packing
If you send someone packing, you tell them to leave, in a very forceful and unfriendly way.
"When Amanda discovered that Jack was unfaithful, she sent him packing."

send a shiver down your spine
If something sends a shiver down your spine, it makes you feel anxious, nervous or excited.
"That song always sends a shiver down my spine!"

send up a trial balloon
If you test something such as an idea, a project or a product, to see how people respond to it, you send up a trial balloon.
"The idea seemed excellent but when they sent up a trial balloon the reaction was very negative."

(a) senior moment
A momentary lapse of memory, especially in older people, or an absent-minded action such as putting the cereals in the refrigerator, is humorously referred to as having a senior moment.
"I found my phone in the cupboard. I must have had a senior moment!"

separate the sheep from the goats
If you separate the sheep from the goats, you examine a group of people and decide which are suitable and which are not.
"Examining job applications is the first stage in separating the sheep from the goats."

set you back
The sum of money something sets you back is the amount it costs you.
"Changing the heating system will set us back about 5000â‚¬."

set in your ways
A person who is set in their ways is unable or unwilling to change their ideas, habits or methods, often because they are old.
"My grandmother has the same routine every day. She is very set in her ways."

set great store by (something)
When you consider something to be very important or valuable, you set great store by it.
"The company sets great store by its after-sales service."

set the records straight
If you set the records straight, you provide facts or an explanation
to correct a mistake or misunderstanding.
"An interview on television enabled the actress to set the records straight about her health."

set in stone
When something isset in stone, it is permanent and cannot be changed in any way.
"The agenda is not set in stone; we can add an item if need be."

set the stage
If you set the stage for an event or a development, you create conditions that allow it to happen.
"The agreement set the stage for their future working relationship."

settle a score
To settle a score is to retaliate against someone or take revenge for a past wrong.
"James has made an appointment with his lawyer - he needs to settle a score with someone."

(in) seventh heaven
If you are in seventh heaven, you are extremely happy.
"Every time she wins a match, she's in seventh heaven!"

shake like a leaf
If you shake like a leaf, you tremble with fear or nervousness.
"At the beginning of the interview the candidate was shaking like a leaf."

shank's pony
If you go somewhere on Shank's pony, you have to walk rather than travel by bus, car, etc.
"It was impossible to find a taxi after the party, so it was Shank's pony for us!"

shape of things to come
If something, such as a trend or fashion, is the shape of things to come, it is a sign of what is likely to be used or enjoyed by many people in the future.
"Do you think speed-dating is the shape of things to come?"

shape up or ship out
This expression is used to warn someone that if they do not improve, they will have to leave their job.
"When Tom started neglecting the customers, he was told to shape up or ship out."

in bad shape
A person who is in bad shape is in poor physical condition.
"Have you seen Terry recently? He's really in bad shape."

all shapes and sizes
Something that can be found in many different forms, types or varieties, comes in all shapes and sizes.
"Computers can be found in all shapes and sizes nowadays."

(get) back into shape
To get yourself back into shape, you need to take exercise in order to become fit and healthy again.
"Sarah booked into gym classes, determined to get back into shape."

(a) sharp cookie
Someone who is not easily fooled or deceived is a sharp cookie.
"You can't fool my grandmother. She's a sharp cookie!"

sharp practice
Trying to achieve something by using underhand, deceitful or dishonourable means, that are barely within the law, is called sharp practice.
"That company is under investigation for sharp practice so it's better to avoid dealing with them."

(as) sharp as a tack
A person who is as sharp as a tack is able to think quickly and learn very fast.
"You won't have to explain it to him twice. He's as sharp as a tack."

shed light
If you shed light on something, you help to explain it or make it easier to understand.
"It was hoped that the testimony of the witnesses would shed light on the causes of the accident."

shelf life
If something such as food, drink or medicine has a particular shelf life, it must be used or sold before the end of that period of time.
"Dairy products have quite a short shelf life."

come out of one's shell
To come out of one's shell means to be less shy or more talkative and outgoing.
"Gradually the new student started to come out of her shell."

shilly-shally
If you shilly-shally, you hesitate a lot about something and have difficulty reaching a decision.
"Come on! Don't shilly-shally - just make up your mind!"

that ship has sailed
The expression 'that ship has sailed' means that a particular opportunity has passed by and now it's too late.
"Is the offer still open?" "Sorry, that ship has sailed - you missed the opportunity!."

like ships that pass in the night
This expression refers to people who meet briefly and are not likely to meet again.
"The two men met once, like ships that pass in the night, and never met again."

(be) a stuffed shirt
A person who is a stuffed shirt behaves in a very formal, pompous or old-fashioned way .
"I had heard he was a stuffed shirt but he actually has a good sense of humour! "

keep your shirt on!
If you tell somebody to keep their shirt on, you are asking them to calm down.
"Keep your shirt on Bob. Just give your version of the story!"

(the) shoe is on the other foot
When the circumstances have reversed and one person is now doing what the other did in the past, you can say that the shoe is on the other foot.
"I used to advise my children to eat healthy food. Now my daughter is a nutritionist and the shoe in on the other foot - she advises me!"

if the shoe fits, wear it
This means that if someone feels that critical remark applies to them, then it does.
"I don't know if the boss was referring to you but if the shoe fits, wear it!"

in someone's shoes
To talk about being in someone's shoes means to imagine how you would react if you were in a similar situation.
"Tom's sales have dropped by 30% this month. I wouldn't like to be in his shoes!"

where the shoe pinches
When people talk about 'where the shoe pinches', they are referring to an area that is often a source of problems or difficulties.
"She's sure the public transport system works perfectly, but she'll find out where the shoe pinches when she starts using it!"

on a shoestring
If you do something on a shoestring, you do it with very little money.
"When I was a student I lived on a shoestring."

shoot yourself in the foot
If you shoot yourself in the foot you do or say something which is against your own interests.
"When Lea was asked at the interview if she had any weaknesses, she really shot herself in the foot the way she answered."

shop around
If you shop around, you visit a number of shops selling similar articles in order to compare the prices.
"You can usually save money by shopping around."

shop till you drop
If you shop till you drop, you go shopping for a very long time, until you are exhausted.
"If you go to London with Ashley, you'll shop till you drop, so take comfortable shoes!"

shopping spree
If you go on a , you enjoy a lively outing, usually with much spending of money.
"Liza is planning to go on a shopping spree as soon as she gets her bonus."

shopping therapy
This term refers to the idea that buying things can make you feel better.
"A little shopping therapy can usually cheer up bored teenagers."

window shopping
When people go window shopping, they look at things in shop windows, without actually purchasing anything.
"I haven't been paid yet, so I can only go window shopping."

short and sweet
Something that is short and sweet is brief but pleasant.
"It didn't take us long to agree. Our conversation was short and sweet."

short end of stick
If you get the short end of the stick, you are treated unfairly or receive less than what is due or deserved.
"They reached an agreement but Sophie felt she got the short end of the stick."

short fuse
When someone has a short fuse, they are likely to become angry easily or quickly.
"Be careful how you explain the situation. The boss has a short fuse these days!"

short shrift
If someone or something gets short shrift they are given little attention or sympathy.
"When the boss is very busy, he gives short shrift to anyone who bothers him."

a shot in the dark
To refer to a question or statement asa shot in the dark means that it is a complete guess, but at the same time it might be closeto the truth.
"He didn't know which players had been selected, so mentioning Carter's name was just a shot in the dark."

call the shots
If you call the shots, you are in command of the situation and make all the important decisions.
"Ask Julie - she's the one who calls the shots around here."

shotgun approach
If you use a shotgun approach, you cover a wide range in a non-selective, haphazard and inefficient manner.
"Identifying a specific segment of the market as our target will be more effective than a shotgun approach."

(a) shoulder to cry on
If you need 'a shoulder to cry on', you need to talk to someone who will listen to your problems and give sympathy and support when you are upset.
"You can call me any time if you need a shoulder to cry on."

shoulder surfing
The practice of looking over somebody's shoulder when they are using a computer, cash dispenser or other electronic device, in order to obtain personal information (identification, account number, password, etc.) is called shoulder surfing.

chip on the shoulder
If someone has achip on their shoulder, the feel resentful because they feel they are being treated unfairly, especially because of their background, their sex or their colour.
"He's got a chip on his shoulder because he's from a working-class family."

give someone the cold shoulder
To means to deliberately ignore them.
"After giving my opinion, he gave me the cold shoulder."

(a) shouting match
An argument or debate where people shout loudly at each other is called a shouting match.
"The debate between the two politicians turned into a shouting match which spoiled the event for viewers."

a show of hands
A show of hands is a method of voting where people give their opinion by raising a hand.
"How many people agree? Could we have a show of hands please?"

show your true colours
When a person shows their true colours, their behaviour reveals their real nature, with their qualities and/or weaknesses.
"In times of crisis people show their true colours."

show someone the ropes
If you show someone the ropes, you teach or explain to them how to do a particular job.
"The manager is busy showing the ropes to two new trainees."

get the show on the road
If you manage to put a plan or idea into action, you get the show on the road.
"OK, we've got all we need, so let's get the show on the road."

a shrinking violet
A person referred to as a shrinking violet is a timid or shy person.
"The witness was a shrinking violet who had difficulty expressing herself"

shrug something off
If your shrug something off, you dismiss it as being unimportant.
"He was aware of the danger but he just shrugged it off."

shut the stable door when the horse has bolted
If you shut the stable door after the horse has bolted, you try to prevent something bad from happening when it is already too late.
"Jack decided to insure the contents of his apartment after it was burgled. Now that's shutting the stable door after the horse has bolted!"

the other side of the coin
When you want to mention a different or contradictory aspect of a situation, you refer to the other side of the coin.
"The house is lovely and spacious, but the other side of the coin is that it is far from shops and schools."

sight for sore eyes
This expression refers to a person or thing that you are happy to see.
"Sam! You're a sight for sore eyes! I haven't seen you in a long time!"

sign of the times
The expression 'a sign of the times' refers to something that shows the nature of today's society.
"The rising level of violence is a sign of the times."

sign your own death warrant
If you do something that causes your own downfall, or prevents you from being successful, you sign your own death warrant.
"When Charlie decided to drop out of college, he signed his own death warrant."

sign on the dotted line
If you sign on the dotted line, you formally give your consent to something by signing an official document.
"I took legal advice before signing on the dotted line."

signed, sealed and delivered
When an agreement, contract or treaty is signed, sealed and delivered, all the legal documents are in order.
"It is hoped that the agreement will be signed, sealed and delivered before the end of the week."

significant other
The term 'significant other' refers to a person, such as a spouse, partner or lover, with whom you have a long-term relationship.
"Brian says he makes no decisions without consulting his significant other."

silver bullet
This term refers to an extremely effective or magical solution to a difficult problem.
"There is no silver bullet that will put an end to unemployment."

silver lining
A silver lining refers to the good or pleasant side-effects of an unpleasant situation.
"'Every cloud has a silver lining' means that there is a positive or hopeful side to every unpleasant situation."

(born with a) silver spoon in your mouth
To say that someone is born with a silver spoon in their mouth means that their family is very rich and privileged.
"Alice never has to worry about money; she was born with a silver spoon in her mouth."

silver surfer
A silver surfer is an elderly person who uses the internet.
"After just a few questions my grandmother was ready to join the silver surfers."

silver-tongued
A silver-tongued person is a smooth talker who speaks so convincingly that they manage to persuade others to do what they want.
"A silver-tongued salesman persuaded my mother to buy a new washing machine although the one she had was fine!"

simplicity itself
Something that is simplicity itself is extremely easy to do.
"Using the tool is simplicity itself; just turn it on and the instructions appear."

since time immemorial
If something has existed since time immemorial, it has been there for such a long time that nobody can recall a time without it.
"I don't know when that bridge was built. It's been there since time immemorial."

sing a different tune
If somebody sings a different tune, they change their opinion about something, or their attitude towards something.
"He had no sympathy for people out of work until he lost his own job; now he's singing a different tune."

sink or swim
If someone has tosink or swim, they have to do something alone, and their success or failure depends entirely on their own efforts.
"The sink-or-swim attitude in the company can be very difficult for young recruits."

sink one's differences
If people or organisations sink their differences, they decide to forget their disagreements.
"We must sink our differences and build a peaceful community."

sink your teeth into something
If you sink your teeth into something, you do it with a lot of energy and enthusiasm.
"When Julie got promoted, she immediately sank her teeth into her new job."

siphon off
If someone siphons something off, they transfer something from one place to another, often illegally.
"It was discovered that he had siphoned off money from the business into an account in a tax haven."

sit on the fence
If you sit on the fence, you avoid taking sides in a discussion or argument.
"It's an important issue. You can't continue to sit on the fence!"

sit up and takes notice
A person who sits up and takes notice become alert and attentive.
"The announcement of the winner made everyone sit up and take notice."

sitting duck
To refer to someone as a sitting duck means that they are an easy target for criticism, verbal attacks, etc.
"The young actress was a sitting duck for the reporters."

sitting pretty
Someone who is sitting pretty is in a good or fortunate situation, especially compared to others who are not so lucky.
"He sold his shares at a good time so he's now sitting pretty and enjoying life."

six of one and half a dozen of the other
This expression means that there is no real difference between two choices; both are equally good or equally bad.
"I didn't know who to vote for. It was six of one and half a dozen of the other!"

at sixes and sevens
If someone is at sixes and sevens, they are in a state of confusion or not very well organised.
"The managers were at sixes and sevens when they were informed of the Chairman's visit."

skating on thin ice
If you are skating on thin ice, you are doing or saying something risky, or something that could cause trouble.
"Don't mention that subject during the negotiations or you could be skating on thin ice."

skeleton staff
If a business or organisation works with a skeleton staff, it is run with the smallest number of people necessary.
"The office is closed the week after Christmas but there will be a skeleton staff to handle essential operations."

skin a cat
The expression 'there's more than one way to skin a cat' means that there are many different ways of achieving something.
"How about trying a different method? There's more than one way to skin a cat you know!"

skin someone alive
If you are angry and threaten to skin someone alive, you mean that you are going to punish them severely.
"If that kid damages my car again, I'll skin him alive!"

(no) skin off one's nose
To use this expression means that you don't care if something happens.
"It's no skin off my nose if he doesn't accept the invitation - I don't care one way or another."

by the skin of our teeth
To do something by the skin of our teeth means that you just manage to do it, but that you almost fail.
"Andy passed the driving test by the skin of his teeth!"

jump out of your skin
If you jump out of your skin, you are extremely surprised or shocked.
"Jane nearly jumped out of her skin when the horse put its head through the kitchen window!"

all skin and bone
If someone is all skin and bone, they are very thin or too thin.
"After trekking in the Himalayas, he was all skin and bone."

(put) skin in the game
If you put skin in the game, you show your confidence in a company by making a considerable investment or a financial commitment.
"I got good news today. Apparently a serious investor is willing to put skin in the game."

the sky is the limit
To say the sky's the limit means that there is no limit to the possibility of success or progress for someone or something.
"How successful do you think the project will be?"
"Who knows ... the sky's the limit!"

slam dunk
This is a basketball term which means that success or victory will be easily achieved.
"Our lawyer will win the case easily. It's a slam dunk."

(a) slap on the wrist
If you get a slap on the wrist, you receive mild punishment, or you are reprimanded for something you have done.
"I got a slap on the wrist from my wife for leaving the kitchen in a mess."

(a) sledgehammer to crack a nut
Using a sledgehammer to crack a nut means using disproportionate force to solve a problem.
"He called the police because his neighbour was rude? - now that's using a sledgehammer to crack a nut!"

sleep like a log
If you sleep like a log, you sleep deeply or soundly.
"After a day at the beach, I usually sleep like a log."

sleep on it
If you take time (until the next day) to think something over before making a decision, you sleep on it.
"I suggest you sleep on it. You can give me your decision tomorrow."

not sleep a wink / not get a wink of sleep
If someone doesn't get a wink of sleep, they don't sleep a all.
"It was so noisy in the hotel, I didn't get a wink of sleep."

(a) sleeping partner
This term refers to a person who invests in a business without taking an active part in its management, and whose association with the enterprise is not public knowledge.
"He works alone but his business is partly financed by a sleeping partner."

(a) slice of the cake
When people feel entitled to a share of the profits or benefits, they want a (larger) slice of the cake.
"Since profits are higher this year, the workers feel they deserve a bigger slice of the cake."

sling mud
To say that someone is slinging mud at another person means that they are trying to damage that person's reputation by saying bad things about them.
"During election campaigns, candidates often sling mud at each other."

give somebody the slip
If you give somebody the slip, you manage to hide or get away from the person who is following you.
"The police were on his trail, but he managed to give them the slip."

slip your mind
If something hasslipped your mind, you have forgotten about it.
"Oh dear! It slipped my mind that the shops were closed today!"

(as) slippery as an eel
To say that someone is as slippery as an eel means that they are difficult to catch and they manage to avoid answering questions.
"The man was as slippery as an eel. He was arrested for theft several times but was never convicted."

slush fund
A slush fund is an account or fund in politics or business where money is set aside for various unofficial purposes, often unethical or even illegal.
"A large commission taken from the slush fund ensured the success of the negotiations."

(as) sly as a fox
Someone who is as sly as a fox is cunning and clever at getting what they want, especially by deceiving or tricking people.
"Be wary of that insurance salesman. He's known to be as sly as a fox."

on the sly
If you do something on the sly, you do it secretly or furtively.
"He made such quick progress that the others suspected him of having private lessons on the sly."

small dog, tall weeds
This expression is used to refer to someone who does not have the ability or the resources necessary to perform a task.
"The task may be too difficult for the trainee - small dog, tall weeds!"

small fry
People or organisations that are considered unimportant can be referred to as small fry.
"The police seized a large quantity of drugs, and some small fry, but not the organisers they were hoping to catch."

small hours
The term 'the small hours' means after midnight or the very early hours of the day.
"Laura worked until the small hours on her speech for the ceremony."

small potatoes
Something that is small potatoes is considered unimportant or insignificant.
"The author's first publication was considered small potatoes but her new book has lead to a change of opinion."

it's a small world
This expression is used by someone who is surprised to meet familiar people in unexpected places.
"Wow! It's a small world. I never expected to meet a neighbour on a transatlantic flight!"

smart alec
A smart alec is an annoying self-assertive person who tries to show off how clever they are.
"Some smart alec interrupted the game claiming that the answers were incorrect!"

smash hit
A very successful performance in music, films, theatre, etc. is called a smash hit.
"The film 'Titanic' was a smash hit all over the world."

smoke like a chimney
Someone who smokes a large amount of tobacco on a regular basis is said to smoke like a chimney.
"My grandfather used to smoke like a chimney."

smoke signals
To say that there are smoke signals means that there are indications that something is probably going to happen.
"All the smoke signals seem to indicate that the company is going to be taken over."

smoke and mirrors
An attempt to conceal or distort the truth (like a magician) in order to confuse people is called smoke and mirrors.
"The outgoing chairman used smoke and mirrors to make the situation look better."

(a) smokescreen
A smokescreen is an action or tactic intended to conceal or divert attention from your real intentions or activities.
"His travel business was just a smokescreen for his political activities."

smokestack industries
Industries involved in heavy manufacturing such as the production of iron and steel, especially if they cause a lot of pollution, are called smokestack industries.
"Smokestack industries are no longer allowed in residential areas."

(a) smoking gun
A smoking gun is a piece of evidence or the indisputable sign of someone's guilt.
"The fingerprints left on the door-handle was the smoking gun that enabled the police to arrest him."

smooth the path
To smooth the path for something means to make progress easier or enable it to happen.
"Speaking the language smoothed the path for negotiations."

smooth ruffled feathers
If you smooth someone's ruffled feathers, you make that person feel less angry or offended.
"Tom took the criticism badly but James managed to smooth his ruffled feathers."

in smooth waters
A business or operation that is in smooth waters is making regular and easy progress.
"The company seems to be in smooth waters these days."

snail mail
This term refers to the standard system of mail delivery, or postal service, considered very slow compared to electronic mail.
"More and more people are using e-mail rather than the traditional postal service, snail mail."

at a snail's pace
If something moves at a snail's pace, it moves very slowly.
"The old man was driving along the road at a snail's pace."

(a) snake in the grass
Someone who pretends to be your friend while actually betraying you is a snake in the grass.
"I thought I could trust my colleague but he turned out to be a snake in the grass."

(a) snap decision
A quick decision based on an impulse, without taking time to weigh the consequences, is called a snap decision.
"Completely overworked, he suddenly turned off his computer and made a snap decision to go swimming."

snatch victory from the jaws of defeat
If you manage to win something such as a match or a contest, when you are on the verge of losing, you snatch victory from the jaws of defeat.
"With a last-minute goal, the team snatched victory form the jaws of defeat."

(a) sneak preview
A sneak preview (or sneak peek) is a special viewing of a film or art production given to a select audience before being shown to the general public.
"Television reporters were given a sneak preview of the next episode."

not to be sneezed at
Something that is not to be sneezed at should not be rejected or refused.
"If I were you I'd accept the proposal. An offer like that is not to be sneezed at."

snowed under
Someone who is snowed under has so many things to do, usually work, that they unable to cope with it all.
"With the 'flu epidemic, doctors and nurses are completely snowed under."

(as) snug as a bug in a rug
This is a humorous way of saying that you are warm and comfortable.
"Wrapped up in a blanket on the sofa, Sophie looked as snug as a bug in a rug."

(a) social butterfly
A person who has a lot of friends and acquaintances and likes to flit from one social event to another is called a social butterfly.
"Jessica is constantly out and about; she's a real social butterfly."

(take a) soft option
If you choose the easiest course of action available, which is usually not very effective, you take a soft option.
"Their father took a soft option and confiscated the skateboard for the week-end, hoping his sons would stop quarrelling."

(a) soft spot
If you have a soft spot for someone or something, you particularly like them.
"My grandfather has always had a soft spot for fast cars."

soften the blow
When someone tries to soften the blow, they do something to make an unpleasant event or action easier to accept.
"In spite of the extra payments given to soften the blow, the loss of their jobs was a catastrophe for the miners."

go for a song
If something goes for a song, it is sold at an unexpectedly low price.
"I was able to buy the car simply because it was going for a song."

sound (or smell) fishy
If something sounds or smells fishy, you are suspicious about it.
"Do you believe what she said? Her story sounds fishy to me!"

sound hollow
If an explanation, apology or promise , it seems false or insincere.
"I don't think he's sorry at all. His apology sounded hollow to me."

from soup to nuts
If you do somethingfrom soup to nuts, you do it all the way through, from the beginning to the end (like from the first to the last course of a meal).
"She told us the whole story, from soup to nuts."

sour grapes
To say that someone's attitude is 'sour grapes' means that they are trying to make others believe that something they cannot have is of no importance.
"When she didn't get the job she said she wasn't interested in it anyway, but that's just sour grapes!"

sow the seeds of suspicion
If someone's behaviour, or something they say, sows the seeds of suspicion, it leads people to suspect that they are guilty.
"The fact that the boy spent a lot of money after the burglary sowed the seeds of suspicion in the neigbours' minds."

sow wild oats
A person, usually a man, who sows their wild oats goes through a period of carefree pleasure-seeking while they are young.
"He was advised to sow his wild oats before he got married."

(throw a) spanner in the works
If someone or something throws a spanner (or a wrench) in the works, they do something that causes problems and prevents the success of a plan or event.
"The two companies were keen to sign the agreement before anything happened to throw a spanner in the works."

go spare
If you go spare, you lost your temper completely.
"Lea's dad would go spare if he found out how much she had spent in London!"

spare-part surgery
Spare-part surgery refers to surgery in which a diseased or non-functioning organ is replaced with a transplanted or artificial organ.

spare tyre
If a person has a spare tyre, they have a roll of flesh around the waist.
"I'd better go on a diet - I'm getting a spare tyre!"

speak ill of someone
If you speak ill of someone, you say bad or unkind things about them.
"He's very loyal man who refuses to speak ill of his colleagues."

speak off the cuff
If you say something off the cuff, you say it spontaneously, without previous thought or preparation.
"Politicians are usually careful not to speak off the cuff."

speak out of turn
If someone speaks out of turn, either they intervene at the wrong moment or they say something tactless or inappropriate.
"At the first meeting I was afraid of speaking out of turn."

speak softly and carry a big stick
If you speak softly and carry a big stick, you express your views in a quite non-aggressive manner, but you make it clear that you are in a position to use force if necessary.
"As a leader he recommends the 'speak softly and carry a big stick' method."

speak same language
If two or more people speak the same language, they have similar opinions or ideas, so they understand each other very well.
"We work well together because we speak the same language."

speak volumes
If something speaks volumes, it expresses a reaction or opinion very clearly, with no need for words.
"The happy smile on the child's face when he opened the box spoke volumes about my choice of gift."

speed networking
This term refers to a relatively new urban trend which consists in making a potential business contact by briefly talking to a series of people at an organised event and exchanging contact details.

spell trouble
If something spells trouble, it signifies possible problems in the future.
"The prolonged cold weather spells trouble for this year's harvest."

spick and span
To refer to something, usually a place, as spick and span means that it is very clean, neat and tidy.
"The apartment must be spick and span before our guests arrive."

spill the beans
If you spill the beans, you reveal a secret or talk about something private.
"Come on! Spill the beans! What did he say? "

spin doctor
A spin doctoris a press agent or a public relations officer employed to promote a favourable interpretation of events in business or politics.
"For a long time spin doctors lead us to believe that the situation was under control."

spin a yarn
If you spin a yarn, you tell a story, usually a long improbable one, with distorted truths.
"He failed the exam and spun a yarn about the exam papers being stolen."

spinach cinema
Films that are neither exciting nor interesting but are considered educational or uplifting, in the same way as certain foods are good for your health, are referred to as spinach cinema.

spiral out of control
When difficulties or costs spiral out of control, they get worse or increase continuously, creating a situation that becomes difficult to manage.
"Some items were expensive but we were careful not to let the costs spiral out of control."

spit in someone's eye
If you spit in someone's eye, you treat that person with disrespect or contempt.
"Your father raised you as best he could. Don't start spitting in his eye."

spitting image
If one person isthe spitting image of another, they look exactly like each other.
"Melanie is the spitting image of her mother."

spitting in the wind
If you spend time trying to do something that is impossible to achieve, you are said to be spitting in the wind.
"You'll never make him change his mind. You're just spitting in the wind."

splash out (on something)
If you splash out on something, you spend a lot of money on it.
"Chloe's parents really splashed out on her wedding."

split hairs
If you split hairs, you pay too much attention to differences that are very small or unimportant.
"If we start splitting hairs, we'll never reach an agreement."

sponge off someone
If you sponge off someone, you live at the expense of another person, accepting their hospitality without sharing the costs or doing something in return.
"Amy has been sponging off her grandparents for the past two months. She neither shares the expenses nor helps in the house."

spoon-feed someone
If a person is spoon-fed, they are helped too much rather than encouraged to think by themselves or use their own initiative.
"Some teachers tend to spoon-feed their pupils."

put someone on the spot
If you put someone on the spot, you put them in an uncomfortable position, for example by asking difficult questions which they cannot avoid.
"The reporter was put on the spot when he was asked to reveal his source."

(be) spot on
If something is spot on, it is exactly right.
"That bag is an absolute match for my outfit! The colour is spot on!"

spread like wildfire
If something such as news, rumours or gossip spreads like wildfire, it becomes widely known very fast.
"As soon as the nomination was announced, the news spread like wildfire."

spread your wings
When someone spreads their wings, they become independent, begin to use their abilities and develop their interests.
"There comes a time when young people must be encouraged to spread their wings. "

spread yourself too thin
If you spread yourself too thin, you do too many things at the same time and can't do any of them well.
"Don't spread yourself too thin or you'll get nowhere."

no spring chicken
To say that someone is no spring chicken means that they are quite old or well past their youth.
"How old is the owner?"  "I don't know, but she's no spring chicken."

(on the) spur of the moment
If you do something on the spur of the moment, you do it as soon as you think of it, spontaneously, without any planning.
"He decided on the spur of the moment to buy flowers for his wife."

square deal
A transaction that is fair and honest, or an equitable arrangement, is called a square deal.
"We've used the same supplier for years and we always get a square deal."

square meal
When people talk about a square meal, they mean a substantial and satisfying meal.
"I don't need a fancy restaurant, just a place where I can get a square meal."

square peg in a round hole
To say that a person is a square peg in a round hole means that they are not suitable for the job they are doing or the situation they are in.
"He was a bad choice for the job - a square peg in a round hole."

stab someone you in the back
If someone stabs you in the back , they betray you by doing something harmful to you when you thought you could trust them.
"His best friend stabbed him in the back by voting against him."

a lot at stake
Someone who has a lot at stake is in a risky situation, with a lot to be won or lost.
"He was nervous about signing the agreement because there was a lot at stake."

stand on ceremony
When people stand on ceremony, they behave in a very formal way.
"We'd be delighted to come and see you but please don't stand on ceremony."

stand on your own two feet
If you stand on your own two feet, you are independent and need no help from anyone.
"When young people leave home, they learn to stand on their own two feet."

stand in good stead
To say that a skill, an ability or previous experience will stand you in good stead means that it will be beneficial to you in the future.
"Being able to speak another language will stand you in good stead when looking for a job."

stand your ground
If you stand your ground you maintain your position and refuse to yield or give way.
"He claimed innocence and stood his ground in spite of the repeated accusations. "

stand the test of time
If something stands the test of time, people continue to find it valuable or useful after many years.
"The teaching method has stood the test of time. It is still used in schools today."

stand up for someone
When you defend or support a person, a belief or an idea, you stand up for them.
"A growing number of citizens are standing up for the victims of discrimination."

stark raving mad
To say that someone is stark raving mad means that they are completely crazy.
"You're stark raving mad to go sailing in this weather."

stars in your eyes
If someone has stars in their eyes, they are looking extremely happy.
"The contestant had stars in her eyes when she saw the car she had won."

starter marriage
A starter marriage is a short-lived first marriage that ends in divorce with no kids, no property and no regrets.

state of the art
If something is described as state-of-the-art, it is the most advanced model currently available, incorporating the latest and best technology.

stay one jump ahead
If you stay one jump ahead, you keep an advantage over others by making sure you are better informed or taking action before they do.
"He is a successful journalist because he always stays one jump ahead of the others."

steal a march
If you steal a march on someone, you do something in an unexpected or secret way that enables you to gain an advantage over them.
"We were able to steal a march on other retailers by immediately offering a 10% reduction on orders received the first day."

steal someone's thunder
If you steal someone's thunder you take their idea or plan and draw attention and praise away from them by presenting it first.
"Fred had developed a plan to reduce production costs, but the manager stole his thunder by announcing Fred's idea at the regional meeting."

steal the show
A person who steals the show gets more attention or praise than the other participants.
"The Japanese competitor stole the show at the Olympic games."

it's a steal!
If you find something that you want for a very low price, much lower than what it is worth, you can say 'it's a steal!'.
"He's selling it for $20? At that price it's a steal!"

let off steam
A person who lets off steam releases surplus energy or strong feelings either through intense physical activity or by talking in an unrestrained manner.
"Let's bring the kids to the playground so that they can let off steam."

run out of steam
If you say that a person, a process or an organised event is running out of steam, you mean that there is a loss of impetus, energy or enthusiasm.
"The anti-immigrant movement seems to be running out of steam."

under your own steam
If you go somewhere under your own steam, you do so without any help from others.
"No need to pick us up. We'll get there under our own steam."

steamed up
If someone gets steamed up about something, they become very angry, excited or enthusiastic about it.
"Calm down - there's no need to get all steamed up about it!"

stem the tide
If you stem the tide (of events), you stop the development of something bad or undesirable.
"The authorities seem unable to stem the rising tide of violence in schools."

step into the breach
If you step into the breach, you do work that someone else is unexpectedly unable to do.
"Steve stepped into the breach when his colleague had a car accident."

step into someone's shoes
If you step into someone's shoes, you take over a job or position held by someone else before you.
"William has been trained to step into his father's shoes when he retires."

step on the gas
If someone tells you to step on the gas, they are encouraging you to accelerate or hurry up in order to get something done quickly.
"We'd better step on the gas and get these figures printed. The meeting starts in half an hour."

step on someone's toes
If you annoy or irritate someone by intervening in a situation that is their responsibility, you step on their toes.
"I could offer some advice but I'm afraid of stepping on someone's toes."

step out of line
If you step out of line, you do something unacceptable or break the rules.
"It was made clear upon arrival that we would be dismissed if we stepped out of line."

take steps
If you take steps, you start a course of action in order to accomplish something.
"The town is taking steps to improve security in public car parks."

sterner stuff
If someone is made of sterner stuff, they have a strong character and are better able to deal with difficulties than others.
"I was surprised to see him so upset. I thought he was made of sterner stuff."

in a stew
When someone is in a stew about something, they are worried and agitated.
"When she was planning the wedding reception, Laura got into a stew over the seating arrangements."

stew in your own juice
If you let someone stew in their own juice, you leave them to worry about the consequences of their own actions.
"Ricky spent last night in prison for starting a fight - let him just stew in his own juice!"

stick in one's throat
If something sticks in your throat (or craw), it is very difficult to accept and makes you angry or resentful.
"The way he treats women really sticks in my throat!"

stick out like a sore thumb
If something sticks out like a sore thumb, it is very obvious or visible in an unpleasant way.
"The modern building sticks out like a sore thumb among the old houses."

stick something out
If you stick something out, you continue to endure it in spite of the difficulties or unpleasant aspects of the situation.
"Life is difficult here, but Luke is going to stick it out because he is determined to succeed."

stick out a mile
If something sticks out a mile, it is very obvious or very easy to see.
"You can see she's had a facelift - it sticks out a mile!"

stick to your guns
If you stick to your guns, you show determination when faced with opposition.
"The government stuck to its guns in spite of the criticism."

stick to your last
If you tell someone to stick to their last, you are asking them to restrict their intervention or comments to an area where they have knowledge and experience, and to keep away from areas where they know nothing.
(A 'last' is used in making and repairing shoes.)
"Why don't you stick to your last and let me handle this matter."

sticking point
A sticking point is a controversial issue that causes an interruption or blocks progress in discussions or negotiations.
"The choice of distributor was a sticking point in the negotiations."

stickler for the rules
Someone who is a stickler for the rules is a disciplinarian who demands strict observance of the rules or procedures.
"Be sure to use the proper form. Mr. Brown is a stickler for the rules."

sticky fingers
Someone who hassticky fingers has a tendency to steal.
"Items have been disappearing from the stock recently. Do any of the employees have sticky fingers?"

on a sticky wicket
If you find yourself on a sticky wicket, you are in a situation that is difficult to deal with.
"They've refused to sign the contract so we're on a sticky wicket now!"

stiff upper lip
If someone keeps a stiff upper lip, they contain their emotion and do not let others see their feelings.
"When she heard the bad news, she kept a stiff upper lip."

sting someone for
If you sting someone for an amount of money, you make them pay for something, usually in a deceitful manner.
"Not only was the lunch boring but I was stung for $25!"

stink to high heaven
If something has a very strong unpleasant smell, it stinks to high heaven.
"Take off those socks - they stink to high heaven! "

stir up a hornet's nest
If you stir up a hornet's nest, you do something which causes a commotion and provokes criticism and anger.
"His letter to the Board stirred up a real hornet's nest."

stir-crazy
If a person goes stir-crazy, they become very agitated or nervous because they have been confined to a place for too long.
"After several days in quarantine, people were going stir-crazy."

(be) in stitches
When people are in stitches, they are laughing a lot.
"The story was so funny, everyone was in stitches."

take stock of a situation
If you take stock of a situation you assess all the aspects in order to form an opinion.
"He took time to take stock of the situation before making a suggestion."

a stitherum
Someone who is (all) in a stitherum is excited, agitated or confused about something.
"The whole population was in a stitherum after the mayor's resignation."

a stone's throw away
Something that is a stone's throw away is just a short distance away.
"It's a residential area but the shops are just a stone's throw away."

a stool pigeon
A person who acts as an informer, especially one who gives information to the police or the authorities, is called a stool pigeon.
"I don't trust Jack. I think he's a stool pigeon for the management."

stop dead in one's tracks
If you stop dead in your tracks, you stop suddenly because you are frightened or totally surprised.
"When Steve saw the snake, he stopped dead in his tracks."

stop at nothing
Someone who would stop at nothing would do anything, even something illegal or immoral, to obtain what they want.
"He'd stop at nothing if there was a possibility of making money."

stop the rot
When you prevent a situation from deteriorating, especially in business or politics, you stop the rot.
"There was so much conflict in the office that a new manager was appointed to stop the rot."

a storm (is) brewing
If you say that a storm is brewing, you mean that the atmosphere indicates that there is going to be trouble, probably with outbursts of anger or emotion.
"As soon as we saw Pete's face, we knew there was a storm brewing."

storm in a teacup
To refer to something as a storm in a teacup means that people are making a lot of unnecessary fuss or getting excited about something unimportant.
"They were arguing about who should go to the supermarket, but it was just a storm in a teacup."

in the eye of the storm
A person or organisation who is in the eye of the storm is deeply involved in a difficult situation which affects a lot of people.
"The Prime Minister was often in the eye of the storm during the debate on the tax reform."

stormy relationship
If you have a stormy relationship with someone, you have a lot of arguments and disagreements.
"After a very stormy relationship, they decided to separate."

cut a long story short
When talking about something, if you say 'to cut a long story short', you indicate that you are going to say what is essential rather than go into the details.
"To cut a long story short, Anne and Jim are getting a divorce."

same old story
A common occurrence, or something that happens regularly or always in the same way, is called an old story or the same old story.
"It's always the same old story: we do all the work and the boss takes all the credit!"

straight as an arrow
Someone who is as straight as an arrow is a morally upright person who is extremely honest.
"You can leave the keys with Andy. He's as straight as an arrow. "

straight as a ramrod
Someone who is (as) straight as a ramrod is a person who keeps a straight back and looks very serious.
"When my grandfather invited us for dinner, he used to sit as straight as a ramrod at the head of the table."

strange bedfellows
This expression refers to the unusual or unlikely association of two or more people, companies or states.
"A car manufacturer and a bakery - strange bedfellows don't you think?"

the last straw
This expression means that this is the latest unpleasant event and that you cannot tolerate the situation any longer.
"After a long day of negotiations with the protesters, the traffic jam was the last straw!"

street-smart / steet-wise
A person who is street-smart or streetwise has enough experience and knowledge about life in the city to be able to deal with difficult or dangerous situations.
"The kids living in this area are all street-smart - they're in less danger than us. "

streets ahead
If a person or organisation is streets ahead of another, they are much better or more advanced.
"In measures to preserve the planet, the Scandinavians are streets ahead of us."

by no stretch of the imagination
The expression 'by no stretch of the imagination' means 'however hard you may try to believe or imagine it'.
"By no stretch of the imagination could the man be called handsome."

stretch the truth
When you stretch the truth, you exaggerate the facts or say things that are not exactly true.
"Some candidates are tempted to stretch the truth about their skills or work experience."

in strict confidence
If you say something in strict confidence, you tell it as a secret not to be revealed.
"Please don't repeat this. I'm telling it to you in strict confidence."

strictly business
An appointment or event that is entirely devoted to business, with no leisure or relaxation, is called strictly business.
"Yes we had lunch together but it was strictly business."

strike a false note
If you strike a false note, you do something wrong or inappropriate.
"He struck a false note when he arrived at the cocktail party wearing old jeans."

strike gold
If you strike gold, you find exactly what you need : satisfaction, wealth, happiness, etc.
"I think she struck gold this time in her new job. It suits her perfectly."

strike home
When somebody's comments or remarks strike home, they make you fully understand the situation.
"The seriousness of his injuries struck home as he listened to the surgeon."

strike while the iron is hot
If you strike while the iron is hot, you act immediately because now is the ideal time to do it.
"The price of property has dropped. It's a good time to buy. You should strike while the iron is hot."

strike it lucky
When someone strikes it lucky, they run into good luck.
"We had a sunny week in Scotland - we struck it lucky!"

strike pay dirt
If you strike pay dirt, you are lucky and suddenly find yourself in a successful money-making situation.
"Charlie finally struck pay dirt with his latest invention."

strike or hit a raw nerve
If something you say strikes or hits a raw nerve, it upsets someone because they are very sensitive about the subject.
"You struck a raw nerve when you mentioned divorce. They're separating."

strike or hit the right note
If you strike or hit the right note, you say or do something suitable or appropriate.
"He struck the right note with his future mother-in-law when he gave her a book on gardening - her favourite hobby! "

string someone along
If you string someone along, you deliberately mislead them about your intentions.
"Bob finally understood that Mary had just been stringing him along; she had no intention of marrying him."

another string to your bow
If you have another string to your bow, you have another skill or possible course of action if everything else fails.
"As well as her excellent qualifications, she's got another string to her bow to help her find a job. She speaks fluent Chinese."

no strings attached
An offer 'with no strings attached' is an offer made without conditions or restrictions, and requires nothing in return.
"I managed to get a loan with no strings attached."

struck dumb
If someone is struck dumb, they are unable to speak because they are so surprised, shocked or frightened by something.
"The suspect was struck dumb when the verdict was announced."

stubborn as a mule
If someone is as stubborn as a mule, they are very obstinate and unwilling to listen to reason or change their mind.
"His friends advised him to accept the offer, but you know Larry - he's as stubborn as a mule!"

stuck in a time warp
Something that has not changed at all from some time in the past, when everything else has, is caught or stuck in a time warp.
"This place seem to be stuck in a time warp. It's exactly as it was in the 1950's. "

a stumbling block
A problem or obstacle that prevents you from achieving something is a stumbling block.
"My father adapted quite well but the language was always a stumbling block for my mother."

on the stump
Before an election, when politicians are campaigning for support and votes, they are on the stump.
"On the stump for months, the candidates attended meeting after meeting."

from the sublime to the ridiculous
If something goes from the sublime to the ridiculous, it deteriorates in quality from serious or admirable to absurd or unimportant.
"An opera followed by a Mr. Muscle contest is going from the sublime to the ridiculous!"

sugar the pill
If you sugar the pill, you try to make some unpleasant news more acceptable by saying something pleasant at the same time.
"When Tim's parents announced that he was going to boarding school, they tried to sugar the pill by telling him he'd be home at the week-ends."

suit every pocket
This term refers to the amount of money you are able to spend or the price you can afford.
"The store offers a wide range of computers at prices to suit every pocket."

survival of the fittest
The survival of the fittest means that the most able, or those best capable of adapting to particular conditions, will survive.
"I plant some flowers in the spring and hope for the best - it's the survival of the fittest!"

suss out (something)
If you suss out something, such as a problem or a situation, you examine it and manage to understand it.
"Ask Jack to explain - he's got it all sussed out!"

swallow the bait
If you swallow the bait, you accept an offer made specially to persuade you to do something.
"When customers see a 'special offer' sign, they usually swallow the bait and purchase the product."

swallow your pride
If you swallow your pride, you accept something humiliating or embarrassing, for example having to admit that you are wrong, or that you have less knowledge that you thought.
"When Jill failed the exam, she had to swallow her pride and repeat the course."

swallow your words
If you swallow your words, you admit that you were wrong.
"He said I'd never get the job, but he had to swallow his words when I was appointed."

(by the) sweat of your brow
If you earn or achieve something by the sweat of your brow, you do it through hard work and no help.
"I got a comfortable lifestyle by the sweat of my brow - I owe it to nobody but myself!"

sweep something under the rug
If you sweep something under the rug (or carpet), you try to hide it because it is embarrassing.
"The family tried unsuccessfully to sweep the scandal under the rug."

sweet nothings
Pleasant but unimportant words that lovers say to each other are called sweet nothings.
"He whispered sweet nothings in her ear as they danced."

sweet tooth
Someone who has a sweet tooth enjoys eating sweet things like sugar, pastries, chocolate, etc.
"My mother will be delighted if you bring her chocolates - she's got a sweet tooth."

sweetheart deal
The term sweetheart deal is used to refer to an abnormally lucrative arrangement between two parties.
"Opponents say the contract was awarded to the builder as part of a sweetheart deal, and is therefore illegal."

swim against the tide
A person who is doing or saying the opposite to most other people is said to be swimming against the tide.
"Perhaps it's because she always swims against the tide that her books are successful."

get into the swing (of something)
When you get into the swing of something, you become involved in it or get used to it and begin to enjoy it.
"It'll be more fun when you get into the swing of things."

in full swing
When an event gets into full swing, it is at its busiest or liveliest time.
"When we got back to the office, the Christmas party was in full swing."

swings and roundabouts
What you lose on the swings you gain on the roundabouts.
This expression means that there are as many advantages as there are disadvantages, or what is lost in one area can be gained in another.
"The more you earn, the more tax you pay. It's swings and roundabouts."

swishing (party)
Swishing is the name given to a recent fashion phenomenon - a party organised to swap second hand clothes. Everyone takes along clothes they no longer wear and people can then choose the ones they want.

swollen or swelled (US) head
Someone who has a swollen or swelled (US) head  has become proud or conceited, usually because of a recent success.
"Larry's promotion has given him a swollen head!"

fall on your sword
If you fall on your sword, you accept the consequences of an unsuccessful or wrong action.
"The organiser of the referendum resigned when the poor results were announced. It was said that he fell on his sword."

all systems go
When everything is ready for an activity or event to begin, you can say that 'all systems go'.
"We've got an office, a telephone and the internet - so on Monday it's all systems go!"

tail wagging the dog 
This expression refers to a situation where there is a reversal of roles, with the small or minor element having a controlling influence on the most important element.
"If you let your children decide on everything, it will be a case of the tail wagging the dog!"

on somebody's tail  
If you are on somebody's tail, you are following them closely.
"The suspect hasn't been arrested yet, but the police are on his tail."

take a back seat  
If you take a back seat you choose to have a less important function and become less involved in something.
"He decided it was time to take a back seat and let someone younger run the club."

take the bloom off something 
If an incident or event takes the bloom off something, it spoils it or makes it less enjoyable.
"Their noisy argument in the middle of the party took the bloom off the atmosphere."

take the bull by the horns 
To take the bull by the horns means that a person decides to act decisively in order to deal with a difficult situation or problem.
"When the argument turned into a fight, the bar owner took the bull by the horns and called the police."

take it on the chin 
When you take it on the chin, you are brave and accept adversity, criticism or defeat without complaining.
"When his contract was not renewed, Mark took it on the chin."

take your courage in both hands 
If you take your courage in both hands, you make yourself do something very brave.
"When Andy saw the child in the burning house, he took his courage in both hands and ran inside."

take cover 
When someone takes cover, they hide from a danger, or bad weather, in a place where they find protection.
"As soon as the explosion was heard, people ran to take cover."

take one's cue 
When you take your cue from someone, you wait for a signal or follow someone's example, so as to know what to do yourself or when to act.
"The waiter took his cue from Jack and starting serving the drinks."

take a dim view of something 
If you take a dim view of something, you disapprove of it.
"When Harry and Sally decided to live together without getting married, their grandparents took a dim view of the situation."

take it easy 
When you relax, or do things at a comfortable pace, you take it easy.
"It's nice to slow down at the week-end and take it easy."

take the easy way out 
If you take the easy way out, you choose the easiest way to deal with a difficult situation, even if it is not the best solution.
"The weather conditions were so bad that Mary took the easy way out and cancelled her appointment."

take a fancy 
If you take a fancy to someone or something, you develop a fondness for them or begin to like them.
"I think Paul has taken a fancy to the new intern!"

take the floor 
When someone takes the floor, they rise to make a speech or presentation.
"When I take the floor, my speech will be short." my father said.

take with a grain of salt 
To say that certain information should be taken with a grain of salt means that you doubt its accuracy.
"I hear the tuition fees are going to be reduced, but that should be taken with a grain of salt."

take the law into your own hands
If, instead of calling the police, you act personally against someone who has done something wrong, you take the law into your own hands.
"Instead of calling the police, he took the law into his own hands and confronted the youth who had stolen his son's scooter."

take leave of your senses
To ask someone if they 'have taken leave of their senses' means that you think their behaviour is crazy.
"You're going skiing in this blizzard? Have you taken leave of your senses? "

take your life into your hands
To say that someone is taking their life in their hands means that they are taking the risk of being killed.
"If you drive home on this icy road, you'll be taking your life in your hands."

take a load off your mind
If something takes a load (or weight) off someone's mind, it brings great relief because a problem has been solved.
"When the company closed down, finding a new job took a load off Tom's mind."

take matters into your own hands
If you take matters into your hands, you take action yourself rather than waiting for others to intervene.
"When Susan saw the lack of progress, she decided to take matters into her own hands."

take the mickey out of someone
If you take the mickey out of someone, you tease them or make fun of their behaviour, sometimes in an unkind way.
"Jessica's dad is always taking the mickey out of her about the time she spends styling her hair."

take your mind off (something)
If an activity takes your mind off something that is worrying you, it helps you to stop thinking about it for a while.
"Sarah was worrying about the result of the test so Tom took her to the cinema to take her mind off it."

take it upon yourself
If you take something upon yourself, you do it without asking for permission or agreement.
"My colleague took it upon herself to redecorate the office during my absence."

take a nosedive
If something takes a nosedive, it drops or decreases in value very rapidly.
"The stock market took a nosedive when the property market began to weaken."

take pains
If you take pains to do something, you try very hard or make a special effort to do it as well as possible.
"Great pains were taken to ensure the security of the athletes."

take the plunge
If you take the plunge, you finally decide to venture into something you really want to do, in the spite of the risks involved.
"Mark and Emily finally took the plunge and opened a guesthouse."

take a rain check
To say that you take a rain check means that you cannot accept an invitation or offer now, but you will be happy to accept it later.
"Do you mind if I take a rain check on that lunch invitation? I'm going to be away all week."

take the rap
If you take the rap, you accept blame or punishment for something, even if you are not responsible.
"The whole class had to the take the rap for the disorder."

take the rough with the smooth
If you take the rough with the smooth, you accept what is unpleasant or difficult as well as what is pleasant or easy.
"Life isn't always easy; you have to learn to take the rough with the smooth. "

take shape
When something such as a plan or project begins to take shape, it starts to become organised and acquire a definite form.
"My new website is beginning to take shape."

take as read
Something that does not need to be discussed because it is already understood or agreed upon can be taken as read.
"We're getting married in September and you take it as read that you ar e all invited."

take down a peg
If you take someone down a peg, you make that person realize that they are not as important as they think they are.
"He is too proud. Somebody needs to take him down a peg."

take in good part
A person who takes something in good part reacts to it in a good-humoured way, without taking offence.
"He got a lot of teasing about his promotion but he took it in good part."

take (something) in your stride
When, in a difficult situation, you take things in your stride, you deal with the situation calmly and without any special effort.
"When the take-over was announced, Tom stayed calm and took it in his stride."

take (something) lying down
If you take something lying down, you suffer as a result of an offensive act without reacting or protesting.
"Jack won't take the accusation lying down - he'll fight to defend his reputation. "

(not) take no for an answer
Someone who willnot take no for an answer is very insistent in the way they make their request or offer and is unwilling to accept a refusal.
"My grandmother insisted that we stay for dinner and wouldn't take no for an answer."

take offline
If you suggest that a subject be taken offline (during a meeting for example), you consider that it is a separate issue and should be discussed at another time.
"Peter, you're confusing things, so let's take that offline shall we?"

take someone for a ride
To take someone for a ride means to cheat or deceive them.
"I discovered he had charged me double the normal fee. He really took me for a ride!"

take a stand
If you take a stand, you adopt a firm position on an issue and publicly declare whether or not you support it.
"The politician was asked to take a stand on the government's proposed measures to curb illegal immigration."

take steps
If you take steps, you start a course of action in order to accomplish something.
"The town is taking steps to improve security in public car parks."

take the sting out of something
If you take the sting out of something, you manage to reduce the severity or unpleasantness of something.
"A comforting voice and sympathetic attitude can take the sting out of bad news."

take stock of a situation
If you take stock of a situation you assess all the aspects in order to form an opinion.
"He took time to take stock of the situation before making a suggestion. "

take someone to the cleaners
If someone is taken to the cleaners, they lose a lot of money in an unfair way, usually by being robbed or cheated.
"When the company Tom had invested in went bankrupt, he realized he had been taken to the cleaners."

take to something like a duck to water
If you take to something like a duck to water, you do it naturally and easily, without fear or hesitation.
"When Sophie first tried skiing, she took to it like a duck to water."

take the words out of someone's mouth
If you say exactly what someone else was going to say, you take the words out of their mouth.
"I entirely agree with you. You took the words out of my mouth."

(it) takes two to tango
You say this when you think that a difficult situation or argument cannot be the fault of one person alone.
"Okay, I've heard Fred's side of the story - but it takes two to tango!"

take unawares
If something takes you unawares, it surprises you because you were not expecting it.
"His angry reaction took me unawares."

take under your wing
If you offer guidance and protection to someone younger or less experienced, you take them under your wing.
"I owe a lot to Tom who took me under his wing when I first arrived."

take the wind out of someone's sails
If someone or something takes the wind out of your sails, they make you feel less confident by doing or saying something that you do not expect.
"The manager's rejection of our marketing strategy really took the wind out of our sails."

talk the hind leg off a donkey
This expression is used to describe a very talkative person.
"It's difficult to end a conversation with Betty. She could talk the hind leg off a donkey!"

talk nineteen to the dozen
If someone talks nineteen to the dozen, they speak very quickly.
"He was talking nineteen to the dozen so I didn't catch the whole story."

talk shop
If you talk shop, you talk about your work or business in a social situation with someone you work with, and make the conversation boring for the others present.
"I never go out with my colleagues because we inevitably end up talking shop."

tall story
A tall story is a story or statement which is difficult to believe because it sounds unlikely.
"What he said about a stolen invention sounds like a tall story to me."

on tap
If something is on tap, it is easily obtained or available for immediate use, like water from a tap.
"You can find a multitude of useful resources on tap on the internet."

tar baby
This term refers to a sticky situation or problem for which it is virtually impossible to find a solution.
"He was advised not to get involved in the controversy which was considered a tar-baby issue."

tar with the same brush
When a person istarred with the same brush, they are regarded as having the same faults or bad qualities as those they associate with.
"Don't hang around with those guys or you'll be tarred with the same brush."

a taste of one's own medicine
If you give someone a taste of their own medicine, you treat them in the same unpleasant way that they have treated you.
"People who always arrive late should be given a taste of their own medicine."

in tatters
Something that is badly torn, in very poor condition or damaged beyond repair is in tatters.
"His reputation is in tatters after the latest scandal."

run a taut ship
When a group or organisation is run in a well-ordered and disciplined manner, the person in charge runs a taut (or tight) ship.
"The director of the scout camp runs a taut ship."

not for all the tea in China
To say that you would not do something for all the tea in China means that you would not do it under any conditions.
"I wouldn't live there for all the tea in China."

teach someone a lesson
If you teach somebody a lesson, you do something to punish them for behaving badly and make them understand that they should not do it again.
"The next time she arrives late, she'll find the door closed. That'll teach her a lesson! "

(you can't) teach an old dog new tricks
This expression means that someone who is used to doing things in a certain way will find it difficult to change their habits.
"Your grandfather will never use a smart phone. You can't teach an old dog new tricks!"

tear one's hair out
If someone is tearing their hair out, they are extremely agitated or distressed about something.
"I've been tearing my hair out all morning trying to find the error!"

tear a strip off
If you tear a strip off someone, you reprimand them severely for doing something wrong.
"The teacher tore a strip off Charlie for not doing his homework."

tech savvy
People who are tech savvy have sufficient technical knowledge and skills to be comfortable using computers and other electronic devices.
"Many students are more tech-savvy than their teachers."

by the skin of one's teeth
If you manage to do something by the skin of your teeth, you succeed in doing it but you almost fail.
"The traffic was so heavy I thought I'd miss the train, but I caught it by the skin of my teeth."

sink one's teeth into (something)
If you sink your teeth into something, you do it with a lot of energy and enthusiasm.
"When Julie got promoted, she immediately sank her teeth into her new job."

teeth chattering
If your teeth are chattering, you are extremely cold.
"Was I cold? My teeth were chattering!"

teething problems
The difficulties encountered during the initial stage of an activity or project are called teething problems.
"We had some teething problems when we first opened the bookshop, but now everything is okay."

tell someone a thing or two
If you tell someone a thing or two, you express you thoughts (usually criticism) very clearly.
"'Let me tell you a thing or two about your son's behaviour' said John to the boy's father."

on tenterhooks
A person who is on tenterhooks is in a state of anxious suspense or excitement.
"The candidate were kept on tenterhooks for hours while the panel deliberated."

test the waters
If you test the water(s), you try to find out how acceptable or successful something is before becoming involved in it.
"You should go to a gym class to test the water before enrolling."

text-walking
This term refers to a recently-developed and somewhat dangerous habit of walking while texting a message on a mobile phone, completely unaware of what is happening around you.
"In recent months there has been an increase in the number of serious accidents involving text-walkers."

thank your lucky stars
When someone says they can thank their lucky stars, they are expressing heartfelt gratitude or feeling particularly fortunate.
"I can thank my lucky stars I wasn't on the train that crashed."

that figures!
This expression is used to say that something seems logical or is as expected.
"We'll have to get a bigger car when the baby arrives." "That figures!"

that's going too far!
If you go too far, you do something that is considered extreme or unacceptable.
"Stealing is bad, but stealing from a poor person is really going too far!"

that make my blood boil!
If something makes your blood boil, it makes you really angry.
"Her condescending attitude really makes my blood boil!"

that makes two of us!
This expression indicates agreement with what has just been said.
"I found his speech rather boring." "That makes two of us!"

that takes the biscuit!
This expression refers to something very annoying or irritating.
"After waiting for an hour, we were told there no seats left. That took the biscuit!"

that's the last straw
This expression means that this is the latest unpleasant event and that you cannot tolerate the situation any longer.
"After an extremely tiring day, when Joe saw the the traffic jam he said : that's the last straw!"

that's the way the ball bounces
Things don't always work out as planned, and there's nothing we can do about it - that's life!
"He didn't get the prize he expected, but never mind - that's the way the ball bounces!"

that's the way the cookie crumbles
To say 'that's the way the cookie crumbles' means that is the way things are and nothing can be done about it - that's life!

there for the taking
If something is there for the taking, it is easy to obtain.
"When our main competitor went out of business, the market segment was there for the taking."

there's one born every minute
This expression means that there are many people in the world who are stupid or easily fooled.
"He really believed the boy found the money on the street? There's one born every minute!"

there wasn't a soul
To say that there wasn't a soul means that there was nobody.
"We thought the museum would be crowded but there wasn't a soul."

there's no accounting for taste
This expression is used to indicate surprise at another person's likes or dislikes.
"She fell in love with a guy who's short, fat, bald and poor ... there's no accounting for taste! "

there's nothing to it
If you say that there's nothing to it, you mean that something is very simple or easy to do.
"I'll show you how to make pancakes. There's nothing to it!"

(as) thick as thieves
To say that two people are as thick as thieves means that they are very close friends who are very loyal to each other.
"Chris always takes Danny's side. They're as thick as thieves."

through thick and thin
If someone does something through thick and thin, they do it in spite of all the difficulties and problems.
"Bob is famous today, but Tom is still his best friend, the one who supported him through thick and thin."

thin end of the wedge
To refer to an event or action as the thin end of the wedge means that it is thought to be the beginning of something that will become more serious.
"According to the media, today's outsourcing is just the thin end of the wedge."

a thin line
When there is a thin (or fine) line between feeling or situations, there is a point where it is difficult to distinguish between them.
"There's a thin line between showing concern and being indiscreet - so don't overdo it! "

thin on the top
If someone, usually a man, is thin on the top, they are losing their hair or going bald.
"Dad's gone a bit thin on the top in the last few years."

thing of the past
Something which no longer exists or is rarely used today is a thing of the past.
"Few people use video cassettes today - they've become a thing of the past."

things are looking up
To say that things are looking up means that the situation is improving and you feel more positive about the future.
"Andy has got two job interviews next week so things are looking up."

think again
If you tell someone to think again, you advise them to reconsider the situation and perhaps change their decision.
"Your apartment is well located; you should think again before selling it."

think better of it
If you think better of something, you decide not to do something that you intended to do.
"I wanted to go shopping, but when I saw the crowded car park I thought better of it."

think on your feet
A person who thinks on their feet is capable of adjusting rapidly to new developments and making quick decisions.
"Good lawyers need to be able to think on their feet when pleading a case."

think outside the box
People who think outside the box try to find innovative ideas or solutions.
"Our competitors are more creative than us - they really think outside the box!"

think the sun rises and sets on someone
If you consider someone to be the most wonderful person in the world, you think the sun rises and sets on them.
"She adores her husband - she thinks the sun rises and sets on him!"

think the world of
If you think the world of someone, you like or admire them very much.
"She's a wonderful grandmother - the children think the world of her."

thinly veiled
If something such as a feeling or reaction is thinly veiled, it is barely hidden.
"His disappointment was thinly veiled when he saw what he had won."

thorn in your side
If you say that someone is a thorn in your side, you mean that they continually irritate or annoy you.
"Jane finds her mother-in-law very irritating, a real thorn in her side!"

thorny issue
If you are faced with a thorny issue, you have to deal with a difficult or unpleasant problem.
"Copyright and content duplication are thorny issues these days."

thrilled to bits
Someone who is thrilled to bits is extremely pleased about something.
"Sophie was thrilled to bits when her project was selected."

at each other's throats
Two people who areat each other's throats are always fighting or arguing.
"The two candidates for the election are constantly at each other's throats."

throw a bone
If you throw someone a bone, you say something kind or reward them in some way to make them feel good.
"The old man can't help very much but Bill throws him a bone now and then to keep him happy."

throw caution to the wind
If you throw caution to the wind, you start taking risks and stop worrying about the danger involved.
"I decided to throw caution to the wind and invest in my best friend's new company."

throw dust in someone's eyes
If you throw dust in someone's eyes, you prevent them from seeing the truth by misleading them.
"He threw dust in the old lady's eyes by pretending to be a police officer, then stole her jewellery."

throw good money after bad
Someone who spends additional money on something that was already considered a bad investment is said to throw good money after bad.
"Buying a second-hand computer and then spending money to have it repaired is throwing good money after bad! "

throw money at (something)
If you throw money at something, you try to solve a problem by spending money on it, without using any other methods.
"The refugee problem cannot be solved just by throwing money at it!"

throw your hat into the ring
If you throw or toss your hat in the ring, you announce that you are going to enter a competition or take up a challenge.
"He finally threw his hat in the ring and announced that he was going to stand for election."

throw (something) over the wall
If someone throws something over the wall, they deal with part of a problem or project, then pass the responsibility to another person or department without any communication or coordination.
"You can't just manufacture a product then throw it over the wall to the sales department!"

throw pearls to pigs
This expression means that it is wasteful to offer something valuable or useful to someone who does not understand or appreciate it.
"The singer had a beautifully trained voice but the audience didn't listen - talk about throwing pearls to pigs!"

throw something together
If you throw something together, you make or produce something quickly and without effort.
"Why don't you stay for dinner - I'll throw something together!"

throw a spanner in the works
If someone or something throws a spanner (or a wrench) in the works, they do something that causes problems and prevents the success of a plan or event.
"The two companies were keen to sign the agreement before anything happened to throw a spanner in the works."

throw a tantrum
If a person, especially a child, throws a tantrum, they become angry and behave in an unreasonable way.
"My sister's little boy is always throwing tantrums - he's thoroughly spoilt!"

throw in the towel
If you throw in the towel, you admit that you cannot succeed.
"After unsuccessfully competing in several championships, the athlete decided to throw in the towel and go back to college."

throw a wobbly/wobbler
When someone, usually a capricious person, throws a wobbly, they have a fit of nerves or bad temper and lose all self-control.
"He's very calm - not the sort of man to throw a wobbly if he doesn't have a clean shirt! "

rule of thumb
A rule of thumb is a general rule which is a handy way of measuring or calculating something.
"As a rule of thumb, use one quantity of vinegar and 3 quantities of oil to make a salad dressing."

all thumbs
If you are all (fingers and) thumbs, you are awkward and clumsy and do things incorrectly.
"Would you mind wrapping this for me? I'm all (fingers and) thumbs."

tick the right boxes
When something ticks all the right boxes, it is perfect for you because it meets your entire list of criteria.
"We're in luck! We visited an apartment today that ticks all the right boxes!"

tickle the ivories
This is a humorous way of talking about playing the piano.
"My grandfather loves playing the piano; he tickles the ivories whenever he can."

tickled pink
If you are tickled pink, you are very pleased about something.
"My dad was tickled pink when he was asked to announce the winner."

the tide has turned
When a trend has changed from one thing to another, the tide has turned.
"Before, people wanted to live in residential suburbs; now the tide has turned and warehouses are being converted into fashionable loft apartments."

tide over
If you tide someone over, you support them through a difficult period for a certain length of time.
"With this weather it's impossible to get to the shops, but we have enough food to tide us over until next week."

tie the knot
When two people tie the knot, they get married.
"Guess what! Tom and Sarah are finally going to tie the knot!"

tie yourself up in knots
If you tie yourself up in knots, you become totally confused or confuse others when trying to explain something.
"Sandy tied herself up in knots trying to explain the rules of the game."

tied to someone's apron strings
A person who is tied to another's apron strings, remain dependent at an age when they should be independent.
"All his decisions are influenced by his mother. He's still tied to her apron strings."

tight squeeze
If you are in a tight squeeze, you are in a cramped or crowded situation.
"We managed to get on the bus but it was a tight squeeze."

tight spot
Someone who is in a tight spot is in a very difficult situation.
"The recent strike has put the airline company in a tight spot."

tighten your belt
If you need to tighten your belt, you must spend your money carefully because there is less available.
"Another bill? I'll have to tighten my belt this month!"

walk a tightrope
If a person is walking a tightrope, they are in a difficult situation where they must act carefully.
"The management is walking a tightrope in their efforts both to keep the costs down and satisfy the trade unions."

till the cows come home
To say 'till the cows come home' means for a long time or forever.
"You can ask till the cows come home but I'm not buying you a scooter!"

time after time
If you do something time after time, you do it repeatedly or on many occasions.
"The was surprised when the teacher punished him although he had been warned time after time."

for the time being
If you talk about how a situation is for the time being, you mean that it is temporary and will probably change in the future.
"Laura has left John and is living with her parents for the time being."

in one's own sweet time
When you do something in your own sweet time, you take as long as you please to do it in spite of the orders or wishes of others.
"Okay, I'll do it - but in my own sweet time!"

since time immemorial
If something has existed since time immemorial, it has been there for such a long time that nobody can recall a time without it.
"I don't know when that bridge was built. It's been there since time immemorial."

time is ticking away
The expression 'time is ticking away' can be used when you see the minutes or seconds going by as the clock ticks, especially when you are waiting anxiously for something to happen.
"We need to intervene before it's too late. Time's ticking away."

time-honoured practice
A custom that is universally respected, or a traditional way of doing something, is called a time-honoured practice.
"Guests were greeted according to a time-honored practice."

stuck in a time warp
Something that has not changed at all from some time in the past, when everything else has, is caught or stuck in a time warp.
"This place seem to be stuck in a time warp. It's exactly as it was in the 1950's."

tip of the iceberg
The tip of the iceberg is the part that is known of a problem or situation which is thought to be much more serious.
"Journalists say that the report on corruption only examines the tip of the iceberg."

tit for tat
This expression refers to an injury or insult given in return for one received.
"He kicked me, so I kicked him - it was tit for tat!" said the boy."

toe the line
If someone toes the line, they obey the rules and accept the principles laid down by a person, group or organisation.
"If you want to stay in this school, you'll have to learn to toe the line."

toing and froing
Someone who is toing and froing is either repeatedly going from one place to another and coming back, or is constantly changing their mind about something.
"After months of toing and froing, a compromise was reached between the two parties."

token gesture
To make a token gesture means to show a small sign of appreciation.
"As a token gesture of gratitude for her neighbourly advice, he gave Mrs.Smith a plant for her garden."

by the same token
If you apply the same rule to different situations, you judge them by the same token, or in a similar way.
"Teenagers should be less rebellious, but by the same token, parents should be more understanding."

tomorrow's another day
This expression means that even if everything is not satisfactory at present, there will be opportunity for things to improve.
"For the moment you need some rest; tomorrow's another day. "

bite your tongue
If you bite your tongue, you stop yourself from saying what you really think.
"Sam decided to bite his tongue rather than get into an argument."

keep a civil tongue
People who keep a civil tongue express themselves in polite terms.
"Don't speak so rudely! You must learn to keep a civil tongue in all circumstances."

hold your tongue
If you hold your tongue, you stay silent and say nothing.
"The party was supposed to be a surprise, but unfortunately the little boy couldn't hold his tongue."

get your tongue round something
If you are able to pronounce a difficult word or phrase, you can get your tongue round it.
"She's from the village of Llanfairpwllgwyngyll. Try getting your tongue round that!"

give the (rough) edge of your tongue
If you give the (rough) edge of your tongue, you scold someone severely or speak to them very aggressively or rudely.
"My boss was so angry that I really got the rough edge of his tongue."

(a) slip of the tongue
A slip of the tongue is a small spoken error or mistake.
"Did I say 'blow down'? - Sorry, I meant 'slow down' - that was a slip of the tongue!"

on the tip of your tongue
To say that a word or answer is on the tip of your tongue, means that you're sure you know it but have difficulty finding it.
"What's that actor's name? I know it ... it's on the tip of my tongue!"

tongue in cheek
If you describe a remark as 'tongue in cheek' you mean that it is not meant to be taken seriously; it is meant to be funny or ironic.
"Peter's remark was taken more seriously than intended. It was supposed to be tongue in cheek."

tongue-lashing
When you scold someone severely, you give them a tongue-lashing.
"The teacher gave Jeremy a tongue-lashing when arrived late for school."

tongue-tied
If you are tongue-tied, you have difficulty in expressing yourself because you are nervous or embarrassed.
"At the start of the interview I was completely tongue-tied!"

tongues are wagging / set tongues wagging
When tongues are wagging, people are beginning to spread gossip or rumours, often about someone's private life.
"The photograph of the couple that appeared in a magazine really set tongues wagging."

too many chiefs, not enough Indians
This expression refers to a situation where there are too many people giving instructions and not enough people doing the work.
"The business wasn't successful. There were too many chiefs and not enough Indians."

too much like hard work
An activity or task that requires too much effort is too much like hard work.
"It's so hot today, there's no way I'm going to do any cooking. That's too much like hard work!"

toot your own horn
If you toot your own horn, you like to boast about your abilities and achievements.
"Ben is very discreet about his success. He doesn't go round tooting his own horn. "

(fight) tooth and nail 
If you fight tooth and nail for something, you fight with all your energy.
"The Transport Minister fought tooth and nail to have the proposed road safety law accepted."

top dog
To say that a person, group or country is top dog means that they are better or more powerful than others.
"She's top dog in cosmetics today."

at the) top of your lungs
If you shout at the top of your lungs, you shout as loudly as you possibly can.
"The place was so noisy that I had to shout at the top of my lungs to be heard."

top notch
To say that something is top notch means that it is of the highest possible quality or standard.
"The hotel was wonderful and the service was top notch."

(on) top of the world
If you feel on top of the world, you are extremely happy because everything is going well for you.
"It's been such a good year for Amy that she feels on top of the world."

toss up
When there are two options or possibilities to choose from, and both are equally good, the choice between the two is called a toss-up (like tossing a coin).
"Both boxers are in excellent condition. It's a toss-up which of them will win."

touch base
If you touch base with someone, you make contact or renew communication with them.
"I'll try to touch base with you next week in London."

(at the) touch of a button
If you can do something at the touch of a button, you can do it very easily, often thanks to technology.
"From now on the nursing staff can be alerted at the touch of a button."

touch wood / knock on wood
This humorous expression, based on superstition, is used to avoid bad luck, often while touching something made of wood.
"The order will be confirmed shortly - touch wood!"

(not) touch with a ten-foot pole
If you decide not to touch something with a ten-foot pole, you prefer to stay far away from it.
"I wouldn't touch politics with a ten-foot pole!"

touch and go
If something is touch-and-go, the outcome or result is uncertain.
"Dave's life is out of danger now, but it was touch-and-go after the operation."

(as) tough as old boots
If something, especially meat, is (as) tough as old boots, it is hard to cut and difficult to chew.
(This can also refer to a person who is strong either physically or in character.)
"I was served a steak as tough as old boots."

tough cookie
A person who is a tough cookie is someone with a strong and determined character who is not easily intimidated, discouraged or defeated.
"I'm not worried about Jason's future - he's a tough cookie!"

tower of strength
The term tower of strength is used to describe a person who is very helpful and supportive during difficult times.
"All during my illness, my sister was a tower of strength."

toy with the idea
If you consider something without giving it serious thought, you toy with the idea.
"Sally has often toyed with the idea of moving abroad, but she's still here!"

trade secret 
This term refers to the secrecy of a company's production methods but is often used teasingly.
"Can you give me the recipe for your lemon meringue pie?"  " No way - that's a trade secret!"

train of thought
A sequence of connected ideas is called a train of thought.
"I was considering the different options when the noise outside broke my train of thought."

travel light
When you travel light, you travel with as little luggage as possible.
"If you intend to go trekking, you'd better travel light."

tread water
If you are treading water, your situation remains stationary in spite of your efforts, with no sign of any progress.
"I've been treading water for the past year hoping to find a better job."

trial and error
Attempting to achieve a satisfactory result by testing and eliminating various methods until the best one is found is called trial and error.
"Some of the best cooks learn by trial and error."

trial balloon
If you test something such as an idea, a project or a product, to see how people respond to it, you send up a trial balloon.
"The idea seemed excellent, but when they sent up a trial balloon the reaction was very negative."

tricks of the trade
This term refers to a clever or expert way of doing things, especially in a job.
"He's a tough negotiator; he knows all the tricks of the trade."

tried and tested
If a method has been tried and tested, it can be trusted because it has been used successfully in the past and is known to work.
"There's no risk involved. The method has been tried and tested."

trilemma
The term trilemma is used for a situation which is even more difficult than a dilemma, because a choice must be made between three options that seem equally undesirable.

wear the trousers
The partner who wears the trousers (or pants) is the one who makes the important decisions.
"The salesman hesitated. It was difficult to see who wore the trousers in the couple."

come up trumps
To say that someone has come up trumps means that they have achieved unexpectedly good results.
"Against all expectations, our team came up trumps in the cup final."

truth will out
This expression means that despite efforts to conceal the facts, the truth cannot be hidden forever.
"I don't know if the police gave the full details, but inevitably truth will out."

try someone's patience
If you find it difficult to be patient with someone because of their irritating attitude or behaviour, you can say that they are trying your patience.
"His constant interruptions began to try the teacher's patience."

tug at the heartstrings
Something or someone who tugs at the heartstrings causes others to feel a great deal of pity or sadness.
"The hospital's plea for donors tugged at the heartstrings of millions of viewers."

tunnel vision
If a person has tunnel vision, they focus on only one aspect of something, or they are unable to see more than one way of doing things.
"Our manager has tunnel vision. He sees no reason to change anything."

(like) turkeys voting for Christmas 
If turkeys were allowed to vote they would never vote for Christmas because turkey is often eaten at Christmas.
This expression is used to say that a particular option is unlikely to be chosen because it would be against the interests of the people concerned.
"Accepting a decrease in salary would be like turkeys voting for Christmas!"

turn a blind eye
If you turn a blind eye to something, you pretend not to notice what someone is doing.
"The old man turns a blind eye when he sees children taking apples from his garden."

turn a deaf ear
If you turn a deaf ear to something, you refuse to listen.
"Sam turned a deaf ear to his wife's advice and went off in the rain without an umbrella."

(not) turn a hair
If someone does not turn a hair, they show no emotion in circumstances where a reaction is expected.
"When the police came to arrest him, he didn't turn a hair."

turn the tables
If you turn the tables on a person or organisation, you reverse the situation so as to be in a position of superiority.
"The success of our new product has turned the tables on our competitors."

turn on/up the heat
If you turn on or up the heat on someone, you put pressure on them in order to obtain what you want.
"If the goods are not delivered this week, we'll have to turn up the heat."

turn on the waterworks
If someone turns on the waterworks, they start to cry, especially to obtain something.
"If he doesn't get what he wants, the child immediately turns on the waterworks. "

turn over a new leaf
If a person turns over a new leaf, they decide to change their behaviour and lead a better life.
"When Ted left prison, he was determined to turn over a new leaf."

(take a) turn for the worse
If a person who is ill takes a turn for the worse, their illness becomes more serious.
"We hoped he would recover but he took a turn for the worse during the night."

turn turtle
If a boat turns turtle, it capsizes or turns upside down in the water.
"We had fun sailing yesterday, although we nearly turned turtle a couple of times!"

turn up like a bad penny
If someone turns up like a bad penny, they appear at a place or event where they are not welcome or not wanted.
"I try to avoid Jane, but wherever I go she's turns up like a bad penny!"

turn up your nose
If you turn up your nose at something, you reject it because you think it is not good enough for you.
"He's out of work, but he turns up his nose at any job he's offered."

twenty-four-seven
This term refers to something which is available or happens twenty-four hours a day, seven days a week.
"The tourist office provided a list of 24-7 supermarkets in the area."

twiddle your thumbs
A person who twiddles their thumbs has nothing to do, or is doing nothing useful.
"Go and help your father! You can't sit there all day twiddling your thumbs!"

in the twinkling of an eye 
This expression means 'very fast' or 'instantaneously'.
"Public opinion can change in the twinkling of an eye."

twist someone's arm
If you twist someone's arm, you make them do something, without using physical force.
"He didn't have to twist my arm when he invited me out for dinner - I was happy to accept!"

twist in the wind
If someone is left to twist in the wind, they are left to face a difficult situation without any assistance or support.
"He walked out of the press conference and left his agent twisting in the wind."

two of a kind
People who are two of a kind are similar in character, attitude or tastes.
"Pete and Ben are two of a kind; they enjoy sports and are very competitive."

two can play at that game
You say this to tell someone that you can behave towards them in the same unpleasant way that they have behaved towards you.
"He refuses to take my call? Tell him two can play at that game!"

two-faced
Someone who is two-faced is deceitful or insincere;  they will say one thing to your face and something else when you are not there.
"I don't trust Billy. I find him two-faced."

two left feet
If you have two left feet, you are clumsy or awkward in your movements.
"I'm afraid I'm a bad dancer. I've got two left feet!"

in two minds
If you are in two minds about something, you have difficulty deciding what to do.
"I'm in two minds about whether or not to accept the offer."

(it takes) two to tango
You say this when you think that a difficult situation cannot be the fault of one person alone.
"We've heard Fred's side of the story - but it takes two to tango!"

two peas in a pod
Two people who are like two peas in a pod are very similar in appearance.
"The two brothers are very alike - they're like two peas in a pod!"

(in) two shakes of a lamb's tail
To do something in two shakes of a lamb's tail means to do it very quickly.
"Wait for me. I'll be ready in two shakes (of a lamb's tail)."

two-time someone
If one person two-times another, they cheat on their partner by having a romantic relationship with another person at the same time.
"Sally left Harry when she discovered he was two-timing her."

two's company, three's a crowd
This is said of two people, particularly lovers, who would prefer to be alone together rather than to have someone else with them.
"I'd rather not come to the cinema with you, thanks. Two's company ...!"

put two and two together
To put two and two together means to reach the right conclusion based on the information you have.
"When she saw Jill and Ben holding hands, it wasn't hard to put two and two together!"

ugly as sin  
This expression is used to refer to people or things that are considered to be very unattractive.
"Have you seen the new neighbour's dog? It's as ugly as sin!"

uncharted waters 
If you are in uncharted waters, you are in a situation that you have never experienced before, so you don't know what's going to happen.
"In some countries, democracy is an adventure into uncharted waters."

under one's belt 
If you have something under your belt, you have acquired experience or have satisfactorily achieved something.
"You've got to have some work experience under your belt before you can hope to get a permanent job."

under close scrutiny 
Someone or something that is under (close) scrutiny is being watched or examined carefully.
"The police are keeping the suspect under close scrutiny."

under the knife 
If a person goes under the knife, they have surgery.
"I'm not worried about the anaesthetic. I've been under the knife several times."

under your thumb 
If someone is under your thumb, they are completely under your control or influence.
"Nobody ever protests. He has the whole group under his thumb."

under the weather 
If you are under the weather, you are not feeling very well.
"You look a bit under the weather. What's the matter?"

unmitigated disaster 
An unmitigated disaster is a complete failure or a total catastrophe.
"The organisation of the tournament was an unmitigated disaster!"

(you can't) unring a bell 
This expression means that you cannot undo what has been done, so you must live with the consequences of your actions.
"What's done is done. You can't unring a bell."

until hell freezes over 
If you tell someone that they can do something until hell freezes over, you mean that they can do it forever but they won't obtain what they want.
"You can ask until hell freezes over. I will not allow you to go bungee-jumping!"

unvarnished truth 
If you present someone with plain facts, without trying to embellish or soften the reality, you give them the unvarnished truth.
"Tell me how the accident happened, and I want the unvarnished truth."

up and about 
If someone is up and about, they are out of bed or have recovered after an illness or an injury.
"The boy was kept in hospital for a week but he's up and about again."

up/down one's alley 
If something is (right) up or down your alley, it is exactly the sort of thing that will suit your tastes or abilities.
"Alex loves reading, so a job in a bookshop is right up his alley."

on the up and up 
If you are on the up and up, you are becoming increasingly successful.
"The architect has been on the up and up since he designed a building in Dubai."

up in arms  
If you are up in arms about something, you are very angry.
"The population was up in arms over the demolition of the old theatre."

up in the air
If something, such as a plan or decision, is up in the air, it has not been decided or settled yet.
"I can't give you a definite answer yet; the project is still up in the air."

up for grabs
If something is up for grabs, it is available for anyone who wants to compete for it.
"You should enter the competition - there's $20000 in prizes up for grabs. "

up-to-the-minute
Something that is up-to-the-minute is the very latest or most recent version available.
"The internet is the best place to find up-to-the-minute news."

up to no good
When someone is up to no good, they are doing or planning something bad or wrong.
"When the shopkeeper saw the boys hiding behind a car, he suspected they were up to no good. "

up to par
If something is up to par, it meets the required standard.
"Javier didn't get the job because his English wasn't up to par."

up and running
If a business or a project is up and running, it has started and is fully operational.
"In some countries you can have a company up and running in a very short time."

uphill battle
A person faced with an uphill battle has to struggle against very unfavourable circumstances.
"After the terrible accident, his recovery was an uphill battle all the way."

upper crust
This term refers to the higher levels of society, the upper class or the aristocracy.
"William hides his working-class background and pretends to be from the upper crust."

upper hand
If a person or organisation gains or gets the upper hand, especially in a fight or competition, they take control over something.
"We increased our market share and gained the upper hand over our competitors."

on one's uppers
Someone who is on their uppers has very little money or not enough to cover their needs.
"Because he was clearly on his uppers when he was hired, he was given an advance in salary."

on the uptake
Someone who is quick or slow on the uptake is quick or slow to understand what is meant.
"Please explain the problem in simple words - I'm a bit slow on the uptake!"

use one's noodle
If you use your noodle, you use your brain or your common sense.
"How did I figure that out? I just used my noodle!"

(as) useful as a chocolate teapot
Something which is of no practical use at all is about as useful as a chocolate teapot.
"When there are no roads, a car is about as useful as a chocolate teapot!"

vanish into thin air 
If something vanishes into thin air, it disappears completely in a mysterious way.
"The diamonds vanished into thin air - nobody knows what happened to them."

variety is the spice of life 
This expression means that life is more interesting when you try to do different things.
"Since they retired, my parents have been trying out all sorts of new activities. Variety is the spice of life!"

vent your spleen 
When you vent your spleen, you release or express all your anger about something.
"Whenever Harry is angry about new government measures, he vents his spleen by writing to newspapers."

nothing ventured, nothing gained 
This expression means that you cannot expect to achieve anything if you never take any risks.
"He's going to ask his boss for a promotion even though he has little chance of obtaining satisfaction - nothing ventured, nothing gained!"

vertically challenged 
This term is a humoristic way of referring to someone who is not very tall.
"High shelves are difficult for vertically challenged shoppers."

vested interest 
If you have a vested interested in a situation or event, you expect to benefit or gain an advantage from it.
"Tony has a vested interest in Fred's promotion; he hopes to get his job!"

vicious circle 
When the solution to a problem creates another problem similar to the original, or makes it worse, so that the process starts all over again, the situation is called a vicious circle.
"I borrowed money to reimburse Paul. Now I've got to reimburse the bank, with interest. It's a vicious circle."

dim view 
If you take a dim view of something, you do not approve of it.
"When Harry and Sally decided to live together without getting married, their grandparents took a dim view of the situation."

vim and vigour 
If you are full of vim and vigour, you have lots of vitality, energy and enthusiasm.
"After a relaxing holiday, my parents came back full of vim and vigour."

in vino veritas 
This expression, which in Latin means 'in wine there is truth', is a way of saying that wine makes people less inhibited and leads them to speak more freely and reveal their true feelings.
"After a few drinks he told us the whole story - in vino veritas!"

virtue is its own reward 
The knowledge that you have done the right thing, or that you have acted in a moral way, is sufficient reward and you should not expect more.

by virtue of 
The term by virtue of means 'due to', 'because of' or 'on account of' something.
"The old lady got the most comfortable armchair by virtue of her age."

make a virtue of necessity 
If someone does something commendable, not deliberately but because they have no choice, and pretends to be doing it willingly and happily, they make a virtue of necessity.
"When, because of the high price of petrol, I decided to walk to work instead of taking my car, I made a virtue of necessity."

with one voice 
Two or more groups or organisations who are in complete agreement are said to speak with one voice.
"For once the government and the trade unions are speaking with one voice."

voice in the wilderness 
If you are the only person to express a warning or an opinion on a matter which is ignored by most others, you are a voice in the wilderness.
"For many years she was a voice in the wilderness protesting against child labour."

vote with one's feet 
If you vote with your feet, your show your dislike or disapproval of something by leaving.
"If the conference is boring, people will probably vote with their feet."

on the wagon 
Someone who is on the wagon is no longer drinking alcohol.
"No wine for me please - I'm on the wagon."

wait for the cat to jump  
If you wait for the cat to jump, or wait to see which way the cat jumps, you delay taking action until you see how events will turn out.
"Let's wait for the cat to jump before we decide."

waiting game  
A person who plays a waiting game delays taking any action or making any decision because they prefer to wait and see how things develop, usually in the hope that this will put them in a stronger position.
"Our competitors are not reacting. They're playing a waiting game."

waiting for a raindrop in the drought 
When someone is waiting for a raindrop in the drought, they are waiting and hoping for something that has little chance of happening.
"For many people, finding a job these days is like waiting for a raindrop in the drought."

waiting in the wings 
If someone is waiting in the wings, they are waiting for an opportunity to take action, especially to replace someone else in their job or position.
"There are many young actors waiting in the wings ready to show their talent."

walk all over someone 
If one person walks all over another, they treat them very badly or unkindly, especially by showing no consideration for their cares or needs.
"You must learn to defend yourself. Don't let him walk all over you!"

walk of life 
A person's profession or position in society is known as their walk of life.
"There were people from all walks of life among the protesters."

walk on air 
When you are happy or excited because of a pleasant event that makes you feel as if you were floating, you are walking on air.
"Sophie has been walking on air since her painting won first prize."

walk and chew gum 
If you can walk and chew gum (at the same time), you are able to do more than one thing at a time.
(This expression is often used negatively to indicate incompetence)
"Why did you hire that guy? He can't walk and chew gum at the same time!"

walk on eggshells 
If you walk on eggshells with someone, you are careful not to hurt or offend them.
"Carla is so sensitive you have to walk on eggshells with her all the time."

walk into lion's den 
If you walk into the lion's den, you find yourself in a difficult situation in which you have to face unfriendly or aggressive people.
"After the failure of the negotiations, he had to walk into the lion's den and face the media."

good walls make good neighbours 
This expression means that respecting one another's privacy helps create a good relationship between neighbours.
"We try not to disturb the people next door. Good walls make good neighbours."

walk a tightrope 
If a person is walking a tightrope, they are in a difficult or delicate situation where they must act carefully.
"The management is walking a tightrope in their efforts both to keep the costs down and satisfy the trade unions."

walking on air
When you are happy and excited because of a pleasant event that makes you feel as if you are floating, you are walking on air.
"Sophie has been walking on air since her painting won the first prize."

walking encyclopaedia
This term refers to a person who is very knowledgeable about a lot of subjects.
"The origin of Halloween? Ask Jill - she's a walking encyclopaedia!"

walking papers
If you are given your walking papers, your contract or a relationship has ended.
"After causing a diplomatic incident, Carter got his walking papers."

want someone's head on a platter
If someone makes you so angry that you want them to be punished, you want their head on a platter.
"He was so angry when he read the article about his family that he wanted the journalist's head on a platter."

in/through the wars
If a person or thing has been in (or through) the wars, they show signs of rough treatment, injury or damage.
"He arrived in a car that looked as if it had been in the wars."

watch your step
If you tell someone to watch their step, you are advising them to be careful how they behave in order to avoid getting into trouble.
"There is zero tolerance in this school for bad behaviour, so watch your step!"

watch like a hawk
If you watch someone like a hawk, you keep your eyes on them or watch them very carefully.
"Sarah watches the children like a hawk when she takes them swimming."

of the first water
Something that isof the first water is of the finest or most exceptional quality (like being compared to a diamond).
"The violinist gave a performance that was of the first water."

in hot water
To say that somebody is in hot water means that they have done something wrong and people are angry with them.
"Simon has been in hot water since his boss discovered that he had been using the internet for personal purposes."

not hold water
If an explanation or argument does not hold water, it does not stand up to critical examination and can be shown to be unfounded.
"The reasons given for the government's new measures just do not hold water."

water down
If you water down something such as a report, declaration or proposal, you try to make it weaker or less likely to cause anger.
"When announcing the rejection of the proposal, he tried to water down the committee's negative comments."

water off a duck's back
Criticism, comments or warnings that have no effect on someone is referred to as being 'like water off a duck's back'.
"He's been warned of the dangers of smoking but it's like water off a duck's back."

water under the bridge
If something difficult or unpleasant took place in the past but is no longer important, it is referred to as water under the bridge.
"They had a serious disagreement in the past, but that's water under the bridge today."

wave a dead chicken
When faced with a serious problem, if you take steps that you know in advance will be futile, to show that you made an effort,
you wave a dead chicken.
"The TV set was permanently damaged, but the technician decided to wave a dead chicken to satisfy the old lady before announcing the bad news."

(on the) same wavelength
If you are on the same wavelengthas someone else, you feel or think the same way about something.
"We rarely argue. We're generally on the same wavelength."

wax lyrical
When you wax lyrical about something, you speak enthusiastically about it in a poetic or sentimental way.
"My grandfather and his friends started to wax lyrical about the 'good old days'."

ways and means
The expression ways and means refers to the methods and resources available to do something.
"How will you manage to do that?" "Don't worry, there are ways and means."

weak as a kitten
Someone who is as weak as a kitten is very feeble or has no strength.
"During her illness she felt as weak as a kitten."

weak at the knees  
Someone who is weak at the knees is (temporarily) barely able to stand because of emotion, fear or illness.
"The shock of the announcement make me go weak at the knees!"

weal and woe
This expression refers to the good and bad times, the joys and sorrows, or prosperity and misfortune.
"We all get our share of weal and woe in life."

wear thin
Something that is wearing thin is decreasing or losing its interest.
"You've used that excuse so many times, it's beginning to wear thin - as in my patience!"

wear many hats
Someone who wears many hats has to do many different types of tasks or play a variety of roles.
"Our company is small so the employees need to be flexible and accept to wear many hats."

wear your heart on your sleeve
If you wear your heart on your sleeve, you allow others to see your emotions or feelings.
"You could see that she was hurt - she wears her heart on her sleeve!"

wear the trousers
The partner in a couple who wears the trousers is the one who makes all the important decisions.
"The salesman hesitated before the couple. It was difficult to see who wore the trousers."

wear out one's welcome
If someone wears out their welcome, they stay too long as a guest, causing inconvenience to their host.
"Alan and Sue invited us to stay on for a few days but we didn't want to wear out our welcome."

weather the storm
If you weather the storm, you succeed in surviving a difficult period or situation.
"Given the current recession, the company is weathering the storm better than most."

under the weather
If you are under the weather, you are not feeling very well.
"You look a bit under the weather. What's the matter?"

weigh pros and cons
If you weigh the pros and cons, you consider the advantages and disadvantages, the arguments for or against something.
"They weighed the pros and cons of the agreement before signing. "

weigh your words
If you weigh your words, you choose your words carefully in order to express exactly what you mean and avoid any misunderstanding.
"At the press conference he spoke very clearly, weighing his words."

wet behind the ears
Somebody who is wet behind the ears is inexperienced or immature.
"Scott shouldn't be given that job.  He's still a bit wet behind the ears."

wet the baby's head
This expression means to have drink to celebrate the birth of a baby.
"When his first child was born, Tom invited his colleagues to a local bar to wet the baby's head."

wet blanket
A person who is a wet blanket is so boring or unenthusiastic that they prevent others from enjoying themselves.
"Come on! Relax ! Don't be such a wet blanket!"

whale of a time
When people have a whale of a time, they enjoy themselves a lot.
"We had a whale of a time at the party last night."

what goes round comes round
This expression means that if you do something bad, something bad will happen to you eventually.
"He felt guilty about what he did, feeling that what goes round comes round."

what makes someone tick
When you try to understand what motivates someone or makes them behave the way they do, you want to know what makes them tick.
"He's a strange man.It's hard to figure out what makes him tick."

whatever floats your boat
Although you don't quite agree with someone, it's their choice and you think they should so whatever makes them happy.
"You're going to spend your honeymoon in Alaska? Well, whatever floats your boat!"

fifth wheel
This expression refers to a person who find themselves in a situation where their presence is unnecessary and as a result they feel useless.
"Everyone seemed to have a specific role except me. I felt like a fifth wheel."

wheeling and dealing
Someone accused of wheeling and dealing is thought to be involved in complicated, if not dishonest, deals in business or politics.
"Since the beginning of the election campaign, there's been a lot of wheeling and dealing going on."

wheels fall off
When a situation gets out of control and everything starts to go wrong, the wheels fall off.
"The wheels fell off her career when she started taking drugs and cancelling concerts."

when the going gets tough, the tough get going
When faced with a difficult or dangerous situation, and the going gets tough, strong people take action to solve the problem.
"Tom has a positive attitude. He often says 'When the going gets tough, the tough get going!'."

when the rubber hits the road
The moment when you put a theory into practice, or actually apply what you have learned, is when the rubber hits the road.
"The plan sounds good. I'd like to be there when the rubber hits the road."

while the going is good
If you take actionwhile the going is good, you do something before the situation changes and it is no longer possible.
"There's a 50% discount on subscriptions this month. I think I'll subscribe while the going is good."

whistle in the dark
If you whistle in the dark, you try to hide your fear and pretend to be brave in a scary or dangerous situation.
"Bob looks confident but he's just whistling in the dark; he knows he's going to lose his job."

whistle-blower
If you report an illegal or socially harmful activity to the authorities, and give information about those responsible for it, you are a whistle-blower.
"The poor working conditions were reported by a whistle-blower."

white Christmas
A white Christmas is when it snows at Christmas and the ground is white.
"We haven't had a white Christmas in twenty years."

white elephant
If you call something a white elephant, you consider it useless although it may have cost a lot of money.
"The new cultural centre is a real white elephant. It's so isolated that nobody goes there!"

white as a ghost
A person who is as white as a ghost looks very pale and frightened.
"She went as white as a ghost when she saw the gun."

white lie
If you tell a white lie, you say something which is not true in order to protect someone or to avoid hurting their feelings.
"Some parents prefer to tell their children a white lie rather than announce bad news."

whiz kid
A whiz kid is someone, usually young, who is very talented and successful at doing something.
"Apparently the new engineer knows what he's doing - a real whiz-kid from what I've heard."

whole caboodle / whole kit and caboodle
This expression means 'everything'.
"They provided everything we needed, tables, chairs, cutlery ... the whole caboodle."

why buy a cow when you can get milk for free
This refers to not paying for something that you can obtain for free.
"Rent is high, so Bobby is still living with his parents. He says : why buy a cow when you can get milk for free?"

why keep a dog and bark yourself
This expression means that there's no reason to do something yourself if someone or something can do the task for you.
"My grandmother has an electric mixer but she continues to make her cakes by hand. Why keep a dog and bark yourself?"

whys and wherefores
To talk about the whys and wherefores means to discuss the reasons.
"We need to discuss the whys and wherefores of our failure."

wide berth
If you give someone or something a wide berth, you stay at a prudent distance from them in order to avoid unwanted consequences.
"The only way to avoid traffic jams is to give the town centre a wide berth."

wide off the mark
If something is (or falls) wide off the mark, it is incorrect or inadequate, or it is not what was expected.
"The price offered was wide off the mark; it was sold for ten times more!"

widow's peak
A V-shaped point formed by the hair in the centre of the forehead is called a widow's peak. (It was believed to be a sign of early widowhood.)

wild goose chase
If someone is sent on a wild goose chase, they waste their time looking for something that there is little chance of finding.
"They tried to find out who sent the anonymous complaint, but it turned out to be a wild goose chase."

at will
When it is possible to do something at will, you can do it as and when you please, wherever and whenever you wish, without limit or restriction.
"He's so rich, he travel the world at will."

win by a nose
When there is a very slight difference between the winner and the other competitors, victory is won by a nose.
"One second ahead of the others, he won by a nose."

win-win
The term win-win refers to a situation or proposition where both or all parties benefit from the outcome.
"There were smiles all round when the contract was signed - it was a win-win situation."

wind up in the wrong hands
If something winds up in the wrong hands, it comes into the possession of someone undesirable, for example an opponent or a competitor.
"Put the plans away carefully. We don't want them to wind up in the wrong hands."

get wind of something
If you get wind of something, you hear about something you were unaware of, usually a private or secret matter.
"The chairman didn't want the press to get wind of the takeover before the agreement was signed."

knock/take wind out of sails
If someone or something knocks or takes the wind out of your sails, they make you feel less confident by doing or saying something that you do not expect.
"The manager's rejection of our marketing strategy really took the wind out of our sails."

know which way wind blows
This expression means that it is advisable to know how a situation is developing, or what the tendency is, in order to be prepared for any changes.
"Before we decide on anything, we need to know which way the wind is blowing "

wind up / wound up
If someone is so excited that they talk non-stop, they are wound up.
"Claire had so much to tell us after her trip that she was wound up."

window on the world
When something provides an opportunity to observe and learn about people and life in other countries, it is called a window on the world.
"The internet has become a window on the world."

window shopping
When people go window shopping, they look at things in shop windows, without actually purchasing anything.
"I haven't been paid yet, so I can only go window shopping."

go out the window
If a quality, principle or opportunity goes out the window, it disappears, is lost or is abandoned.
"When the plant closed down, all hopes of finding a job went out the window."

(can't put) new wine in old bottles
This expression means that you should not try to combine new concepts or innovations with an old or long-established framework or system.
"You'll never get that program to work on your father's old computer. You can't put new wine in old bottles!"

wing it
To wing it means to improvise or to deal with a situation without preparation.
"She didn't expect to be interviewed so she just had to wing it."

take under your wing
If you offer guidance and protection to someone younger or less experienced, you take them under your wing.
"I owe a lot to Andy who took me under his wing when I first arrived."

(not get a) wink of sleep
If someone doesn't get a wink of sleep, they don't sleep a all.
"It was so noisy in the hotel, I didn't get a wink of sleep."

winning ways
A person who has winning ways has a charming or persuasive manner of gaining the affection of others or obtaining what they want.
"My grandson is hard to resist - he's got such winning ways."

wipe the slate clean
If you wipe the slate clean, you make a fresh start and forget all past offences, disagreements or mistakes.
"When their father died, Bob and his brother decided to wipe the slate clean and forget the old family quarrels."

wipe that smile off
This expression is often used by parents or people in authority to indicate that the situation is not amusing at all.
"This is a very serious matter, so wipe that smile off your face!"

get wires crossed
If people get their wires crossed, they misunderstand each other or are confused about what was said.
"We must have got our wires crossed. I thought we were to meet at the hotel."

wise after the event
When someone understands, after something has happened, what could have been done to prevent it from happening, they are wise after the event.
"In retrospect, I suppose I should have understood that the boy was in difficulty and offered to help, but it's easy to be wise after the event."

wise for one's years/wise beyond your years
Someone who is wise for their years or wise beyond their years has more knowledge and experience that most people at their age.
"She's still a child but she's wise beyond her years."

wise up/get wise to something
If you wise up or get wise to something, you become fully aware of  the facts and are no longer fooled.
"When Mike finally wised up to the methods being used, he resigned from the company."

none the wiser
If you do not know more about something after hearing or reading an explanation, or if you fail to find information on the subject, you are none the wiser.
"I tried to understand the voting system but I was none the wiser after reading the explanation."

wish the ground would swallow you up
When you are so embarrassed by something that you would like to disappear, you wish the ground would swallow you up.
"When I realized I was reading the wrong report, I stood there in front of the group wishing the ground would swallow me up!"

your wish is my command
This is a humoristic way of saying that you are willing to do whatever the other person asks.
"Breakfast in bed? Your wish is my command!"

wishful thinking
Wishful thinking means believing that something that you want to happen is really happening or will happen, even though it is neither true nor likely.
"I think his health is improving a little, but perhaps that's just wishful thinking on my part."

wither on the vine
If something withers on the vine, it comes to an end or ceases to exist because people do not support or encourage it.
"Let's hope the recent efforts towards peace will not wither on the vine."

without a hitch
If something happens without a hitch, it takes place exactly as planned, without any difficulties.
"The ceremony went off without a hitch, to our great relief!"

at your wits' end
If you are at your wits' end, you are very worried about something and do not know what to do.
"When her son dropped out of school, Susan was at her wit's end."

throw a wobbly/wobbler
When someone, usually a capricious person, throws a wobbly, they have a fit of nerves or bad temper and lose all self-control.
"He's very calm - not the sort of man to throw a wobbly if he doesn't have a clean shirt! "

wolf in sheep's clothing
To describe someone as a wolf in sheep's clothing means that although they look harmless, they are really very dangerous.
"Be careful. He looks kind but in fact he's a wolf in sheep's clothing."

cry wolf
To cry wolf is to call for help when you are not really in danger.  As a result, nobody believes you when you really need help.
"There's Mary screaming again! Does she really need help or is she just crying wolf again?"

keep the wolf from the door
To keep the wolf from the door you need to have enough money to buy food and other basic essentials in order to survive.
"My grandparents earned barely enough to keep the wolf from the door."

wonders will never cease
This saying is used to express pleasure or surprise at something.
"The price of petrol has dropped! Wonders will never cease!"

can't see the wood for the trees
If someone can't see the wood for the trees, they are so concentrated on the details that they can't see the situation as a whole.
"The new manager found the situation so complicated that he couldn't see the wood for the trees."

touch/knock on wood
This humorous expression, based on superstition, is used to avoid bad luck, often while touching something made of wood.
"The order will be confirmed shortly - touch wood!"

wooden spoon
The person who finishes last in a race or competition receives an imaginary prize called the wooden spoon.
"Our team got the wooden spoon in this year's tournament."

come out of the woodwork
When things, or people, come out of the woodwork, they appear or emerge unexpectedly, as if from nowhere, and usually in large numbers.
"As soon as we added the swimming pool, our children had 'friends' coming out of the woodwork!"

wool-gathering
A person who is wool-gathering is daydreaming and not concentrating on what his happening;  their thoughts are elsewhere.
"Justin spent the whole afternoon wool-gathering. He must be in love!"

by word of mouth
Information passed on through conversation is transmitted by word of mouth.
"No announcement was necessary - the news had already spread by word of mouth."

from the word go
This expression means from the very beginning of an activity.
"Right from the word go he was rejected by the rest of the group."

(not) get a word in edgeways
During a discussion, if you can't get a word in edgeways, you can't say something because the others are talking so much.
"I tried to give my opinion, but I couldn't get a word in edgeways."

put in a good word
If you put in a good word for someone, you say positive things in support of that person in order to help them.
"If you apply for the job, I'll put in a good word for you."

put words in someone's mouth
If you claim that someone has said something, or suggest what they should say, you are putting words in their mouth.
"You're putting words in my mouth. I did not say I saw Mr. Brown. I said I saw his car!"

words fail me
This expression is often used when someone is so shocked, surprised or touched by something that they don't know what to say.
"What do you think of Bob's attitude?" "Words fail me!"

words of one syllable
If you explain something in words of one syllable, you use very simple language.
"Not so fast! Tell me in words of one syllable!"

(have your) work cut out
If you have to face a difficult task or a challenging situation, you have your work cut out for you.
"I've got a month to reorganise the accounts department. I have my work cut out for me!"

work your fingers to the bone
A person who works their fingers to the bone is extremely hardworking.
"He deserves his success; he worked his fingers to the bone when he started the business."

work like a charm
If something such as a product or method works like a charm, it functions very well or has the desired effect.
"I tried cleaning it with vinegar and it worked like a charm!"

work to rule
During a conflict, when employees decide to do only the minimum amount of work required by company rules, and refuse any overtime, etc., they work to rule.
"In protest against the new measures, the employees decided to work to rule."

work the system
People who work the system learn how a state or public organisation works in order to benefit as much as possible from the system.
"He hasn't changed his lifestyle since he lost his job - he must know how to work the system!"

the works
Something that has the works contains everything that is possible, or the full range of options.
"The first thing he did was order a new computer with the works."

in the works
If something is in the works, it is currently being prepared or planned.
"A reorganisation of the company is in the works."

world of difference
When comparing two things or situations, the expression a world of difference means that there is a vast difference between them.
"A swimming pool would make a world of difference in this hot climate."

come up in the world
A person who hascome up in the world is richer than before and has a higher social status.
"My old school friend has bought an apartment overlooking Central Park.She has certainly come up in the world."

in a world of your own
If you are in a world of your own, you are so preoccupied by your own concerns that you are unaware of what is happening around you.
"Dad's out there in the garden in a world of how own."

be/mean the world to
When you are or mean the world to someone, you are very important or precious to them.
"His daughter means all the world to Mr. Jones."

do a world of good
If something does you a world of good, it is beneficial and makes you feel a lot better.
"Why don't you go away for a few days? A break would do you a world of good. "

have the world at your feet
If you have the world at your feet, you are extremely successful and greatly admired.
"The talented young actress has the world at her feet."

have the world by its tail
Someone who has the world by its tail is very successful and has many opportunities to choose from.
"Due to her intelligence and hard work, she now has the world by its tail."

the world is your oyster
This expression means that you are free and able to enjoy the pleasures and opportunities that life has to offer.
"She left college feeling that the world was her oyster."

not for all the world
If you say that you would not to something for (all) the world, you mean that you would never do it, no matter what you were offered.
"I would not live in that building for (all) the world!"

out of this world
To refer to something as out of this world means that you think it is extremely good or impressive.
"The hotel was very comfortable and the food was out of this world"

best of both worlds
If a person has the best of both worlds, they have the benefits and advantages of two different things.
"We live in the centre of town, but only five minutes from the beach. We have the best of both worlds."

worlds apart
When two people or things are very different, they are worlds apart.
"As regards our political opinions, we are worlds apart."

worm one's way out of
If a person worms their way out of something, they use artful or devious means in order to avoid participating in it.
"You're not going to worm your way out of this. You must do your share!"

even a worm will turn
This expression means that even someone who never complains will react to an intolerable situation.
"Don't treat him so severely. He never protests, but even a worm will turn!"

worm's eye view
To offer a worm's eye view of a situation is to give your opinion based on what you see at close range from an inferior position, so it is therefore not a general view.
"I'm not sure I can be of much help. I can only offer you a worm's eye view of the situation."

the worse for wear
If someone or something is the worse for wear, they are in poor condition, either worn, damaged or tired.
"He came back from New York rather the worse for wear!"

worth one's salt
Someone who deserves respect because they do their job well is a person who is worth their salt.
"Any inspector worth their salt would have checked the papers carefully."

worth its weight in gold
Someone or something that is worth their weight in gold is considered to be of great value.
"We couldn't run the farm without him. He's worth his weight in gold."

worth your while
If something is worth your while, it is a useful thing to do and deserves the time spent on it.
"It would be well worth your while to attend the seminar."

wouldn't be caught dead
If someone says that they wouldn't be seen or caught dead in a particular place or doing something, they mean that they would be too ashamed or embarrassed.
"My seven-year-old son thinks he's a big boy. He wouldn't be caught dead holding my hand."

would up
If someone is so excited that they talk non-stop, they are wound up.
"Claire had so much to tell us after her trip that she was wound up."

wrap your brain around
If you concentrate on something in an effort to understand, you wrap your brain around it.
"I need a translation of this report urgently, so wrap your brain around it fast!"

wrapped up in
If you wrapped up in an activity, you are totally concentrated on it.
"Emma was so wrapped up in her work that she didn't realize her colleagues had all left."

wrapped up in cotton wool
Someone who is wrapped up in cotton wool is over-protected from dangers and risks.
"Their children are kept wrapped up in cotton wool."

writing on the wall
This refers to a situation where there are signs showing that a problem is going to occur.
"We all knew Larry was going to lose his job, but he refused to see the writing on the wall."

written all over your face
When someone's feelings or thoughts are very clear, you can say that they are written all over their face.
"Her affection for her grandson was written all over the old lady's face."

xerox subsidy 
This term refers to the habit of using the photocopier at work for personal use.
"A certain percentage of photocopies are in fact xerox subsidies."

yellow bellied 
A person who is yellow-bellied is cowardly, or not at all brave.
"The bus was full of yellow-bellied passengers who disappeared when the driver was attacked by two youths."

yes-man 
A yes-man is someone who always agrees with a person in authority in order to please them.
"George is a yes-man. He agrees with everything the boss says !"

yoke around one's neck 
An obligation, commitment or restraint that becomes an oppressive burden is called a yoke around one's neck.
"When John lost his job, the repayments on the house became a yoke around his neck."

you don't know the half of it 
This expression is used to tell someone that they know some of the facts but they don't know how bad the situation is.
"You don't know the half of it! He was beating her and terrifying the children. That's why she left him."

(it's) your call  
You say this to someone when you think that the final decision on a matter should ultimately be theirs.
"I prefer the other location for our new offices but youâ€™re the boss, so itâ€™s your call!"

your guess is as good as mine 
When talking to another person, 'your guess is as good as mine' means that neither of you knows the answer.
""What happened to the coffee machine?" "Your guess is as good as mine! Â»"

your wish is my command 
This is a humoristic way of saying that you are willing to do whatever the other person asks.
"Breakfast in bed? Your wish is my command!"

zero in on something 
If you zero in on something, you focus all your attention on that particular thing.
"The boss immediately zeroed in on the sales figures."

zero tolerance 
If an activity or a certain type of behaviour is given zero tolerance, it will not be accepted, not even once.
"The authorities have announced zero tolerance for smoking in public buildings."
